

\
\
\

::: 
!(Images/main-1.png)
:::

\



BY THE SAME AUTHOR

NONFICTION

Woman Hating

Our Blood: Prophecies and Discourses on Sexual Politics

Right-wing Women

Intercourse

Letters from a War Zone: Writings 1976---1989

Pornography and Civil Rights (with Catharine A.
MacKinnon)

FICTION

the new womans broken heart: short stories

Ice and Fire



\

::: 
!(Images/main-3.jpg)
:::

::: 
\
:::

::: 
\
:::

::: 
\
:::

::: 
!(Images/main-2.jpg)
:::

::: 
\
:::

\




PLUME

Published by the Penguin Group

Penguin Books USA Inc, 375 Hudson Street, New York, New York 10014, U.
S. A.

Penguin Books Ltd, 27 Wrights Lane, London W8 5TZ, England Penguin
Books Australia Ltd, Ringwood, Victoria, Australia Penguin Books Canada
Ltd, 10 Alcorn Avenue, Toronto, Ontario, Canada, M4V 3B2

Penguin Books (N. Z. ) Ltd, 182-190 Wairau Road, Auckland 10, New
Zealand

Penguin Books Ltd, Registered Offices: Harmondsworth, Middlesex,
England

Published by Plume, an imprint of Dutton Signet, a division of Penguin
Books USA Inc.

This paperback edition of Pornography first published in 1989 by
Dutton, an imprint of Dutton Signet, a division of Penguin Books USA
Inc. Published simultaneously in Canada by Fitzhenry and Whiteside,
Limited, Toronto.

Copyright © 1979, 1980, 1981 by Andrea Dworkin Introduction copyright ©
1989 by Andrea Dworkin

All rights reserved. Printed in the U. S. A.

No part of this publication may be reproduced or transmitted in any
form or by any means, electronic or mechanical, including photocopy,
recording, or any information storage and retrieval system now known or
to be invented, without permission in writing from the publisher, except
by a reviewer who wishes to quote brief passages in connection with a
review written for inclusion in a magazine, newspaper, or
broadcast.

Library of Congress Catalog Card Number: 89-51147 ISBN: 0-452-26793-5
10 9876543

The author gratefully acknowledges permission from the following
sources to reprint material in this book:\
Gena Corea for an unpublished interview with Dr. Herbert Ratner,
September 20, 1979.\
Alex de Jonge for his translation of four lines from Journaux Completes
by Charles Baudelaire, cited in Baudelaire: Prince of Clouds by Alex de
Jonge, copyright © 1976 by Alex de Jonge.\
Grove Press, Inc., for Justine from The Complete Marquis de Sade by
Marquis de Sade, translated by Richard Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse,
copyright © 1965 by Richard Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse.\
The Institute for Sex Research, Indiana University, for Sex Offenders:
An Analysis of Types by Paul H. Gebhard, John H. Gagnon, Wardell B.
Pomeroy, and Cornelia V. Christenson, published by Harper 8c Row,
Publishers, and Paul B. Hoeber, Inc., Medical Books © 1965 by The
Institute for Sex Research. And for Sexual Behavior in the Human Male by
Alfred C. Kinsey, Wardell B. Pomeroy, and Clyde E. Martin, published by
W. B. Saunders Company, copyright © 1948 by W. B. Saunders Company.\
Robin Morgan for "The Network of the Imaginary Mother" in Lady of the
Beasts: Poems, published by Random House, copyright © 1976 by Robin
Morgan.\
New Directions for two lines from A Season in Hell by Arthur Rimbaud,
translated by Louise Varese, copyright © 1945, 1952, 1961 by New
Directions.\
W. W. Norton 8c Company, Inc. for "Poem I" from "21 Love Poems" in Dream
of a Common Language by Adrienne Rich, copyright © 1978 by W. W. Norton
8c Company, Inc.\
Portions of this book have appeared in slightly altered form in New
Political Science, Sinister Wisdom, Mother Jones, and Ms.



\
\


\


\


For John Stoltenberg

In Memory of Rose Keller

\




> Troubles walk in long lines.

Russian proverb

> No two of us think alike about it, and yet it is clear to me, that
> question underlies the whole movement, and all our little skirmishing
> for better laws, and the right to vote, will yet be swallowed up in
> the real question, viz: Has woman a right to herself? It is very
> little to me to have the right to vote, to own property, etc., if I
> may not keep my body, and its uses, in my absolute right. Not one wife
> in a thousand can do that now.

::: 
Lucy Stone, in a letter to Antoinette
Brown,\
:::

::: 
July 11, 1855\

:::

> Sexual freedom, then, means the abolition of prostitution both in and
> out of marriage; means the emancipation of woman from sexual slavery
> and her coming into ownership and control of her own body; means the
> end of her pecuniary dependence upon man, so that she may never even
> seemingly have to procure whatever she may desire or need by sexual
> favors.

Victoria Woodhull, "Tried As By Fire; or, The True and The False,
Socially, " 1874

> He said that life is very expensive. Even women are more expensive.
> That when he wants to f\-\-- a woman they want so much money that he
> gives up the idea.\
> I pretended I didn't hear, because I don't speak pornography.

Carolina Maria de Jesus,



Introduction

1

> > I did not hesitate to let it be known of me, that the white man who
> > expected to succeed in whipping, must also succeed in killing
> > me.

Frederick Douglass, Narrative of the Life of Frederick\
Douglass An American Slave Written by Himself

In 1838, at the age of 21, Frederick Douglass became a runaway slave, a
hunted fugitive. Though later renowned as a powerful political orator,
he spoke his first public words with trepidation at an abolitionist
meeting---a meeting of white people---in Massachusetts in 1841.
Abolitionist leader William Lloyd Garrison recalled the event:

> He came forward to the platform with a hesitancy and embarrassment,
> necessarily the attendants of a sensitive mind in such a novel
> position. After apologizing for his ignorance, and reminding the
> audience that slavery was a poor school for the human intellect and
> heart, he proceeded to narrate some of the facts in his own history as
> a slave\.... As soon as he had taken his seat, filled with hope and
> admiration, I rose\... \and\\... reminded the audience of the peril
> which surrounded this self-emancipated young man at the North, ---even
> in Massachusetts, on the soil of the Pilgrim Fathers, among the
> descendants of revolutionary sires; and I appealed to them,
> whether they would ever allow him to be carried back into
> slavery---law or no law, constitution or no
> constitution.^1^

Always in danger as a fugitive, Douglass became an organizer for the
abolitionists; the editor of his own newspaper, which advocated both
abolition and women's rights; a station chief for the underground
railroad; a close comrade of John Brown's; and the only person willing,
at the Seneca Falls Convention in 1848, to second Elizabeth Cady
Stanton's resolution demanding the vote for women. To me, he has been a
political hero: someone whose passion for human rights was both
visionary and rooted in action; whose risk was real, not rhetorical;
whose endurance in pursuing equality set a standard for political honor.
In his writings, which were as eloquent as his orations, his repudiation
of subjugation was uncompromising. His political intelligence, which was
both analytical and strategic, was suffused with emotion: indignation at
human pain, grief at degradation, anguish over suffering, fury at apathy
and collusion. He hated oppression. He had an empathy for those hurt by
inequality that crossed lines of race, gender, and class because it was
an empathy animated by his own experience---his own experience of
humiliation and his own experience of dignity.

To put it simply, Frederick Douglass was a serious man--- a man serious
in the pursuit of freedom. Well, you see the problem. Surely it is
self-evident. What can any such thing have to do with us---with women in
our time? Imagine--- in present time---a woman saying, and meaning, that
a man who expected to succeed in whipping, must also succeed in killing
her. Suppose there were a politics of liberation premised on that
assertion---an assertion not of ideology but of deep and stubborn
outrage at being misused, a resolute assertion, a serious assertion by
serious women. What are serious women; are there any; isn't seriousness
about freedom by women for women grotesquely comic; we don't want to be
laughed at, do we? What would this politics of liberation be like? Where
would we find it? What would we have to do? Would we have to do
something other than dress for success? Would we have to stop the people
who are hurting us from hurting us? Not debate them; stop them. Would we
have to stop slavery? Not discuss it; stop it. Would we have to stop
pretending that our rights are protected in this society? Would we have
to be so grandiose, so arrogant, so unfeminine, as to believe that the
streets we walk on, the homes we live in, the beds we sleep in,
are---belong to us---really belong to us: we
decide what is right and what is wrong and if something hurts us, it
stops. It is, of course, gauche to be too sincere about these things,
and it is downright ridiculous to be serious. Intelligent people are
well mannered and moderate, even in pursuing freedom. Smart women
whisper and say please.

Now imagine Cherry Tart or Bunny or Pet or Beaver saying, and meaning,
that a man who expected to succeed in whipping must also succeed in
killing her. She says it; she means it. It is not a pornographic
scenario in which she is the dummy forced by the pimp-ventriloquist to
say the ubiquitous No-That-Means-Yes. It is not the usual sexual
provocation created by pornographers using a woman's body, the subtext
of which is: I refuse to be whipped so whip me harder, whip me more; I
refuse to be whipped, what I really want is for you to kill me; whip me,
then kill me; kill me, then whip me; whatever you want, however you want
it---was it good for you? Instead, the piece on the page or in the film
steps down and steps out: I'm real, she says. Like Frederick Douglass,
she will be hesitant and embarrassed. She will feel ignorant. She will
tell a first-person story about her own experience in prostitution, in
pornography, as a victim of incest, as a victim of rape, as someone who
has been beaten or tortured, as someone who has been bought and sold.
She may not remind her audience that sexual servitude is a poor school
for the human intellect and heart---sexually violated, often since
childhood, she may not know the value of her human intellect or her
human heart---and the audience cannot be counted on to know that she
deserved better than she got. Will there be someone there to implore the
audience to help her escape the pornography---law or no law,
constitution or no constitution; will the audience understand that as
long as the pornography of her exists she is a captive of it, a fugitive
from it? Will the audience be willing to fight for her freedom by
fighting against the pornography of her, because, as Linda Marchiano
said of "every time someone watches
that film, they are watching me being
raped"^2^? Will the audience understand that
she is standing in for those who didn't get away; will the audience
understand that those who didn't get away were
someone---each one was someone? Will the audience understand
what stepping down from the page or out of the film cost her---what it
took for her to survive, for her to escape, for her to dare to speak now
about what happened to her then?

"I'm an incest survivor, ex-pornography model, and exprostitute, " the
woman says. "My incest story begins before preschool and ends many years
later---this was with my father. I was also molested by an uncle and a
minister\... my father forced me to perform sexual acts with men at a
stag party when I was a teenager\.... My father was my pimp in
pornography. There were three occasions from ages nine to sixteen when
he forced me to be a pornography model\... in Nebraska, so, yes, it does
happen here. "^3^

I was thirteen when I was forced into prostitution and pornography, the
woman says. I was drugged, raped, gang-raped, imprisoned, beaten, sold
from one pimp to another, photographed by pimps, photographed by
tricks; I was used in pornography and they used pornography on
me; "\t\hey knew a child's face when they looked into it. It was clear
that I was not acting of my own free will. I was always covered with
welts and bruises\.... It was even clearer that I was sexually
inexperienced. I literally didn't know what to do. So they showed me
pornography to teach me about sex and then they would ignore my tears as
they positioned my body like the women in the pictures and used me.
"^4^

"As I speak about pornography, here, today, " the woman says, "I am
talking about my life. " I was raped by my uncle when I was ten, by my
stepbrother and stepfather by the time I was twelve. My stepbrother was
making pornography of me by the time I was fourteen. "I was not even
sixteen years old and my life reality consisted of sucking cocks, posing
nude, performing sexual acts and actively being repeatedly raped.
"^5^

These are the women in the pictures; they have stepped out, though the
pictures may still exist. They have become very serious women; serious
in the pursuit of freedom. There are many thousands of them in the
United States, not all first put in pornography as children though most
were sexually molested as children, raped or otherwise abused again
later, eventually becoming homeless and poor. They are feminists in the
antipornography movement, and they don't want to debate "free speech. "
Like Frederick Douglass, they are fugitives from the men who made a
profit off of them. They live in jeopardy, always more or less in
hiding. They organize to help others escape. They write---in blood,
their own. They publish sometimes, including their own newsletters. They
demonstrate; they resist; they disappear when the danger gets too close.
The Constitution has nothing for them---no help, no protection, no
dignity, no solace, no justice. The law has nothing for them---no
recognition of the injuries done them by pornography, no reparations for
what has been taken from them. They are real, and even though this
society will do nothing for them, they are women who have resolved that
the man who expects to succeed in whipping must also succeed in killing
them. This changes the nature of the women's movement. It must stop
slavery. The runaway slave is now part of it.



2

> One new indulgence was to go out evenings alone. This I worked out
> carefully in my mind, as not only a right but a duty. Why should a
> woman be deprived of her only free time, the time allotted to
> recreation? Why must she be dependent on some man, and thus forced to
> please him if she wished to go anywhere at night?

> A stalwart man once sharply contested my claim to this freedom to go
> alone. "Any true man, " he said with fervor, "is always ready to go
> with a woman at night. He is her natural protector. " "Against what? "
> I inquired. As a matter of fact, the thing a woman is most afraid to
> meet on a dark street is her natural protector. Singular.

Charlotte Perkins Gilman\
The Living of Charlotte Perkins Gilman: An Autobiography

She was thirteen. She was at a Girl Scout camp in northern Wisconsin.
She went for a long walk in the woods alone during the day. She had long
blond hair. She saw three hunters reading magazines, talking, joking.
One looked up and said: "There's a live one. " She thought they meant a
deer. She ducked and started to run away. They meant her. They chased
her, caught her, dragged her back to where they were camped. The
magazines were pornography of women she physically resembled: blond,
childlike. They called her names from the pornography: Little Got diva,
Golden Girl, also bitch and slut. They threatened to kill her. They made
her undress. It was November and cold. One held a rifle to her head;
another beat her breasts with his rifle. All three raped her---penile
penetration into the vagina. The third one couldn't get hard at first so
he demanded a blow job. She didn't know what that was. The third man
forced his penis into her mouth; one of the others cocked the trigger on
his rifle. She was told she had better do it right. She tried. When they
were done with her they kicked her: they kicked her naked body and they
kicked leaves and pine needles on her. "\T\hey told me that if I
wanted more, that I could come back the next day. "^6^

She was sexually abused when she was three by a boy who was
fourteen---it was a "game" he had learned from pornography. "\I\t
seems really bizarre to me to use the word 'boy' because the only memory
I have of this person is as a three year old. And as a three year old he
seemed like a really big man. " When she was a young adult she was
drugged by men who made and sold pornography. She remembers flashing
lights, being forced onto a stage, being undressed by two men and
sexually touched by a third. Men were waving money at her: "one of them
shoved it in my stomach and essentially punched me. I kept wondering how
it was possible that they couldn't see that I didn't want to be there,
that I wasn't there willingly."^7^

She had a boyfriend. She was twenty-one. One night he went to a stag
party and watched pornography films. He called her up to ask if he could
have sex with her. She felt obligated to make him happy. "I also felt
that the refusal would be indicative of sexual quote unquote hang-ups on
my part and that I was not quote unquote liberal enough. When
he arrived, he informed me that the other men
at the
party were envious that he had a girlfriend to fuck.
They wanted
to fuck too after watching the
pornography. He
informed me of this as he was taking his coat off. "
He had her
perform oral sex on him: "I did not do this of
my own
volition. He put his genitals in my face and he
said 'Take
it all. ' " He fucked her. The whole encounter
took about
five minutes. Then he dressed and went back to the party. "I felt
ashamed and numb and I also felt very used."^8^

She was seventeen, he was nineteen. He was an art student. He used her
body for photography assignments by putting her body in contorted
positions and telling her rape stories to get the expression he wanted
on her face: fear. About a year later he had an assignment to do body
casts in plaster. He couldn't get models because the plaster was heavy
and caused fainting. She was a premed student. She tried to explain to
him how deleterious the effects of the plaster were. "When you put
plaster on your body, it sets up, it draws the blood to the skin and the
more area it covers on your body, the more blood is drawn to your skin.
You become dizzy and nauseous and sick to your stomach and finally
faint. " He needed his work to be exhibited, so he needed her to model.
She tried. She couldn't stand the heat and the weight of the plaster.
"He wanted me to be in poses where I had to hold my hands up over my
head, and they would be numb and they would fall. He eventually tied my
hands over my head. " They got married. During the course of their
marriage he began to consume more and more pornography. He would read
excerpts to her from the magazines about group sex, wife swapping, anal
intercourse, and bondage. They would go to pornography films and wet
T-shirt contests with friends. "I felt devastated and disgusted watching
it. I was told by those men that if I wasn't as smart as I was and if I
would be more sexually liberated and more sexy that I would get along a
lot better in the world and that they and a lot of other men
would like me more. About this time I started feeling very terrified. I
realized that this wasn't a joke anymore. " She asked her mother for
help but was told that divorce was a disgrace and it was her
responsibility to make the marriage work. He brought his friends home to
act out the scenarios from the pornography. She found the group sex
humiliating and disgusting, and to prevent it she agreed to act out the
pornography in private with her husband. She began feeling suicidal. He
was transferred to an Asian country in connection with his job. The
pornography in the country where they now lived was more violent. He
took her to live sex shows where women had sex with animals, especially
snakes. Increasingly, when she was asleep he would force intercourse on
her. Then he started traveling a lot, and she used his absence to learn
karate. "One night when I was in one of those pornographic institutions,
I was sitting with a couple of people that I had known, watching the
women on stage and watching the different transactions and the sales of
the women and the different acts going on, and I realized that my life
wasn't any different than these women except that it was done in the
name of marriage. I could see how I was being seasoned to the use of
pornography and I could see what was coming next. I could see more
violence and I could see more humiliation and I knew at that point I was
either going to die from it, I was going to kill myself, or I was going
to leave. And I was feeling strong enough that I left\.... Pornography
is not a fantasy, it was my life, reality.
"^9^

At the time she made this statement, she couldn't have been older than
twenty-two. She was terrified that the people would be identifiable, and
so she spoke in only the most general terms, never specifying their
relationship to her. She said she had lived in a house with a divorced
woman, that woman's children, and the ex-husband, who refused to leave.
She had lived there for eighteen years. During that time, "the woman was
regularly raped by this man. He would bring pornographic magazines,
books, and paraphernalia into the bedroom with him and tell her that if
she did not perform the sexual acts that were being done in the 'dirty'
books and magazines he would beat and kill her. I know about this
because my bedroom was right next to hers. I could hear everything they
said. I could hear her screams and cries. In addition, since I did most
of the cleaning in the house, I would often come across the books,
magazines, and paraphernalia that were in the bedroom and other rooms of
the house\.... Not only did I suffer through the torture of listening to
the rapes and tortures of a woman, but I could see what grotesque acts
this man was performing on her from the pictures in the pornographic
materials. I was also able to see the systematic destruction of a human
being taking place before my eyes. At the time I lived with the woman, I
was completely helpless, powerless in regard to helping this woman and
her children in getting away from this man. " As a child, she was told
by the man that if she ever told or tried to run away he would break her
arms and legs and cut up her face. He whipped her with belts and
electrical cords. He made her pull her pants down to beat her. "I was
touched and grabbed where I did not want him to touch me. " She was also
locked in dark closets and in the basement for long periods of
time.\"'^10^

She was raped by two men. They were acting out the pornographic video
game "Custer's Revenge. " She was American Indian; they were white.
"They held me down and as one was running the tip of his knife across my
face and throat he said, 'Do you want to play Custer's Last Stand? It's
great. You lose but you don't care, do you? You like a little pain,
don't you, squaw.' They both laughed and then he said, 'There is a lot
of cock in Custer's Last Stand. You should be grateful, squaw, that
all-American boys like us want you. Maybe we will tie you to a tree and
start a fire around you.'^11^

Her name is Jayne Stamen. She is currently in jail. In 1986, she hired
three men to beat up her husband. She wanted him to know what a beating
felt like. He died. She was charged with second-degree murder; convicted
of first-degree manslaughter; sentenced to eight-and-a-half to
twenty-five years. She was also convicted of criminal solicitation: in
1984 she asked some men to kill her husband for her, then reneged; she
was sentenced on the criminal solicitation charge to two-and-a-third to
seven years. The sentences are to run consecutively. She was tortured in
her marriage by a man consumed by acting out pornography. He tied her up
when he raped her; he broke bones; he forced anal intercourse; he beat
her mercilessly; he penetrated her vagina with objects, "his rifle, or a
long-necked wine decanter, or twelve-inch artificial rubber penises. "
He shaved the hair off her pubic area because he wanted, in his words,
to "screw a baby's cunt. " He slept with a rifle and kept a knife by the
bed; he would threaten to cut her face with the knife if she didn't act
out the pornography, and he would use the knife again if she wasn't
showing pleasure. He called her all the names: whore, slut, cunt, bitch.
"He used to jerk himself off on my chest while I was sleeping, or I
would get woke up with him coming in my face and then he'd urinate on
me. \" She tried to escape several times. He came after her armed with
his rifle. She became addicted to alcohol and pills. "The papers stated
that I didn't report \the violence\ to the police. I did have the
police at my home on several occasions. Twice on Long Island was for the
gun threats, and once in Starrett City was also for the gun. The rest of
the times were for the beatings and throwing me out of the house. A few
times the police helped me get away from him with my clothes and the
boys. I went home to my mom's. \He came after her with a rifle. \ I
went to the doctor's and hospitals on several occasions, too, but I
could not tell the truth on how I 'hurt myself. ' I always covered up
for him, as I knew my life depended on that. " The judge wouldn't admit
testimony on the torture because he said the husband wasn't on trial.
The defense lawyer said in private that he thought she probably enjoyed
the abusive sex. Jayne's case will be appealed, but she may well have to
stay in jail at Bedford Hills, a New York State prison for women, for
the duration of the appeal because Women Against Pornography, a group
that established the Defense Fund for Jayne Stamen, has not been able to
raise bail money for her. Neither have I or others who care. It isn't
chic to help such women; they aren't the Black Panthers. Ironically,
there are many women---and recently a teenage girl, a victim of
incest---who have hired others to kill the men---husbands, fathers---who
were torturing them because they could not bear to do it themselves. Or
the woman pours gasoline on the bed when he sleeps and lights the fire.
Jayne didn't hire the men to kill her husband; the real question may be,
why not? why didn't she? Women don't understand self-defense the way men
do---perhaps because sexual abuse destroys the self. We don't feel we
have a right to kill just because we are being beaten, raped, tortured,
and terrorized. We are hurt for a long time before we fight back. Then,
usually, we are punished: "I have lived in a prison for ten years,
meaning my marriage, " says Jayne Stamen, "\... and now they have me in
a real prison. "^12^

I've quoted from statements, all made in public forums, by women I know
well (except for Jayne Stamen; I've talked with her but I haven't met
her). I can vouch for them; I know the stories are true. The women who
made these particular statements are only a few of the thousands of
women I have met, talked with, questioned: women who have been hurt by
pornography. The women are real to me. I know what they look like
standing tall; I've seen the fear; I've watched them remember; I've
talked with them about other things, all sorts of things: intellectual
issues, the weather, politics, school, children, cooking. I have some
idea of their aspirations as individuals, the ones they lost during the
course of sexual abuse, the ones they cherish now. I know them. Each
one, for me, has a face, a voice, a whole life behind her face and her
voice. Each is more eloquent and more hurt than I know how to convey.
Since 1974, when my book was first
published, women have been seeking me out to tell me that they have been
hurt by pornography; they have told me how they have been hurt in
detail, how much, how long, by how many. They thought I might believe
them, initially, I think, because I took pornography seriously
in I said it was cruel, violent, basic
to the way our culture sees and treats women---and I said the hate in it
was real. Well, they knew that the hate in it was real because they had
been sexually assaulted by that hate. One does not make the first
tentative efforts to communicate about this abuse to those who will
almost certainly ridicule one. Some women took a chance on me; and it
was a chance, because I often did not want to listen. I had my limits
and my reasons, like everyone else. For many years, I heard the same
stories I have tried to encapsulate here: the same stories, sometimes
more complicated, sometimes more savage, from thousands of women, most
of whom hadn't dared to tell anyone. No part of the country was exempt;
no age group; no racial or ethnic group; no "life-style" however
"normal" or "alternative. " The statements I have paraphrased here are
not special: not more sadistic, not chosen by me because they are
particularly sickening or offensive. In fact, they are not particularly
sickening or offensive. They simply are what happens to women who are
brutalized by the use of pornography on them.

Such first-person stories from women are dismissed by defenders of
pornography as "anecdotal"; they misuse the word to make it
denote a story, probably Active, that is small, trivial,
inconsequential, proof only of some defect in the woman herself---the
story tells us nothing about pornography but it tells us all we need to
know about the woman. She's probably lying; maybe she really liked it;
and if it did happen, how could anyone (sometimes referred to as "a
smart girl like you") be stupid enough, simple-minded enough, to think
that pornography had anything to do with it? Wasn't there, as one
grinning adversary always asks, also coffee in the house? The coffee, he
suggests, is more likely to be a factor in the abuse than the
pornography---after all, the bad effects of coffee have been proven in
the laboratory. What does one do when women's lives are worth so
little---worth arrogant, self-satisfied ridicule and nothing else, not
even the appearance, however false, of charity or concern? Alas, one
answers: the man (the husband, the boyfriend, the rapist, the
torturer---you or your colleague or your best friend or your buddy)
wasn't reading the coffee label when he tied the knots; the directions
he followed are found in pornography, and, frankly, they are not found
anywhere else. The first-person stories are human experience, raw and
true, not mediated by dogma or ideology social
convention; "human" is the trick word in the sentence. If one values
women as human beings, one cannot turn away or refuse to hear so that
one can refuse to care without bearing responsibility for the refusal.
One cannot turn one's back on the women or on the burden of memory they
carry. If one values women as human beings, one will not turn one's back
on the women who are being hurt today and the women who will be hurt
tomorrow.

Most of what we know about the experience of punishment, the experience
of torture, the experience of socially sanctioned sadism, comes from the
first-person testimony of individuals---"anecdotal" material. We have
the first-person stories of Frederick Douglass and Sojourner Truth, of
Primo Levy and Elie Wiesel, of Nadezhda Mandelstam and Aleksandr
Solzhenitsyn. Others in the same or different circumstances of torture
and terror have spoken out to bear witness. Often, they were not
believed- They were shamed, not honored. We smelled the humiliation, the
degradation, on them; we turned away. At the same time, their stories
were too horrible, too impossible, too unpleasant; their stories
indicted those who stood by and did nothing---most of us, most of the
time. Respectfully, I suggest that the women who have experienced the
sadism of pornography on their bodies---the women in the pornography and
the women on whom the pornography is used---are also survivors; they
bear witness, now, for themselves, on behalf of others. "Survivors, "
wrote Terrence Des Pres, "are not individuals in the bourgeois sense.
They are living remnants of the general struggle, and certainly they
know it."^l3^ Of these women hurt by pornography, we must say that they
know it now. Before, each was alone, unspeakably alone, isolated in
terror and humiliated even by the will to live---it was the will to
live, after all, that carried each woman from rape to rape, from beating
to beating. Each had never heard another's voice saying the words of
what had happened, telling the same story; because it is the same story,
over and over---and none of those who escaped, survived, endured, are
individuals in the bourgeois sense. These women will not abandon the
meaning of their own experience. That meaning is: pornography is the
orchestrated destruction of women's bodies and souls; rape, battery,
incest, and prostitution animate it; dehumanization and sadism
characterize it; it is war on women, serial assaults on dignity,
identity, and human worth; it is tyranny. Each woman who has survived
knows from the experience of her own life that pornography is
captivity---the woman trapped in the picture used on the woman trapped
wherever he's got her.

\




3

> The burden of proof will be on those of us who have been victimized.
> If I \any woman\ am able to prove that the picture you are holding,
> the one where the knife is stuffed up my vagina, was taken when my
> pimp forced me at gunpoint and photographed it without my consent, if
> my existence is proved real, I am coming to take what is mine. If I
> can prove that the movie you are looking at called Black
> Bondage, the one where my black skin is synonymous with
> filth and my bondage and my slavery is encouraged, caused me harm and
> discrimination, if my existence is proved real, I am coming to take
> what is mine. Whether you like it or not, the time is coming when you
> will have to get your fantasy

Therese Stanton, "Fighting for Our Existence" in Changing
Men

In the fall of 1983, something changed. The speech of women hurt by
pornography became public and real. It, they, began to exist in the
sphere of public reality. Constitutional lawyer Catharine A. MacKinnon
and I were hired by the City of Minneapolis to draft an amendment to the
city's civil rights law: an amendment that would recognize pornography
as a violation of the civil rights of women, as a form of sex
discrimination, an abuse of human rights. We were also asked to organize
hearings that would provide a legislative record showing the need for
such a law. Essentially, the legislators needed to know that these
violations were systematic and pervasive in the population they
represented, not rare, peculiar anomalies.

The years of listening to the private stories had been years of despair
for me. It was hopeless. I could not help. There was no help. I
listened; I went on my way; nothing changed. Now, all the years of
listening were knowledge, real knowledge that could be mined: a
resource, not a burden and a curse. I knew how women were hurt by
pornography. My knowledge was concrete, not abstract: I knew the ways it
was used; I knew how it was made; I knew the scenes of exploitation and
abuse in real life---the lives of prostitutes, daughters, girlfriends,
wives; I knew the words the women said when they dared to whisper what
had happened to them; I could hear their voices in my mind, in my heart.
I didn't know that there were such women all around me, everywhere, in
Minneapolis that fall. I was heartbroken as women I knew came forward to
testify: though I listened with an outer detachment to the stories of
rape, incest, prostitution, battery, and torture, each in the service of
pornography, inside I wanted to die.

The women who came forward to testify at the hearings held by the
Minneapolis City Council on December 12 and 13, 1983, gave their names
and specified the area of the city in which they lived. They spoke on
the record before a governmental body in the city where they lived;
there they were, for family, neighbors, friends, employers, teachers,
and strangers to see, to remember. They described in detail sexual abuse
through pornography as it had happened to them. They were questioned on
their testimony by Catharine MacKinnon and myself and also by members of
the city council and sometimes the city attorney. There were
photographers and television cameras. There were a couple of hundred
people in the room. There was no safety, no privacy, no retreat, no
protection; only a net of validation provided by the testimony of
experts---clinical psychologists, prosecutors, experimental
psychologists, social scientists, experts in sexual abuse from rape
crisis centers and battered women's shelters, and those who worked with
sex offenders. The testimony of these experts was not abstract or
theoretical; it brought the lives of more women, more children, into the
room: more rape, more violation through pornography. They too were
talking about real people who had been hurt, sometimes killed; they had
seen, known, treated, interviewed, numbers of them. A new social truth
emerged, one that had been buried in fear, shame, and the silence of the
socially powerless: no woman hurt by pornography was alone---she never
had been; no woman hurt by pornography would ever be alone again because
each was---truly---a "living remnant of the general struggle. " What the
survivors said was speech; the pornography had been, throughout their
lives, a means of actively suppressing their speech. They had been
turned into pornography in life and made mute; terrorized by it and made
mute. Now, the mute spoke; the socially invisible were seen; the women
were real; they mattered. This speech---their speech---was new in the
world of public discourse, and it was made possible by the development
of a law that some called censorship. The women came forward because
they thought that the new civil rights law recognized what had happened
to them, gave them recourse and redress, enhanced their civil dignity
and human worth. The law itself gave them
I am real; they believed me; I count; social policy at last will take
my life into account, validate my worth---me, the woman who was forced
to fuck a dog; me, the woman he urinated on; me, the woman he tied up
for his friends to use; me, the woman he masturbated in; me, the woman
he branded or maimed; me, the woman he prostituted; me, the woman they
gang-raped.

The law was passed twice in Minneapolis in 1983 and 1984 by two
different city councils; it was vetoed each time by the same mayor, a
man active in Amnesty International, opposing torture outside of
Minneapolis. The law was passed in 1984 in Indianapolis with a redrafted
definition that targeted violent pornography---the kind "everyone"
opposes. The city was sued for passing it; the courts found it
unconstitutional. The appeals judge said that pornography did all the
harm we claimed---it promoted insult and injury, rape and assault, even
caused women to have lower wages---and that these effects proved its
power as speech; therefore, it had to be protected. In 1985, the law was
put on the ballot by popular petition in
Cambridge, Massachusetts. The city council refused to allow it
on the ballot; we had to sue for ballot access; the civil liberties
people opposed our having that access; we won the court case and the
city was ordered to put the law on the ballot. We got 42 percent of the
vote, a higher percentage than feminists got on the first women's
suffrage referendum. In 1988, the law was on the ballot in Bellingham,
Washington, in the presidential election; we got 62 percent of the vote.
The city had tried to keep us off the ballot; again we had to get a
court order to gain ballot access. The City of Bellingham was sued by
the ACLU in federal court for having the law, however unwillingly; a
federal district judge found the law unconstitutional, simply
reiterating the previous appeals court decision in the Indianapolis
case---indeed, there was a statement that the harms of pornography were
recognized and not in
dispute.

We have not been able to get the courts to confront a real woman
plaintiff suing a real pornographer for depriving her of real rights
through sexual exploitation or sexual abuse. This is because the
challenges to the civil rights law have been abstract arguments about
speech, as if women's lives are abstract, as if the harms are abstract,
conceded but not real. The women trapped in the pictures continue to be
perceived as the free speech of the pimps who exploit them. No judge
seems willing to look such a woman, three-dimensional and breathing, in
the face and tell her that the pimp's use of her is his constitutionally
protected right of speech; that he has a right to express himself by
violating her. The women on whom the pornography is used in assault
remain invisible and speechless in these court cases. No judge has had
to try to sleep at night having heard a real woman's voice describing
what happened to her, the incest, the rape, the gang rape, the battery,
the forced prostitution. Keeping these women silent in courts of law is
the main strategy of the free speech lawyers who defend the pornography
industry. Hey, they love literature; they deplore sexism. If some women
get hurt, that's the price we pay for freedom. Who are
the "we"? What is the "freedom"? These speech-loving lawyers
keep the women from speaking in court so that no judge will actually be
able to listen to
them.

Women continue speaking out in public forums, even though we are
formally and purposefully silenced in actual courts of law. Hearings
were held by a subcommittee of the Senate Judiciary Committee on the
effects of pornography on women and children; the Attorney General's
Commission on Pornography listened to the testimony of women hurt by
pornography; women are demanding to speak at conferences, debates, on
television, radio. This civil rights law is taught in law schools all
over the country; it is written about in law journals, often favorably;
increasingly, it has academic support; and its passage has been cited as
precedent in at least one judicial decision finding that pornography in
the workplace can be legally recognized as sexual harassment. The time
of silence---at least the time of absolute silence---is over. And the
civil rights law developed in Minneapolis has had an impact around the
world. It is on the agenda of legislators in England, Ireland, West
Germany, New Zealand, Tasmania, and Canada; it is on the agenda of
political activists all over the world.

The law itself is civil, not criminal. It allows people who have been
hurt by pornography to sue for sex discrimination. Under this law, it is
sex discrimination to coerce, intimidate, or fraudulently induce anyone
into pornography; it is sex discrimination to force pornography on a
person in any place of employment, education, home, or any public place;
it is sex discrimination to assault, physically attack, or injure any
person in a way that is directly caused by a specific piece of
pornography---the pornographers share responsibility for the assault; in
the Bellingham version, it is also sex discrimination to defame any
person through the unauthorized use in pornography of their name, image,
and/or recognizable personal likeness; and it is sex discrimination to
produce, sell, exhibit, or distribute pornography---to traffic in the
exploitation of women, to traffic in material that provably causes
aggression against and lower civil status for women in society.

The law's definition of pornography is concrete, not abstract.
Pornography is defined as the graphic, sexually explicit subordination
of women in pictures and/or words that also includes women presented
dehumanized as sexual objects, things, or commodities; or women
presented as sexual objects who enjoy pain or humiliation; or women
presented as sexual objects who experience sexual pleasure in being
raped; or women presented as sexual objects tied up or cut up or
mutilated or bruised or physically hurt; or women presented in postures
or positions of sexual submission, servility, or display; or women's
body parts--- including but not limited to vaginas, breasts, buttocks---
exhibited such that women are reduced to those parts; or women presented
as whores by nature; or women presented being penetrated by objects or
animals; or women presented in scenarios of degradation, injury,
torture, shown as filthy or inferior, bleeding, bruised, or hurt in a
context that makes these conditions sexual. If men, children, or
transsexuals are used in any of the same ways, the material also meets
the definition of pornography.

For women hurt by pornography, this law simply describes reality; it is
a map of a real world. Because the law allows them to sue those who have
imposed this reality on them---especially the makers, sellers,
exhibitors, and distributors of pornography---they have a way of
redrawing the map. The courts now protect the pornography; they
recognize the harm to women in judicial decisions---or they use words
that say they recognize the harm---and then tell women that the
Constitution protects the harm; profit is real to them and they make
sure the pimps stay rich, even as women and their children are this
country's poor. The civil rights law is designed to confront both the
courts and the pornographers with a demand for substantive, not
theoretical, equality. This law says: we have the right to stop them
from doing this to us because we are human beings. "If my existence is
proved real, I am coming to take what is mine, " Therese Stanton wrote
for every woman who wants to use this law. How terrifying that thought
must be to those who have been using women with impunity.

Initially an amendment to a city ordinance, this law has had a global
impact because: (1) it tells the truth about what pornography is and
does; (2) it tells the truth about how women are exploited and hurt by
the use of pornography; (3) it seeks to expand the speech of women by
taking the pornographers' gags out of our mouths; (4) it seeks to expand
the speech and enhance the civil status of women by giving us the courts
as a forum in which we will have standing and authority; (5) it is a
mechanism for redistributing power, taking it from pimps, giving it to
those they have been exploiting for profit, injuring for pleasure; (6)
it says that women matter, including the women in the pornography. This
law and the political vision and experience that inform it are not going
to go away. We are going to stop the pornographers. We are going to
claim our human dignity under law. One ex-prostitute, who is an
organizer for the passage of this civil rights law, wrote: "Confronting
how I've been hurt is the hardest thing that I've ever had to do in my
life. A hard life, if I may say so. "^14^ She is right. Confronting the
pornographers is easier---their threats, their violence, their power.
Confronting the courts is easier---their indifference, their contempt
for women, their plain stupidity. Confronting the status quo is easier.
Patience is easier and so is every form of political activism, however
dangerous. Beaver is real, all right. A serious woman---formidable
even---she is coming to take what is hers.

\




4

> That same night \July 20, 1944, the attempt by
> the generals to assassinate Hitler\ he \Goebbels\
> turned his house into "a
> prison, headquarters and court rolled into one\"; Goebbels himself
> headed a commission of investigation; and he and Himmler
> cross-examined the arrested generals throughout the night. Those
> condemned, then or thereafter, were executed with revolting cruelty.
> They were hanged from meat-hooks and slowly strangled. Goebbels
> ordered a film to be made of their trial and execution: it was to be
> shown, to Wehrmacht
> audiences. However, the reaction of the first audience was so hostile
> that it had to be suppressed.

Hugh Trevor-Roper in his introduction to Final Entries 1945:
The Diaries of Joseph Goebbels

As far as I can determine, Goebbels' film of the generals slowly,
horribly dying---their innards caving in from the force of gravity on
their hung bodies, the slow strangulation pushing out their tongues and
eyes and causing erection (which strangulation invariably does in the
male)--- was the first snuff film. The master of hate propaganda didn't
get it right though---a rare lapse. Audiences became physically sick.
These were Nazi audiences watching Nazi generals, men of power, the
society's patriarchs, so white they were Aryan; rulers, not slaves. It
only works when the torture is done on those who have been dehumanized,
made inferior---not just in the eyes of the beholder but in his real
world. Goebbels started out with cartoons of Jews before the Nazis came
to power; he could have moved on to the films made in Dachau in 1942,
for instance, of "the reactions of the men placed in the Luftwaffe's
low-pressure chambers"^15^; desensitizing his Nazi audiences to the
humiliation, the torture, of Jews, he could have made a film that would
have worked---of Jews hanging from meat hooks, slowly strangled. But
never of power, never of those who were the same, never of
those who had been fully human to the audience the day before, never of
those who had been respected.
Never.

Des Pres says it is easier to kill if "the victim exhibits selfdisgust;
if he cannot lift his eyes for humiliation, or if lifted they show only
emptiness\... "^16^ There is some pornography in which women are that
abject, that easy to kill, that close to being dead already. There is
quite a lot of it; and it is highly prized, expensive. There is still
more pornography in which the woman wets her lips and pushes out her ass
and says hurt me. She is painted so that the man cannot miss the mark:
her lips are bright red so that he can find the way into her throat; her
vaginal lips are pink or purple so that he can't miss; her anus is
darkened while her buttocks are flooded with light. Her eyes glisten.
She smiles. Sticking knives up her own vagina, she smiles. She comes.
The Jews didn't do it to themselves and they didn't orgasm. In
contemporary American pornography, of course, the Jews do do it to
themselves---they, usually female, seek out the Nazis, go voluntarily to
concentration camps, beg a domineering Nazi to hurt them, cut them, burn
them---and they do climax, stupendously, to both sadism and death. But
in life, the Jews didn't orgasm. Of course, neither do women; not in
life. But no one, not even Goebbels, said the Jews liked it. The society
agreed that the Jews deserved it, but not that they wanted it and not
that it gave them sexual pleasure. There were no photographs from
Ravensbruck concentration camp of the prostitutes who were incarcerated
there along with other women gasping for breath in pleasure; the gypsies
didn't orgasm either. There were no photographs---real or simulated---of
the Jews smiling and waving the Nazis closer, getting on the trains with
their hands happily fingering their exposed genitals or using Nazi guns,
swastikas, or Iron Crosses for sexual penetration. Such behaviors would
not have been credible even in a society that believed
the Jews were both subhuman and intensely sexual in the racist
sense---the men rapists, the women whores. The questions now really are:
why is pornography credible in our society: \' how can anyone believe
it? And then: how subhuman would women have to be for the pornography to
be true? To the men who use pornography, how subhuman are women? If men
believe the pornography because it makes them come---them, not the
women---what is sex to men and how will women survive
it?

This book---written from 1977 through 1980, published in 1981 after two
separate publishers reneged on contractual agreements to publish it (and
a dozen more refused outright), out of print in the United States for
the last several years---takes power, sadism, and dehumanization
seriously. I am one of those serious women. This book asks how power,
sadism, and dehumanization work in pornography---against women, for
men---to establish the sexual and social subordination of women to men.
This book is distinguished from most other books on pornography by its
bedrock conviction that the power is real, the cruelty is real, the
sadism is real, the subordination is real: the political crime against
women is real. This book says that power used to destroy women is
atrocity. is not,
and was never intended to be, an effete intellectual exercise. I want
real change, an end to the social power of men over women; more starkly,
his boot off my neck. In this book, I wanted to dissect male dominance;
do an autopsy on it, but it wasn't dead. Instead, there were
artifacts---films, photographs, books---an archive of evidence and
documentation of crimes against women. This was a living archive,
commercially alive, carnivorous in its use of women, saturating the
environment of daily life, explosive and expanding, vital because it was
synonymous with sex for the men who made it and the men who used
it---men so arrogant in their power over us that they published the
pictures of what they did to us, how they used us, expecting submission
from us, compliance; we were supposed to follow the orders implicit in
the pictures. Instead, some of us understood that we could look at those
pictures and see them---see the men. Know thyself, if you are lucky
enough to have a self that hasn't been destroyed by rape in its many
forms; and then, know the bastard on top of you. This book is about him,
the collective him: who he is; what he wants; what he needs (the key to
both his rage and his political vulnerability); how he's diddling you
and why it feels so bad and hurts so much; what's keeping him in place
on you; why he won't move off of you; what it's going to take to blow
him loose. A different kind of blow job. Is he scared? You bet.

Pornography. Men Possessing Women also puts pornography,
finally, into its appropriate context. A system of dominance and
submission, pornography has the weight and significance of any other
historically real torture or punishment of a group of people because of
a condition of birth; it has the weight and significance of any other
historically real exile of human beings from human dignity, the purging
of them from a shared community of care and rights and respect.
Pornography happens. It is not outside the world of material reality
because it happens to women, and it is not outside the world of material
reality because it makes men come. The man's ejaculation is real. The
woman on whom his semen is spread, a typical use in pornography, is
real. Men characterize pornography as something mental because their
minds, their thoughts, their dreams, their fantasies, are more real to
them than women's bodies or lives; in fact, men have used their social
power to characterize a \$10-billion-a-year trade in women as fantasy.
This is a spectacular example of how those in power cannibalize not only
people but language. "We do not know, " wrote George Steiner, "whether
the study of the humanities, of the noblest that has been said and
thought, can do very much to humanize. We do not know; and surely there
is something rather terrible in our doubt whether the study and delight
a man finds in Shakespeare make him any less capable of organizing a
concentration camp. "^17^ As long as language is a weapon of
power---used to destroy the expressive abilities of the powerless by
destroying their sense of reality---we do know. Beaver
knows.

Some have said that pornography is a superficial target; but, truly,
this is wrong. Pornography incarnates male supremacy. It is the DNA of
male dominance. Every rule of sexual abuse, every nuance of sexual
sadism, every highway and byway of sexual exploitation, is encoded in
it. It's what men want us to be, think we are, make us into; how men use
us; not because biologically they are men but because this is how their
social power is organized. From the perspective of the political
activist, pornography is the blueprint of male supremacy; it shows how
male supremacy is built. The political activist needs to know the
blueprint. In cultural terms, pornography is the fundamentalism of male
dominance. Its absolutism on women and sexuality, its dogma, is
merciless. Women are consigned to rape and prostitution; heretics are
disappeared and destroyed. Pornography is the essential sexuality of
male power: of hate, of ownership, of hierarchy; of sadism, of
dominance. The premises of pornography are controlling in every rape and
every rape case, whenever a woman is battered or prostituted, in incest,
including in incest that occurs before a child can even speak, and in
murder--- murders of women by husbands, lovers, and serial killers. If
this is superficial, what's deep?

\




5

When I first wrote this book, I was going to use these lines from
Elizabeth Barrett Browning's letters as an epigraph: "If a woman ignores
these wrongs, then may women as a sex continue to suffer them; there is
no help for any of us---let us be dumb and die. "^18^I changed
my mind, because I decided that no woman deserved what pornography does
to women: no woman, however stupid or evil, treacherous or cowardly,
venal or corrupt; no woman. I also decided that even if some women did,
I didn't. I also remembered the brave women, the women who had survived,
escaped; in the late 1970s, they were still silent, but I had heard
them. I don't want them, ever, to be dumb and die; and certainly not
because some other woman somewhere is a coward or a fool or a cynic or a
Kapo. There are women who will defend pornography, who don't give a
damn. There are women who will use pornography, including on other
women. There are women who will work for pornographers---not as
so-called models but as managers, lawyers, publicists, and paid writers
of "opinion" and "journalism. " There are women of every kind, all the
time; there are always women who will ignore egregious wrongs. My
aspirations for dignity and equality do not hinge on perfection in
myself or in any other woman; only on the humanity we share, fragile as
that appears to be. I understand Elizabeth Barrett Browning's
desperation and the rage behind it, but I'm removing her curse. No
woman's betrayal will make us dumb and dead---no more and never again.
Beaver's endured too much to turn back
now.

---Andrea Dworkin New York City March 1989

\




Preface

This is a book about the meaning of pornography and the
system of power in which pornography exists. Its particular theme is the
power of men in pornography.

This is not a book about the First Amendment. By definition the First
Amendment protects only those who can exercise the rights it protects.
Pornography by definition---"the graphic depiction of whores"---is trade
in a class of persons who have been systematically denied the rights
protected by the First Amendment and the rest of the Bill of Rights. The
question this book raises is not whether the First Amendment protects
pornography or should, but whether pornography keeps women from
exercising the rights protected by the First Amendment.

This is not a book about obscenity. For something to be obscene, a
judgment must be made that it is not fit to be shown or displayed. One
possible (though not generally accepted) root meaning of the
word is the ancient Greek for "off
stage"---in effect that which should not be shown, probably for
aesthetic reasons. Another possible, more likely root meaning of the
word is the Latin for "against filth. " This
suggests our own contemporary legal usage: is a given work filth and are
we, the people, against it? If so, it is obscene. Obscenity is not a
synonym for pornography. Obscenity is an idea; it requires a judgment of
value. Pornography is concrete, "the graphic depiction of whores.
"

With respect to both obscenity and the First Amendment: this is not a
book about what should or should not be shown; it is a book about the
meaning of what is being shown.

This book is not about the difference between pornography and erotica.
Feminists have made honorable efforts to define the difference, in
general asserting that erotica involves mutuality
and reciprocity, whereas pornography involves dominance and
violence. But in the male sexual lexicon, which is the vocabulary of
power, erotica is simply high-class pornography: better produced, better
conceived, better executed, better packaged, designed for a better class
of consumer. As with the call girl and the streetwalker, one is turned
out better but both are produced by the same system of sexual values and
both perform the same sexual service. Intellectuals, especially, call
what they themselves produce or like "erotica, " which means simply that
a very bright person made or likes whatever it is. The pornography
industry, larger than the record and film industries combined, sells
pornography, "the graphic depiction of whores. " In the male system,
erotica is a subcategory of
pornography.

Finally, this is not a liberal book about how pornography hurts all of
us. As militant feminist Christabel Pankhurst wrote concerning the trade
in women in 1913: "Men have a simple remedy for this state of things.
They can alter their way of life."^1^

^\
^



\
\

::: 
!(Images/main-4.png)
:::

\



1

Power

> For freedom is always relative to power, and the kind of freedom
> which at any moment it is most urgent to affirm depends on the nature
> of the power which is prevalent and established.

R. H. Tawney,

The power of men is first a metaphysical assertion of self, an
I am that exists a priori, bedrock, absolute, no
embellishment or apology required, indifferent to denial or challenge.
It expresses intrinsic authority. It never ceases to exist no matter how
or on what grounds it is attacked; and some assert that it survives
physical death. This self is not merely subjectively felt. It is
protected by laws and customs, proclaimed in art and in literature,
documented in history, upheld in the distribution of wealth. This self
cannot be eradicated or reduced to nothing. It is. When the subjective
sense of self falters, institutions devoted to its maintenance buoy it
up.

The first tenet of male-supremacist ideology is that men have this self
and that women must, by definition, lack it. Male self seems to be a
contradiction. On the one hand, it hangs suspended in thin air; it is
magically perpetual; it requires nothing to sustain or support it. On
the other hand, it is entitled to take what it wants to sustain or
improve itself, to have anything, to requite any need at any cost. In
fact, there is no contradiction, just a simple circle: the nature of the
male self is that it takes, so that, by definition, the absolute self is
expressed in the absolute right to take what it needs to sustain itself.
The immutable self of the male boils down to an utterly unselfconscious
parasitism. The self is the conviction, beyond reason or scrutiny, that
there is an equation between what one wants and the fact that one is.
Going Descartes one better, this conviction might be expressed: I want
and I am entitled to have, therefore I am.

Self is incrementally expanded as the parasite drains self from those
not entitled to it. To him it is given, by faith and action, from birth.
To her it is denied, by faith and action, from birth. His is never big
enough; hers is always too big, however small. As a child, the first
self he drains is that of his mother---whatever she has of it is
reserved for him. He feeds off her labor and her qualities. He uses them
up. She is devoted, more or less; but the more is as much insult as the
less; and nothing is ever enough unless it has been too much; all of
this regardless of what or how much it has actually been. As the boy
matures, he is encouraged to make the treacherous and apparently
devastating ''normal adjustment, " that is, to transfer his parasitism
of the mother to other females, who have more succulent selves to which
they are not entitled. In the course of his life, he reenacts this grand
transition as often as he wishes. He finds the qualities and services he
needs and he takes them. Especially he uses women, as Virginia Woolf
described in, to enlarge
himself. He is always in a panic, never large enough. But still, his
self is immutable however much he may fear its ebbing away, because he
keeps taking, and it is taking that is his immutable right and his
immutable self. Even when he is obsessed with his need to be more and to
have more, he is convinced of his right to be and to have.

Second, power is physical strength used over and against others less
strong or without the sanction to use strength as power. If physical
strength is not used over and against others---for instance, if a slave
is strong---it is not power. The right to physical strength as power, in
a male-supremacist system, is vouchsafed to men. The second tenet of
male supremacy is that men are physically stronger than women and, for
that reason, have dominion over them. Physical strength in women that is
not directly harnessed to "women's work" becomes an abomination, and its
use against men, that is, as power, is anathema, forbidden, horribly
punished. The reality of male physical strength in an absolute
sense is less important than the ideology that sacralizes and celebrates
it. In part, the physical strength of men over women is realized because
men keep women physically weak. Men choose women who are weak as mates
(unless heavy labor is part of the female role); and systematically in
the raising of women, physical strength is undermined and sabotaged.
Women are physically weaker the higher their economic class (as defined
by men); the closer they are to power, the weaker they are. Even women
who are physically strong must pretend to be weak to underline not only
their femininity but also their upwardly mobile aesthetic and economic
aspirations. Physical incapacity is a form of feminine beauty and a
symbol of male wealth: he is rich enough to keep her unable to labor,
useless, ornamental. Women are also often mutilated, physically or by
fashion and custom, so that whatever physical strength they may have is
meaningless. Male physical strength, regardless of its absolute measure,
is meaningful. Male physical strength expressed as power, like male
self, is not a subjective phenomenon; its significance is not whimsical.
Laws and customs protect it; art and literature adore it; history
depends on it; the distribution of wealth maintains it. Its absolute
value is mythologized and mystified so that women are cowed by its
legend as well as its reality. The power of physical strength combines
with the power of self so that he not only is, he is stronger; he not
only takes, he takes by force.

Third, power is the capacity to terrorize, to use self and strength to
inculcate fear, fear a whole class of
persons a whole class of persons. The acts of
terror run the gamut from rape to battery to sexual abuse of children to
war to murder to maiming to torture to enslaving to kidnapping to verbal
assault to cultural assault to threats of death to threats of harm
backed up by the ability and sanction to deliver. The symbols of terror
are commonplace and utterly familiar: the gun, the knife, the bomb, the
fist, and so on. Even more significant is the hidden symbol of terror,
the penis. The acts and the symbols meet up in all combinations, so that
terror is the outstanding theme and consequence of male history and male
culture, though it is smothered in euphemism, called glory or heroism.
Even when it is villainous, it is huge and awesome. Terror issues forth
from the male, illuminates his essential nature and his basic purpose.
He chooses how much to terrorize, whether terror will be a dalliance or
an obsession, whether he will use it brutally or subtly. But first,
there is the legend of terror, and this legend is cultivated by men with
sublime attention. In epics, dramas, tragedies, great books, slight
books, television, films, history both documented and invented, men are
giants who soak the earth in blood. Within the legend men have great
chances and are the carriers of values. Within the legend, women are
booty, along with gold and jewels and territory and raw materials. The
legend of male violence is the most celebrated legend of mankind and
from it emerges the character of man: he is dangerous. With the rise of
social Darwinism in the nineteenth century and now in the pseudoscience
of sociobiology, Man-the-Aggressor is at the apex of the evolutionary
struggle, king of the earth because he is the most aggressive, the
crudest. Male-supremacist biology, which now suffuses the social
sciences, is, in fact, an essential element in the modem legend of
terror that man spews forth celebrating himself: he is biologically
ordained (where before he was God's warrior) to terrorize women and
other creatures into submission and conformity. Failing that, terror
will fulfill its promise; the male will wipe out whatever terror does
not control. The third tenet of male-supremacist ideology, in a secular
society where biology has replaced God (and is used to buttress
anachronistic theology whenever necessary), is that men are biologically
aggressive, inherently combative, eternally antagonistic, genetically
cruel, hormonally prone to conflict, irredeemably hostile and warring.
For those who remain devout, God endowed man with what, by any standard,
must be considered a universally bad disposition, fortunately put to
good use in subduing women. The acts of terror, the symbols of terror,
and the legend of terror all spread terror. This terror is not a
psychological event as that phrase is commonly understood: it does not
originate in the mind of the one experiencing it, though it fiercely
resonates there. Instead, it is generated by cruel acts widely
sanctioned and encouraged. It is also generated by its own enduring
reputation, whether exquisite as in Homer, Genet, or Kafka; or fiendish
as in Hitler, the real Count Dracula, or Manson. Rotting meat smells;
violence produces terror. Men are dangerous; men are feared.

Fourth, men have the power of naming, a great and sublime power. This
power of naming enables men to define experience, to articulate
boundaries and values, to designate to each thing its realm and
qualities, to determine what can and cannot be expressed, to control
perception itself. As Mary Daly, who first isolated this power, wrote
in.. it is necessary to grasp
the fundamental fact that women have had the power of naming stolen from
us. "^1^ Male supremacy is fused into the language, so that every
sentence both heralds and affirms it. Thought, experienced primarily as
language, is permeated by the linguistic and perceptual values developed
expressly to subordinate women. Men have defined the parameters of every
subject. All feminist arguments, however radical in intent or
consequence, are with or against assertions or premises implicit in the
male system, which is made credible or authentic by the power of men to
name. No transcendence of the male system is possible as long as men
have the power of naming. Their names resonate wherever there is human
life. As Prometheus stole fire from the gods, so feminists will have to
steal the power of naming from men, hopefully to better effect. As with
fire when it belonged to the gods, the power of naming appears magical:
he gives the name, the name endures; she gives the name, the name is
lost. But this magic is illusion. The male power of naming is upheld by
force, pure and simple. On its own, without force to back it, measured
against reality, it is not power; it is process, a more humble thing.
"The old naming, " Mary Daly wrote, "was not the product of dialogue---a
fact inadvertently admitted in the Genesis story of Adam's naming the
animals and the woman. "^2^ It is the naming by decree that is power
over and against those who are forbidden to name their own experience;
it is the decree backed up by violence that writes the name indelibly in
blood in male-dominated culture. The male does not merely name women
evil; he exterminates nine million women as witches because he has named
women evil. He does not merely name women weak; he mutilates the female
body, binds it up so that it cannot move freely, uses it as toy or
ornament, keeps it caged and stunted because he has named women weak. He
says that the female wants to be raped; he rapes. She resists rape; he
must beat her, threaten her with death, forcibly carry her off, attack
her in the night, use knife or fist; and still he says she wants it,
they all do. She says no; he claims it means yes. He names her ignorant,
then forbids her education. He does not allow her to use her mind or
body rigorously, then names her intuitive and emotional. He defines
femininity and when she does not conform he names her deviant, sick,
beats her up, slices off her clitoris (repository of pathological
masculinity), tears out her womb (source of her personality),
lobotomizes or narcotizes her (perverse recognition that she can think,
though thinking in a woman is named deviant). He names antagonism and
violence, mixed in varying degrees, "sex"; he beats her and names it
variously "proof of love" (if she is wife) or "eroticism" (if she is
mistress). If she wants him sexually he names her slut; if she does not
want him he rapes her and says she does; if she would rather study or
paint he names her repressed and brags he can cure her pathological
interests with the apocryphal "good fuck. " He names her housewife, fit
only for the house, keeps her poor and utterly dependent, only to buy
her with his money should she leave the house and then he calls her
whore. He names her whatever suits him. He does what he wants and calls
it what he likes. He actively maintains the power of naming through
force and he justifies force through the power of naming. The world is
his because he has named everything in it, including her. She uses this
language against herself because it cannot be used any other way. The
fourth tenet of male supremacy is that men, because they are
intellectually and creatively existent, name things authentically.
Whatever contradicts or subverts male naming is defamed out of
existence; the power of naming itself, in the male system, is a form of
force.

Fifth, men have the power of owning. Historically, this power has been
absolute; denied to some men by other men in times of slavery and other
persecution, but in the main upheld by armed force and law. In many
parts of the world, the male right to own women and all that issues from
them (children and labor) is still absolute, and no human rights
considerations seem to apply to captive populations of women. In the
United States in the last 140 years, this right has been legally
modified, but the letter of the law, even where somewhat enlightened, is
not its spirit. Wife beating and marital rape, pervasive here as
elsewhere, are predicated on the conviction that a man's ownership of
his wife licenses whatever he wishes to do to her: her body belongs to
him to use for his own sexual release, to beat, to impregnate. The male
power of owning, by virtue of its historical centrality, is barely
constrained by the modest legal restrictions put on it. True: a married
woman in the United States today can own her own hairbrush and clothes,
as she could not through most of the nineteenth century; should she run
away from home, she is not likely to be hunted down like a runaway
slave, as she would have been through most of the nineteenth century,
nor will she be publicly flogged though in private she may still be
beaten for her effrontery. But the power of male owning, like all male
power, is not hindered by or confined to specifics. This power, like the
others, is bigger than any of its discrete manifestations. The fifth
tenet of male supremacy is the presumption that the male's right to own
the female and her issue is natural, predating history, postdating
progress. Whatever he does to effect or maintain ownership is also
natural; it is action originating in an ethic that is in no sense
relative. The power of owning comes from the power of self defined as
one who takes. Here the taking is elevated in significance: he takes, he
keeps; once he has had, it is his. This relationship between the self
that takes and ownership is precisely mirrored, for instance, in the
relationship between rape and marriage. Marriage as an institution
developed from rape as a practice. Rape, originally defined as
abduction, became marriage by capture. Marriage meant the taking was to
extend in time, to be not only use of but lifelong possession of, or
ownership.

Sixth, the power of money is a distinctly male power. Money speaks, but
it speaks with a male voice. In the hands of women, money stays literal;
count it out, it buys what it is worth or less. In the hands of men,
money buys women, sex, status, dignity, esteem, recognition, loyalty,
all manner of possibility. In the hands of men, money does not only buy;
it brings with it qualities, achievements, honor, respect. On every
economic level, the meaning of money is significantly different for men
than for women. Enough money, amassed by men, becomes clean even when it
is dirty. Women are cursed for succeeding relative to their peer group
of men. Poor women, in general, use money for the basic survival of
themselves and their children. Poor men, in general, use money to an
astonishing degree for pleasure. Rich women use money especially for
adornment so that they will be desirable to men: money does not free
them from the dicta of men. Rich men use money for pleasure and to make
money. Money in the hands of a man signifies worth and accomplishment;
in the hands of a woman, it is evidence of something foul, unwomanly
ambition or greed. The sixth tenet of male supremacy is that money
properly expresses masculinity. Men keep money for themselves. They dole
it out to women and children. Men keep the marketplace for themselves:
women earn less than men for doing equivalent work, despite the fact
that believes in equal pay for equal work;
working women with college degrees on the average earn less than men
with an eighth-grade education; job segregation and just plain exclusion
from the labor force, through outright discrimination in hiring and also
through forced pregnancy, keep women as a class poor, away from money as
such, unable to earn adequate amounts of money or to accumulate
it.

Money has an extreme sexual component. As Phyllis Chesler and Emily
Jane Goodman wrote in Money and
Power: "The male touch signifies economic dominance. "^3^ When
a poor man seduces or rapes a richer woman, his touch signifies economic
rebellion. Money is primary in the acquisition of sex and sex is primary
in the making of money: it is tied into every industry through
advertising (this car will bring you women, see that slinky thing draped
over the hood), or items are eroticized in and of themselves because of
what they cost. In the realm of money, sex and women are the same
commodity. Wealth of any kind, to any degree, is an expression of male
sexual power.

The sexual meaning of money is acted out by men on a wide scale, but it
is also internalized, applied to the interior functioning of male sexual
processes. Men are supposed to hoard sperm as they are supposed to hoard
money. A central religious imperative (in both Western and Eastern
religions) discourages expenditures of sperm not instrumental in
effecting impregnation, because wealth wasted instead of invested is
wealth lost. The phrase "spermatic economy" expressed this same idea in
the secular realm, particularly in the nineteenth century. The idea that
when a man spends sperm he uses up his most significant natural
resource---that he spills his sons into nonexistence---both precedes and
survives specific religious dogma and quasi-scientific theorizing. One
meaning of the verb is "to ejaculate. " One
meaning of the verb is "to conserve or
save"; its archaic meaning is "to plow for the purpose of growing crops.
" A husband, in this sense, is one who conserves or saves his sperm
except to fuck for the purpose of impregnating. In the male system,
control of money means sexual maturity, as does the ability to control
ejaculation. The valuing and conserving of money, using money to make
wealth---like the valuing and conserving of sperm, using sperm to make
wealth--- demonstrates a conformity to adult male values, both sexual
and economic. A boy spends his sperm and his money on women. A man uses
his sperm and his women to produce wealth. A boy spends; a man produces.
Spending indicates an immature valuing of immediate gratification.
Producing signifies an enduring commitment to self-control and to the
control of others, both crucial in the perpetuation of male supremacy.
The owning and impregnating of a woman in marriage or in some form of
concubinage (however informal) are seen as mastery of spending without
purpose, the first clear proof that masculinity is established as an
irrefutable fact, adult, impervious to the ambivalences of youth still
contaminated by female eroticism in which the penis has no intrinsic
significance. A commitment to money as such follows as an obvious and
public commitment to the display of masculinity as an aggressive and an
aggrandizing drive. While poor or deprived men struggle for money to
survive, all men, including poor or deprived men, struggle for money
because it expresses masculinity, power over and against women. Having
less money than a woman in one's field of perception is shameful: it
means that one has less masculinity than she. Other male powers, such as
the power of terror (violence) or the power of naming (defamation), must
be called on to compensate.

Seventh, men have the power of sex. They assert the opposite: that this
power resides in women, whom they view as synonymous with sex. The
carnality of women, even when experienced as monstrous, is held to be
the defining quality of women. Reduced to its most explicit and absurd
detail by its most sexually explicit proponents, the argument is that
women have sexual power because erection is involuntary; a woman is the
presumed cause; therefore, the man is helpless, the woman is powerful.
The male reacts to a stimulation for which he is not responsible; it is
his very nature to do so; whatever he does he does because of a
provocation that inheres in the female. Even on this most reductive
level---she causes penile erection, therefore she is sexually
powerful---the argument is willfully naive and self-serving. The male,
through each and every one of his institutions, forces the female to
conform to his supremely ridiculous definition of her as sexual object.
He fetishizes her body as a whole and in its parts. He exiles her from
every realm of expression outside the strictly male-defined sexual or
male-defined maternal. He forces her to become that thing that causes
erection, then holds himself helpless and powerless when he is aroused
by her. His fury when she is not that thing, when she is either more or
less than that thing, is intense and punishing.

More coherently defined---that is, defined outside the boundaries of
male experience---the power of sex manifested in action, attitude,
culture, and attribute is the exclusive province of the male, his
domain, inviolate and sacred. Sex, a word potentially so inclusive and
evocative, is whittled down by the male so that, in fact, it means
penile intromission. Commonly referred to as "it, " sex is defined in
action only by what the male does with his penis. Fucking---the penis
thrusting---is the magical, hidden meaning of "it, " the reason for sex,
the expansive experience through which the male realizes his sexual
power. In practice, fucking is an act of possession---simultaneously an
act of ownership, taking, force; it is conquering; it expresses in
intimacy power over and against, body to body, person to thing. "The sex
act" means penile intromission followed by penile thrusting, or fucking.
The woman is acted on; the man acts and through action expresses sexual
power, the power of masculinity. Fucking requires that the male act on
one who has less power and this valuation is so deep, so completely
implicit in the act, that the one who is fucked is stigmatized as
feminine during the act even when not anatomically female. In the male
system, sex is the penis, the penis is sexual power, its use in fucking
is manhood.

Male sexual power is also expressed through an attitude or quality:
virility. Defined first as manhood itself, virility in its secondary
meaning is vigor, dynamism (in the patriarchal dictionary inevitably
also called force). The vitality inherent in virility as a quality is
held to be an exclusive masculine expression of energy, in its basic
character sexual, in its origin biological, traceable to the penis
itself. It is, in fact, an expression of energy, strength, ambition, and
assertion. Defined by men and experienced by women as a form of male
sexual power, virility is a dimension of energy and self-realization
forbidden to women.

Male sexual power is the substance of culture. It resonates everywhere.
The celebration of rape in story, song, and science is the paradigmatic
articulation of male sexual power as a cultural absolute. The conquering
of the woman acted out in fucking, her possession, her use as a thing,
is the scenario endlessly repeated, with or without direct reference to
fucking, throughout the culture. In fucking, he is enlarged. As Woolf
wrote, she is his mirror; by diminishing her in his use of her he
becomes twice his size. In the culture, he is a giant, enlarged by his
conquest of her, implied or explicit. She remains his mirror and, as
Woolf postulated, ^44^\... mirrors are essential to all violent and
heroic action. "^4^ In culture, his sexual power is his theme. In
culture\* the male uses the female to explicate his theme.

Sexual power is also an attribute of the male, something that inheres
in him as a taker of what he wants and needs, especially as one who uses
his penis to take women, but more generally as a taker of land, of
money. As an attribute, his sexual power illuminates his very
nature.

The seventh tenet of male supremacy is that sexual power authentically
originates in the penis. Masculinity in action, narrowly in the act of
sex as men define it or more widely in any act of taking, is sexual
power fulfilling itself, being true to its own nature. The male conceit
that women have sexual power (cause erections) conveniently protects men
from responsibility for the consequences of their acts, especially their
acts of sexual conquest. Most of the time, after all, the used bodies do
survive. Often they speak or scream or cry. Nowadays the uppity things
even prosecute and sue. Ruthless blame---"you provoked me"---is used to
encourage the individual and social silence which is the most hospitable
environment for the continuation of conquest.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The major theme of pornography as a genre is male power, its
nature, its magnitude, its use, its meaning. Male power, as expressed in
and through pornography, is discernible in discrete but interwoven,
reinforcing strains: the power of self, physical power over and against
others, the power of terror, the power of naming, the power of owning,
the power of money, and the power of sex. These strains of male power
are intrinsic to both the substance and production of pornography; and
the ways and means of pornography are the ways and means of male power.
The harmony and coherence of hateful values, perceived by men as normal
and neutral values when applied to women, distinguish pornography as
message, thing, and experience. The strains of male power are embodied
in pornography's form and content, in economic control of and
distribution of wealth within the industry, in the picture or story as
thing, in the photographer or writer as aggressor, in the critic or
intellectual who through naming assigns value, in the actual use of
models, in the application of the material in what is called real life
(which women are commanded to regard as distinct from fantasy). A saber
penetrating a vagina is a weapon; so is the camera or pen that renders
it; so is the penis for which it substitutes
literally means "sheath"). The persons who produce the image are also
weapons as men deployed in war become in their persons weapons. Those
who defend or protect the image are, in this same sense, weapons. The
values in the pornographic work are also manifest in everything
surrounding the work. The valuation of women in pornography is a
secondary theme in that the degradation of women exists in order to
postulate, exercise, and celebrate male power. Male power, in degrading
women, is first concerned with itself, its perpetuation, expansion,
intensification, and elevation. In her essay on the Marquis de Sade,
Simone de Beauvoir describes Sade's sexuality as autistic. Her use of
the word is figurative, since an autistic child does not require an
object of violence outside of himself (most autistic children are male).
Male power expressed in pornography is autistic as de Beauvoir uses the
word in reference to Sade: it is violent and selfobsessed; no perception
of another being ever modifies its behavior or persuades it to abandon
violence as a form of self-pleasuring. Male power is the raison d'etre
of pornography; the degradation of the female is the means of achieving
this power.

The photograph is captioned "BEAVER HUNTERS." Two white men, dressed as
hunters, sit in a black Jeep. The Jeep occupies almost the whole frame
of the picture. The two men carry rifles. The rifles extend above the
frame of the photograph into the white space surrounding it. The men and
the Jeep face into the camera. Tied onto the hood of the black Jeep is a
white woman. She is tied with thick rope. She is spread-eagle. Her pubic
hair and crotch are the dead center of the car hood and the photograph.
Her head is turned to one side, tied down by rope that is pulled taut
across her neck, extended to and wrapped several times around her
wrists, tied around the rearview mirrors of the Jeep, brought back
around her arms, crisscrossed under her breasts and over her thighs,
drawn down and wrapped around the bumper of the Jeep, tied around her
ankles. Between her feet on the car bumper, in orange with black print,
is a sticker that reads: I brake for Billy Carter. The text under the
photograph reads: "Western sportsmen report beaver hunting was
particularly good throughout the Rocky Mountain region during the past
season. These two hunters easily bagged their limit in the high country.
They told HUSTLER that they stuffed and mounted their trophy as soon as
they got her home. "

The men in the photograph are self-possessed; that is, they possess the
power of self. This power radiates from the photograph. They are armed:
first, in the sense that they are fully clothed; second, because they
carry rifles, which are made more prominent, suggesting erection, by
extending outside the frame of the photograph; third, because they are
shielded by being inside the vehicle, framed by the windshield; fourth,
because only the top parts of their bodies are shown. The woman is
possessed; that is, she has no self. A captured animal, she is naked,
bound, exposed on the hood of the car outdoors, her features not
distinguishable because of the way her head is twisted and tied down.
The men sit, supremely still and confident, displaying the captured prey
for the camera. The stillness of the woman is like the stillness of
death, underlined by the evocation of taxidermy in the caption. He is,
he takes; she is not, she is taken.

The photograph celebrates the physical power of men over women. They
are hunters, use guns. They have captured and bound a woman. They will
stuff and mount her. She is a trophy. While one could argue that the
victory of two armed men over a woman is no evidence of physical
superiority, the argument is impossible as one experiences (or
remembers) the photograph. The superior strength of men is irrefutably
established by the fact of the photograph and the knowledge that one
brings to it: that it expresses an authentic and commonplace
relationship of the male strong to the female weak, wherein the
hunt---the targeting, tracking down, pursuing, the chase, the
overpowering of, the immobilizing of, even the wounding of---is common
practice, whether called sexual pursuit, seduction, or romance. The
photograph exists in an immediate context that supports the assertion of
this physical power; and in the society that is the larger context,
there is no viable and meaningful reality to contradict the physical
power of male over female expressed in the photograph.

In the photograph, the power of terror is basic. The men are hunters
with guns. Their prey is women. They have caught a woman and tied her
onto the hood of a car. The terror is implicit in the content of the
photograph, but beyond that the photograph strikes the female viewer
dumb with fear. One perceives that the bound woman must be in pain. The
very power to make the photograph (to use the model, to tie her in that
way) and the fact of the photograph (the fact that someone did use the
model, did tie her in that way, that the photograph is published in a
magazine and seen by millions of men who buy it specifically to see such
photographs) evoke fear in the female observer unless she entirely
dissociates herself from the photograph: refuses to believe or
understand that real persons posed for it, refuses to see the bound
person as a woman like herself. Terror is finally the content of the
photograph, and it is also its effect on the female observer. That men
have the power and desire to make, publish, and profit from the
photograph engenders fear. That millions more men enjoy the photograph
makes the fear palpable. That men who in general champion civil rights
defend the photograph without experiencing it as an assault on women
intensifies the fear, because if the horror of the photograph does not
resonate with these men, that horror is not validated as horror in male
culture, and women are left without apparent recourse. Rimbaud's
devastating verse comes to mind: "One evening I seated Beauty on my
knees. And I found her bitter. And I cursed her. / I armed myself
against justice. "^5^

The threat in the language accompanying the photograph is also fierce
and frightening. She is an animal, think of deer fleeing the hunter,
think of seals clubbed to death, think of species nearly extinct. The
men will stuff and mount her as a trophy: think of killing displayed
proudly as triumph.

Here is the power of naming. Here she is named beaver. In the. naming
she is diminished to the point of annihilation; her humanity is canceled
out. Instead of turning to the American Civil Liberties Union for help,
she should perhaps turn to a group that tries to prevent cruelty to
animals---beaver, bird, chick, bitch, dog, pussy, and so forth. The
words that transform her into an animal have permanence: the male has
done the naming. The power of naming includes the freedom to joke. The
hunters will brake for Billy Carter. The ridicule is not deadly; they
will let him live. The real target of the ridicule is the fool who
brakes for animals, here equated with women. The language on the bumper
sticker suggests the idea of the car in motion, which would otherwise be
lacking. The car becomes a weapon, a source of death, its actual
character as males use it. One is reminded of the animal run over on the
road, a haunting image of blood and death. One visualizes the car, with
the woman tied onto its hood, in motion crashing into something or
someone.

Owning is expressed in every aspect of the photograph. These hunters
are sportsmen, wealth suggested in hunting as a leisure-time pursuit of
pleasure. They are equipped and outfitted. Their car shines. They have
weapons: guns, a car. They have a woman, bound and powerless, to do with
as they like. They will stuff and mount her. Their possession of her
extends over time, even into (her) death. She is owned as a thing, a
trophy, or as something dead, a dead bird, a dead deer; she is dead
beaver. The camera and the photographer behind it also own the woman.
The camera uses and keeps her. The photographer uses her and keeps the
image of her. The publisher of the photograph can also claim her as a
trophy. He has already mounted her and put her on display. Hunting as a
sport suggests that these hunters have hunted before and will hunt
again, that each captured woman will be used and owned, stuffed and
mounted, that this right to own inheres in man's relationship to nature,
that this right to own is so natural and basic that it can be taken
entirely for granted, that is, expressed as play or sport.

Wealth is implicit in owning. The woman is likened to food (a dead
animal), the hunter's most immediate form of wealth. As a trophy, she is
wealth displayed. She is a commodity, part of the measure of male
wealth. Man as hunter owns the earth, the things of it, its natural
resources. She is part of the wildlife to be plundered for profit and
pleasure, collected, used. That they "bagged their limit, " then used
what they had caught, is congruent with the idea of economy as a sign of
mature masculinity.

The fact of the photograph signifies the wealth of men as a class. One
class simply does not so use another class unless that usage is
maintained in the distribution of wealth. The female model's job is the
job of one who is economically imperiled, a sign of economic
degradation. The relationship of the men to the woman in the photograph
is not fantasy; it is symbol, meaningful because it is rooted in
reality. The photograph shows a relationship of rich to poor that is
actual in the larger society. The fact of the photograph in relation to
its context---an industry that generates wealth by producing images of
women abjectly used, a society in which women cannot adequately earn
money because women are valued precisely as the woman in the photograph
is valued---both proves and perpetuates the real connection between
masculinity and wealth. The sexual-economic significance of the
photograph is so simple that it is easily overlooked: the photograph
could not exist as a type of photograph that produces wealth without the
wealth of men to produce and consume it.

Sex as power is the most explicit meaning of the photograph. The power
of sex unambiguously resides in the male, though the characterization of
the female as a wild animal suggests that the sexuality of the untamed
female is dangerous to men. But the triumph of the hunters is the nearly
universal triumph of men over women, a triumph ultimately expressed in
the stuffing and mounting. The hunters are figures of virility. Their
penises are hidden but their guns are emphasized. The car, beloved ally
of men in the larger culture, also indicates virility, especially when a
woman is tied to it naked instead of draped over it wearing an evening
gown. The pornographic image explicates the advertising image, and the
advertising image echoes the pornographic image.

The power of sex is ultimately defined as the power of conquest. They
hunted her down, captured, tied, stuffed, and mounted her. The
excitement is precisely in the nonconsensual character of the event. The
hunt, the ropes, the guns, show that anything done to her was or will be
done against her will. Here again, the valuation of conquest as being
natural---of nature, of man in nature, of natural man---is implicit in
the visual and linguistic imagery.

The power of sex, in male terms, is also funereal. Death permeates it.
The male erotic trinity---sex, violence, and death--- reigns supreme.
She will be or is dead. They did or will kill her. Everything that they
do to or with her is violence. Especially evocative is the phrase
"stuffed and mounted her, " suggesting as it does both sexual violation
and embalming.

Whip Chick, a book, has as its central conceit that power
defined as cruelty resides in the woman, especially the feminist woman.
Called variously "amazon" and "liberated woman, " she says "You male
chauvinist pig" as she grinds her spiked heels into his balls. She is as
dangerous as anyone can be, her malice directed at the genitals of the
male, which she threatens to tear off with her bare hands. She is a
fantasy, as opposed to a symbol: the power attributed to her nowhere
resonates in the real world.

In Whip Chick, Scott Healy, who has a big cock and is a
superstud, fucks Mrs. Alice Waverly in a motel. She thanks him. Alice
and Scott are seen at the motel by Cora Hertzell, a professor at a local
college. Alice is outraged that Cora, a teacher, is at the motel. She
determines to rid the town of Cora. Scott's nephew Chris has a crush on
Cora, his teacher. He thinks about how she moves like a stripper, then
he masturbates. He thinks he is too old to masturbate but his image in a
mirror seems to tell him that he cannot help it. Scott comes home and
makes a TV dinner. Sandra Waverly, Alice's daughter, telephones for
Chris. Sandra invites Chris to do what he will to her. Chris
says he is busy. Scott says: "The little faggot. " Scott talks Chris
into seeing Sandra. Sandra seduces Chris, who has a big cock. He goes
home and telephones her. She wants him to come back. He says that he
will only return if he is her master, if she will do anything he says:
"His dick was beginning to grow now. He felt the urge to ram it down her
throat. " He orders her to put the telephone receiver up her cunt and
use it to masturbate while she waits for him. Then he goes to her house
to check up on her. He rips her clothes and slaps her. He keeps hitting
her. She screams. Then she says: "Ooh master. Hurt me. Punish me. " She
also says: "I want my man to punish me. " She calls him Daddy. William,
Sandra's boyfriend, finds a letter Chris has written to Cora that
expresses adoration. Sandra suggests that Chris intercept William with
the letter before he can show it to Cora. Chris is grateful. Sandra ties
his hands, then his balls, then emerges in black stockings with a whip
and beats him. In a restaurant, Sandra's parents, Alice and Pete
Waverly, are having dinner. Alice wants Cora removed from teaching. Cora
is also in the restaurant. A bum brags about his masculinity. Cora picks
him up. Alice makes Pete follow Cora and the bum to get evidence against
Cora. Scott goes to speak with Alice, they argue about Cora, then Scott
begins fingering Alice under the table and Alice begins fingering Scott,
then they get into a car and start fucking. Cora jacks off the bum in
the car. Cora takes him to a motel. Cora is characterized as "the
amazon. " She holds him by the cock and makes him walk around the room
following her. He cannot get loose. She commands him to eat her. She
says: "This is all a man is good for. " She allows him to fuck her but
he fails so she starts crushing his balls until he becomes "happily
unconscious. " Leaving the motel Cora sees Pete Waverly. She seduces
him. He has a huge cock. They go back to her motel room. The bum is
taking a shower. Pete fucks Cora. She has the bum suck her ass, then her
cunt while Pete fucks her in the ass. After all have come, Cora orders
the bum to clean Pete's genitals. Pete refuses to allow it, Cora senses
repression and fear of an ultimate truth, Pete goes to take a shower,
Cora sends the bum in after him, sounds of lust and pleasure eventually
come from the shower. The next day, Chris fucks and is generally mauled
by Sandra on campus, then another liberated woman named Carol joins in.
Cora gets Chris's letter. She seduces him and insists that he ejaculate
in her vagina: "I want those seeds planted in me. " Carol follows Chris
home and seduces him. Carol, liberated woman that she is, tries to make
Chris lose his erection: "Her tone shifted to the pedantic style of the
liberated woman. ", He fucks her on the kitchen table and sticks a glass
saltshaker up her ass. The kitchen table collapses as they come. Scott
has seen the whole thing. He says to Chris: "That's the best way to
catch one of these liberated birds. You have to salt their tails. "
Scott is home alone. Sandra comes looking for Chris. Chris is at Cora's.
Sandra throws her arms around Scott and seduces him. She keeps calling
him "motherfucker, " since she knows that he has fucked her mother.
Chris is with Cora. She makes him undress. She sees the whip marks made
by Sandra. These marks reveal that he is not the young lion she had
thought so she keeps kicking him in the balls. She becomes his master.
Meanwhile as Scott and Sandra are fucking, Sandra's mother telephones
them. Everyone is to converge at Cora's house, even as Scott is using
his "mammoth probing pole! " Cora asks Chris: "Are you a man? " His
answer: "No! " He is "beside himself with lust and pain, and joy. " Cora
asks: "And are you mommy's little boy? " He answers: "Oh yes! Fuck me
mommy! Tear me up!! " In the midst of all this, Cora, speaking to Chris,
calls Scott a "loathsome chauvinist. " Cora keeps battering Chris's
penis with her leg. Cora sticks her fingers in his ear, her fist down
his throat, while saying: "I know what you're thinking and you are
right! Every hole, every nook and cranny. You are going to be fucked for
your disobedience! " She strangles his balls in her fist and keeps
slapping him across the face. She says: "Mommy's going to punish you
now. " She sticks a fountain pen up his ass, he falls to the floor, she
pushes the pen up his rectum with her foot, then she pushes her foot up
his ass. She says that she wants to see his uncle. The Waverlys arrive
at Cora's house. They say they are looking for Sandra. Cora begins
undressing. Alice says she put a drug in the water reservoir to cause
weird behavior and expose Cora for
what she is. Alice tells Cora
she has always loved her. Cora gets her dildo and fucks Alice. Alice is
afraid that the dildo is too big, then wants it in her ass. Pete
watches. Sandra and Scott enter. Cora rises and unfastens the dildo.
Sandra goes looking for Chris. Alice and Pete quarrel. Alice says she
did not put a drug in the water reservoir. She says that Pete raped her
on their wedding night and has been raping her for years, that all he
ever thinks about is sex. Alice says: "You big chauvinist pig! " Then
she straps on the dildo and fucks him in the ass. Pete and Alice agree
that now their marriage is as it should be. Scott and Cora, her hand
gently on his cock, no threat or possibility of threat in the gesture,
only the promise of service, enter the room and watch. They announce
that they are going to be married. Chris's screams of lust and pain,
interwoven with cries of "Sandra, oh Sandra, please Sandra, " fill the
room. Finis.

In, male power is characterized as
precarious at best, easily transformed into its opposite by women who
are more ambitious in their masculinity than the anatomical males. Scott
is the exception. His masculinity is so assured, so free of homosexual
taint, so thoroughly uncontaminated by any longing for the mother, that
he wins Cora's heart. Her quest has been for a real man, the ultimate
fucker whom she cannot dominate. Pete's final fate---to be fucked by his
wife in the ass with a dildo until death do them part--- is foreshadowed
by the homosexual pleasure he experienced with the bum Cora set upon him
in the motel. Similarly, Chris's fate is also foreshadowed by Scott's
description of him as "the little faggot. "

Whip Chick was supposedly written by a woman, a conceit
common enough in the kind of pornography that is written fast and sold
to a publisher for a flat fee. The easy money for the author is in
turning out the largest possible number of books in the shortest
possible time. All the books produced by a single author may be
published under different names. In general, arguments about the real
gender of authors of pornography---from
to---are meaningless, since the goal is
to please the male consumer whose tastes are entirely predictable,
existing as they do within the limited framework of male
sexual values and ideas. Anais Nin tried to conform to the rules of the
pornography-for-fast-money game, but dripped sensibility helplessly and
foolishly. Most writers of pornography are male. The female name on the
cover of the book is part of the package, an element of the fiction. It
confirms men in their fantasy that the eroticism of the female exists
within the bounds of male sexual
imperatives.

How is male power served by One would
think that most of the sexual action in
would be abhorrent to men who presumably have everything to lose and
nothing to gain by the portrayal of a woman driving her spiked heel into
a man's balls as being pleasurable for both male and female. But the
resources of male power need not be thoroughly obvious to be
effective.

First of all, is not believable. The
prose, the story, the action, the dialogue, all are absurd and
ridiculous. The portrayal of men as sexual victims is distinctly unreal,
ludicrous in part because it scarcely has an analogue in the real world.
The woman tied on the hood of the car had a symbolic reality: that
valuation of women is commonplace. is
male fantasy, not rooted in reality, not rooted in the distribution of
power as a social fact.

Second, the men in are punished by women
for failures of masculinity: for being faggots or boys who want Mommy.
Any loss of control by men over women will result in the loss of
everything, all the kinds of male power that men should and must have.
The dangerous female, now called an amazon or liberated woman, is ever
present, ready to take over if the male lets up in his cruelty at all.
Should the purity of his fuck---its absolute masculine integrity---be
less than perfect, the bitch underneath will become castrator. A moment
of immaturity, indecision, or gratitude (as when Chris thanks Sandra for
suggesting that he intercept his letter to Cora before it reaches her)
will mean total and absolute humiliation, not to mention penile
mutilation.

Third, all the sexual action takes place in the realm of male-defined
sexuality. Cruelty is the essence of sexual action; fucking is the most
significant masculine act; the penis is the source and symbol of real
manhood; punishment is the prerogative of the man unless he loses that
prerogative by failing, in which case the female, as the most masculine,
usurps the prerogative; force is integral to fucking; and dominance is
the ultimate purpose of sexual behavior. These are the values embodied
in. This is the house that Jack
built.

Fourth, warns specifically that the
feminist wants to castrate the male, use his sexuality as her own
against him. It warns that if men do not keep male power sacrosanct, the
dangerous, uppity women will take it from them and use it against them.
It postulates that women will do to men what men have done to women.
This presentation of women as vicious castrators if given the chance
suggests that men's only protection is an unambiguous commitment on the
part of men to sexual conquest of women.

Fifth, if men do experience guilt over what they do to women, the
specter of women punishing them in ways they can understand, given their
limited frame of reference, might provide some release from guilt with
no loss of self-esteem (since the book is ludicrous in its style and
since a man, Scott, triumphs over the amazon in the end).

Sixth, postulates that all any woman
really wants--- however shrewish or dangerous she is---is a man who can
fuck or dominate her. Any bitch can be tamed by a man who is manly
enough.

The ultimate impact of is to clarify the
nature of male power and demonstrate how to hold onto it. In fantasy,
the male can experiment with the consequences as he imagines them of
loss of power over women. He can expect that what he has done to women
will be done to him. He can view his own devastation in his imagination,
experience it as a self-induced, self-contained, masturbatory sexual
reality and, when the book is closed, as a result of having read it, be
armed more thoroughly against any vulnerability that might imperil him.
He will be convinced that male power can only be maintained by an
absolutely cruel and ruthless subjugation of women. And not
coincidentally, "liberated women, " "amazons, " will be the most
dangerous women, most in need of subjugation, the greatest and best test
of masculinity in action. targets
feminists as the subgroup of women most threatening to male power, most
in need of abusive, humiliating sexual treatment. Whip
Chick---spiked heel in the groin notwithstanding---is a
cunning and effective argument for male dominance.

I Love a Laddie, a book, consists of three short vignettes
and a preface by a man whose name is followed by "M. A., " which one can
only presume means Master of Arts. This person's introduction warns that
"the constant practice of sexually perverse acts may very well lead to
the point where an undesirable practice may become completely habitual
in one body and mind. Awareness of the wide
extent of sexual perversion and its pitfalls should be helpful in
stopping these wrges\... " Informed that one
is being educated against vice, one is prepared to begin enjoying
it.

In the first vignette, Dave the sailor is going on leave to London to
have a ball. "Cunt desires" are raging. He has half a hard-on. When he
leaves the train, all the porters ignore him because he is big and
strong, except for one effeminate porter whose offer to carry Dave's bag
had "a sort of carressing solicitude\... "
It was "like an invitation from a girl to slip into her pussy! " Dave
has half a hard-on. A cabbie, assuming that Dave's inclinations are the
same as the porter's, takes him to a hotel where the manager has a voice
like the porter's. The manager hands him a pen with a caressing motion.
Dave realizes that his leave will be a "feast of 'navy-cake'" and claims
that "one hole \is\ as good as another! " Dave undresses and admires
himself and his hard prick in the mirror. Dave takes a bath. The carpet
in his room reminds him of a man he slept with in India. His prick
hardens and this time swells to "a deep, shiny red! " Dave masturbates
on the carpet. Dave puts on his only suit. The manager offers to iron
it. Dave takes off his only suit. Garry, the manager, makes subtle
advances. Dave determines to "give him all the cock he could cope with"
but only when Garry makes the first move. Garry brings in liquor and
glasses. They undress. Soon "Dave's finger was throughly
\sic\ raping \Garry's\ asshole. " Dave fucks Garry who is
called his victim. Garry comes, but remains "complacent to any whim of
his master. " Dave moves his victim to the carpet where he pinions him
spread-eagle. Garry "shuddered and quiverred
under the frantic assult on his prone body.
" Dave goes cruising in bars. He is excited by women in miniskirts. A
middle-aged man tries to pick him up. He walks out. Someone follows him,
a young hustler; Dave is insulted. Dave returns to the hotel, where the
key to Garry's room, number 69, and a jar of Vaseline await him. Garry
is dressed in a negligee. They bathe together, then go to Garry's
seven-by-seven bed, which is dressed in satin. Dave fucks Garry. Garry
sucks Dave. Next morning, Dave goes to a tailor recommended by Garry.
Then he goes to a bar where he meets Harry, the middle-aged man who
tried to pick him up the previous night. They go to a strip place
(female strippers). Dave gets a hard-on. Harry jerks him off. Dave
returns to the hotel. Garry fucks Dave. Dave comes. Garry keeps fucking.
Dave discovers new dimensions of himself as "the intensity of the
thrusts up into his rectum, and their violence was
\sic\ increasing every second and with every
forwards drive of the other man's
hip and loins! " They go to Garry's room.
They look at each other. Dave sucks Garry's cock. Garry places Dave on
his back "like a girl" and fucks him. Dave returns to his own room, his
rectum sore, and takes a bath. He goes back to the bars, ends up in a
homosexual bar, finds a young innocent from out of town, goes to the
young innocent's room. Dave tells the boy about all kinds of girls and
the "bizare \sic\ things that he had seen them do. " Innocent boy gets
a hard-on. They jerk each other off, then Dave fucks him, despite his
cries of pain, which change to cries of lust. Dave returns to the hotel
and sleeps. Garry brings breakfast. Dave tells him about having
initiated a virgin the previous night. Garry fucks Dave. Dave goes to
the tailor, then to a bar. A stranger offers to take him to a homosexual
club. The hustler who had tried to pick him up previously is there. He
offers Dave money to fuck him in front of three lesbians looking for
kicks. Dave accepts. Dave fucks the young man. When he looks up, he is
surrounded by "women and grils with their
clothes hiked up and panties down around their nylon clad knees, with
fingers all busily fingerfucking away at another female's cunt. " The
hustler is instructed by the lesbians to let the sperm from his ass
trickle into a glass dish so they can inspect it. The lesbians "were
tearing off each others panties to turn and
clasp heads diving in between parted thighs for a female '69'! " Dave
gets paid the promised amount plus a bonus. Finis.

In the second vignette, Paul is over forty and wealthy. He uses his
money to pursue his favorite pleasure, assfucking young men. He dislikes
women and avoids male hustlers. He uses his wealth to encourage younger
boys to take up his own preferences. Paul waits for Bob, a new boy. Bob
arrives. Bob tells Paul how he and a younger boy, Robin, had found
photographs of "girls in nothing buth their
undies and stockings" and had hidden to "oggle\sic\\" the photographs
and, as a result, had jerked each other off. Paul shows Bob both
heterosexual and homosexual pornography. Paul sucks off Bob. Bob sucks
off Paul. Bob looks at more pornography, especially of a male assfucking
a woman and of a man assfucking a man. Bob says: "Ooooh! I never
realized what thrills there were, Paul! Can we try that too! " Paul
invites Bob to spend school vacation on his boat. Bob suggests inviting
Robin too. Bob asks to try it now "like they were in those pictures. "
Bob's response to being fucked is: "Ahh! It huts
\sic\ a bit! But it's lovely! Go on! Ram it up me! Split
me! Fuck me! " Bob is referred to as Paul's victim, and the act is
described as "just as he had seen it in the picture--- with the girl and
the boy! " After Bob leaves, Paul contemplates the pleasure in having
two sex slaves. He decides to photograph it. Bob and Robin arrive at
Paul's house. Paul enters the room as Bob and Robin are making love.
Paul takes a photograph. They go to the boat. Bob shows Robin the
pornographic photographs. When Robin sees the assfucking, he sucks Bob's
cock. Paul, from a skylight above, takes photographs. Paul calls to Bob,
instructs him to do sixty-nine. Paul masturbates as he watches Bob and
Robin and also steers the boat. All come. Bob steers the boat. Paul,
Robin, and Bob have tea. They arrive at an island. The boys cook dinner.
They are naked with hard-ons. Paul takes photographs. All eat nude. Paul
fucks Bob and sucks Robin's cock, puts his finger up Robin's ass. Robin
looks at the photographs again. Bob looks at the photographs again. Paul
takes a photograph. They go to sleep. Paul makes breakfast. Bob does the
dishes. Paul pretends that he is going to spank Robin, but instead
greases his ass. Paul fucks Robin as Bob watches. Paul continues fucking
Robin as Bob fucks Paul. Robin and Bob mutually jerk off. Paul takes a
photograph. They visit the island. The two boys seduce Paul. Paul falls
asleep. As a prank, the boys take his clothes. He swims back to the
boat. How will he wreak vengeance? He orders the boys to undress, whips
them, forces them to swim so that salt gets into the whip cuts. Bob
fucks Robin. Paul takes a photograph. Robin sucks off Paul. The next
day, two girls arrive in a boat. The males move away. The girls lie
naked on the beach. Paul concludes that they think the island is
deserted. From their posture, it is obvious that they have been
"indulging in some form of fucking. " Paul develops his photographs. He
joins the boys on the deck. The three watch the women in "a Lesbian '69.
'" As they watch the women, Paul jerks off both boys. They agree when
Paul says: "I still think that having cocks to play with, we have the
advantage when it comes to fucking! " Paul fucks Bob and Robin. Robin is
fucked "as a girl might be. " Paul goes for a walk. He threatens to whip
the boys if there is a drop of sperm on them when he returns. He watches
the lesbians. Their asses getting tan from the sun reminds him that he
wants to tan the asses of "these females that had invaded his masculine
kingdom! " He asks them what they are doing, takes off his leather belt
and beats them. He returns to the boat. Bob is sucking Robin. Paul takes
a photograph. The males leave the island. They spot the boat of the
lesbians. Paul is gratified that both are standing, too sore he assumes
to sit, which leads the males to speculate on "female assholes to be
fucked" during the rest of their holiday. Finis.

In the third vignette, it is Saturday and Jules Auger is at the helm of
his boat. Narrator and Jules return to their bedroom, where Narrator
fucks Jules. They sleep. Narrator showers. Storm joins him in the shower
and sucks his cock. Narrator sucks Storm's cock. Narrator goes to Gordon
for the night, then crawls into bed with Jules. On Sunday, everything is
the same, except that Patrick joins Narrator in the shower. On Monday,
they dock and go to the studio. Narrator wonders whether he will ever be
able to leave the homosexual life, "be normal with a woman and marry and
have children. " Narrator resolves to stay homosexual only long enough
to become a successful actor. Narrator thinks about Mary. He can't
believe that she is a lesbian. She is "too normal for that. " He wants
to fuck her. He has to escape from Jules Auger to make love to Mary
Moray. Jules calls Narrator into the projection room. Narrator's name is
Rod. Gordon, Patrick, and Storm are there. Jules fondles Rod's genitals.
Rod is very good in the rushes, very manly. He only has to pretend to be
homosexual a few more years to get to the top. Rod thinks of Mary as he
agrees to have a sex binge with the boys. In a cafeteria Rod glimpses
Mary and gets hot. The men go to Jules's home in Palm Springs. They all
disrobe on the way to the pool, this time including "the young colored
chauffer who is "hotter than any woman you
ever had and he's got twice as much as most men. " The chauffeur,
George, makes love to Rod. Rod makes love to George. Rod is on fire.
They do sixty-nine. George declares his love. Rod says that George is
more thrilling than the "shapely, desirable young cunts \that\ had
thrilled my prick in the past. " Gordon sucks Storm. Jules and Patrick
rest. George leaves. Gordon fucks Storm. Rod sleeps. Jules wakes Rod to
take him to bed. Rod fucks Jules. Rod showers. Rod is nauseated by
homosexual love. Rod moves to a penthouse paid for by Jules. He wants
Mary Moray's twat. Gordon warns Rod not to eye Mary. If Jules finds out
that any of his lovers fuck a woman, they are blackballed as actors. Rod
agrees to do what Jules wants. Then he accidentally runs into Mary. She
suggests they spend the weekend together. They go to his place. She
says: "Sometimes I think all man are a
little bit queer. " She says: "I want you to be my fucker. And I don't
let many men have me that way. " He carries her to the bedroom just as
Jules enters the apartment. Jules says he has bought and paid for Rod.
Mary cries. Jules fires Mary. Mary stumbles out the door in tears. Rod
undresses. He wants to subject Jules to pain like he's never known. Rod
beats Jules with a leather belt. Rod sucks his cock. Rod fucks him as
painfully as he can: "Jules was just like any other bitch I'd fucked in
the ass in my time\.... I was the male stud and Jules was my woman. "
Rod thinks of Mary. Rod thinks he has killed Jules. Jules comes to,
babbling that he is in heaven. Jules is in love with Rod. Rod says:
"You're my femme aren't you baby? You'll trot over and flopp
\sic\ for me anytime I whistle, won't you? " Rod tells
Jules he is going to fuck Mary. Jules says he will have her killed. Mary
disappears. Rod has to find her to overcome "the stigma of being an
active homosexual. " Rod is invited to a party on Jules's boat. The men
explain that Jules has a new boy, Darien. Rod announces that he will not
go to the party. Jules telephones, they argue, Jules claims that the new
boy means nothing, says he loves Rod. Rod says that he wants to fuck a
woman in Jules's presence. Jules says that he will have any woman killed
whom Rod fucks. Rod finds out where Mary is through her heterosexual
friend, Larry. Larry stays in Rod's apartment. Rod goes to find Mary.
Some men, hired by Jules to kidnap Rod and take him to Jules's party,
kidnap Larry instead. Rod thinks this is funny as he sees the men coming
and learns their purpose. Rod finds Mary. They go to a motel. Mary
confesses to lesbian experiences. He sucks her. She sucks him. They go
to fuck, but he is soft, limp. Mary does everything she can to arouse
him, but nothing works. Then he thinks of Jules and goes mad with
desire. He imagines that she is Jules as she sucks his cock. He forces
her to swallow the sperm. She gags and curses. They drive home in
silence. She apologizes to him. He wants to see her again. She is
grateful. They agree to meet in one week. Rod returns to his penthouse,
but hears Jules and friends inside so goes elsewhere. He goes to Andy
and George the chauffeur. They undress. Andy fucks Rod. Rod sucks
George. Andy sucks Rod. For Rod, they are better than any woman. Jules
thinks Rod was with a woman. Rod is ostracized at work. He lets it be
known that he was with two men to appease Jules. Rod goes home. Larry is
there with an erection. Larry, the heterosexual, says that Jules and his
cohorts gang-raped him. After two days he started to like it. He
discovered that he had always been queer. He beats up Rod for setting
him up. He keeps hitting him. He beats him with a belt. Rod knows Larry
wants him. He wants Larry. Rod sucks Larry's cock. Rod loves Larry.
They sleep. Rod wakes to find Larry assfucking him. They
shower. They blackmail Jules with threats of kidnapping charges and
announce that they are a team. On the way out of Jules's office, Rod
pinches the nipples of the secretary. She screams. Rod and Larry howl
with laughter. Larry was "the aggressor, the male member of our union. "
Rod was "proud to be his femme. " At a cast party, Mary enters. Rod and
Mary take a walk to his trailer. Mary undresses. He wants her. She wants
him. But again, he is soft, limp. He falls asleep. Suddenly Larry and
Mary are making love. Larry says he likes women after all. Mary says
that she made Larry a man again and is sorry she had not been able to
help Rod. Larry and Mary announce they will marry. Rod feels nothing for
either of them. He is already thinking of "a young Negro lad\... He
wanted to fuck me. That was all that mattered. " Rod admits "the truth.
" He is homosexual. He "could only be happy loving men and being loved
by them. Who could ask for more? "
Finis.

Throughout, the literal expression
of male power is in the intense, repeated use of the penis, which here
resembles the mythical Hydra. The penis is central, whatever the act or
environment. Degree of hardness and frequency of use signify penile
virility, nearly unlimited in the sexual scenarios described. The men in
themselves or relative to each other are vehicles for the penis. The
penis is the central character in each story. The emphasis is not so
much on who does what to whom as it is on the perpetual motion of the
penis, its efficacy in producing pleasure for its proud carrier and
receiver. In the second vignette, Paul, the wealthy middle-aged man with
the two boys, whose penile virility is established beyond doubt, also
uses a camera as if it were a penis. The camera becomes part of the
sexual action. The camera is not a substitute for the penis; rather, it
is as if he had two. He chooses which penis to use. Taking a photograph
becomes a form of sexual action in itself, equal in significance to
fucking or cocksucking, more mature in that in producing a collection of
photographs, it produces wealth.

The penis causes pain, but the pain enhances the pleasure. It is as if
the ability of the penis to cause pain were an intrinsic quality
of the penis, not a use to which the penis is put. The pain
also authenticates the power of the penis---its size, the force behind
it. As a result, fucking is inherently sadistic because it is
necessarily both pain and pleasure; and when penile pain is supplemented
by purposeful cruelty, it occasions the highest sexual ecstasy,
emotional love, or both. The pain is experienced as a commitment on the
part of the one fucking to the one being fucked. The degree of pain is
equivalent to the degree of love coming from the lover to the beloved of
the moment. But in no sense is the beloved annihilated. His virility
continues to animate his own behavior, either in relation to others or
in the sphere of social power. Even Rod's commitment to be Larry's
"femme" is articulated as an act of will on his part. This will is
distinctly masculine. Rod, who is, after all, named Rod, continues to
embody on the screen manly virility, and his social power in his career
increases. His recognition of his homosexuality---characterized by his
thoughts about the future lover who wants to fuck him---does not place
homosexuality per se in the area of the feminine, despite his endless
ruminations on becoming a real man by fucking Mary and his repeated
failures to do so (she is, after all, named Mary). His aggressive
pursuit of sex retains its masculine character, and his virility---the
energy of his penis---is never questionable. What he accomplishes in his
recognition of himself as homosexual is to discard the female
altogether, to change his frame of reference so that females no longer
figure in at all. Mary's claim to have made Larry a man again is
transparently ridiculous, since the heterosexual Larry (before he was
gang-raped) was markedly (even in this context) dull and stupid. His
virility was expressed vividly only in his sexual relationship to Rod.
In fact, within the context of the vignette, Larry's alliance with Mary
unmans him, since sex with a woman is shown to be rather pale and silly:
less cock is involved in it. Mary's lesbianism contributes to the
impression that Larry has been caught by someone who will make him less
masculine, take him away from the penis, which is manhood. Moray, her
last name, also names numerous kinds of savage, voracious eels: the
vagina dentata castrates, as does the
lesbian.

Lesbians are in each vignette. In the first, Dave fucks the hustler for
pay to amuse a group of grotesque lesbians. In the second, Paul beats
the two lesbians who invade his masculine territory; and it is on
sighting their boat at the end that he and the boys begin to contemplate
fucking "female assholes. " In the third, Mary is first called a lesbian
by Larry, in his first heterosexual incarnation, because she would not
allow him to fuck her in a past encounter. She admits her lesbian
experiences to Rod and also tells him that she does not often allow a
man to fuck her. Throughout, claims are made, explicitly and by
inference, for the superiority of male-male sex, and it is no
exaggeration to say that a particular hatred of lesbians is very notable
in all three vignettes. Lesbians are characterized as manipulators and
controllers of men, invaders of male domain, or dangerous adversaries
who can take a man from a man if so disposed.

Women in general are sources of sexual arousal within the vignettes
and, apparently, for the reader as well. Within the vignettes, the
heterosexual use of women is invoked to seduce boys; the heterosexual
presence of women (women turned out to please men) is titillating; the
epithets used to name women are sexual in nature, insulting, degrading,
violent, utterly contemptuous. Garry, the manager of the hotel, wears a
negligee, but this does not make him feminine---his penile strength is
endlessly celebrated; rather, the negligee evokes the feminine in the
mind of the reader. This evocation of the feminine is constantly
exploited to emphasize by contrast the extreme masculinity of the men
who worship cock. None of the men is really portrayed as feminine,
despite occasional disdainful references to mannerisms or descriptions
of a male being fucked "like a girl. " Without the presence of the
female, masculinity cannot be realized, even among men who exclusively
want each other; so the female is conjured up, not just to haunt or
threaten, but to confirm the real superiority of the male in the mind of
the reader. In an interview in the Gay Community
News, gay activist and writer Allen Young described and
interpreted a photograph that has, as part of its composition, this same
sort of heterosexual reference:

> For example, \in gay male pornography\ I've seen pictures of a guy
> jacking off to an issue of in other
> words, a guy is looking at a naked woman and jacking off and I as a
> gay man am supposed to look at the picture and feel more excited
> looking at that boy because he's straight. The message is that a
> straight man is more desirable than a faggot. Obviously this is a put
> down to the gay man. ^6^

The excitement is supposed to come, in fact, from the visual reminder
of male superiority to women in which homosexual men participate.
Without that wider frame of reference, masculinity is essentially
meaningless. The feminine or references to women in male homosexual
pornography clarify for the male that the significance of the penis
cannot be compromised, no matter what words are used to describe his
(temporary) position or state of mind. The evocation of femininity or
the presence of women is in itself a part of the sexual excitement
because superiority means power and in male terms power is sexually
exciting. In pornography, the homosexual male, like the heterosexual
male, is encouraged to experience and enjoy his sexual superiority over
women.

In, the seduction of boys, the
enlarged genitalia of a black male who is in a servile social position,
and wealth as a sign of mature masculinity complete a portrait of male
power that is imperializing in its motivation, attuned to the nuances of
dominance in its implicit values, rooted in the hierarchical absolutes
of male-over-male power within the larger culture.

The photograph shows two women in an elegant living room. Both women
have cream-colored skin, taut and flawless. The room is cream colored:
carpeting, sofa, table, walls. The furniture is taut in design: very
modern and simple. One woman, blond-haired, lies on the sofa, her ass
raised on the arm of the sofa, her legs bent back toward her stomach,
the spread of her legs shown by the distance between her feet poised in
the air. She is wearing a garter belt, nylon stockings that stop a few
inches above her knees, and spiked heels the same color as her hair. Her
eyes are closed, her eye shadow is dark gray. Her mouth is slightly
open, her lips are distinctly pinkish. One of her hands disappears
between her legs; the other, emerging from a hidden arm, seems to be
fondling her own breast, which is not visible because one sees the
profile of the breast closest to the camera. The most prominent part of
her body is her buttock, raised, highlighted by the intensity of the
light on it. The rest of her ass, even in profile, is obscured by the
head of the second woman. The second woman is on her knees beside the
sofa arm, her features indistinguishable, her mouth apparently kissing
the first woman's exposed buttock, but in fact her face is merely
profiled Against the woman's raised buttock. The second woman is
perpendicular to the reclining woman, so that her ass, fully exposed,
directly faces the camera. She is wearing a cream-colored robe which is
draped across her back and falls to one side to highlight her naked ass.
Her legs are spread. Pubic hair shows underneath. She is wearing spiked
heels the same color as her hair, dark brown. The light is concentrated
on the ass of the woman on her knees.

In the photograph, all visual significance is given to the ass of the
woman on her knees, which is in the foreground, exaggerated by the light
markedly on it, and to its echo, the raised buttock of the woman
reclining. The camera is the penile presence, the viewer is the male who
participates in the sexual action, which is not within the photograph
but in the perception of it. The photograph does not document lesbian
lovemaking; in fact, it barely resembles it. The symbolic reality of the
photograph---which is vivid---is not in the relationship between the two
women, which not only does not provoke but actually prohibits any
recognition of lesbian eroticism as authentic or even existent. The
symbolic reality instead is expressed in the posture of women exposed
purposefully to excite a male viewer. The ass is exposed and vulnerable;
the camera has taken it; the viewer can claim it. The spiked heels
suggest cruelty, associated with the lesbian, the quintessential
castrator. At the same time, the spiked heels suggest a slavish
conformity to male-dictated fashion, a crippling of the female, binding
of the feet, which is underlined in the long and languid accompanying
text by the declaration that neither woman has ever before made love
with a woman (so this is just for you, dear boy) and the assurance that
men are magnificent. The exposed ass is an emblem for the values in the
photograph as a whole. The contact between the women does not exclude
the male; it explicitly invites him. The woman on her knees, legs spread
open, conjures up the propitiating, submissive gesture of the animal who
takes the same stance (ethologists take note: without the spiked heels)
allegedly to appease an aggressive male. The photograph is the ultimate
tribute to male power: the male is not in the room, yet the women are
there for his pleasure. His wealth produces the photograph; his wealth
consumes the photograph; he produces and consumes the women. The male
defines and controls the idea of the lesbian in the composition of the
photograph. In viewing it, he possesses her. The lesbian is
colonialized, reduced to a variant of woman-as-sex-object, used to
demonstrate and prove that male power pervades and invades even the
private sanctuary of women with each other. The power of the male is
affirmed as omnipresent and controlling even when the male himself is
absent and invisible. This is divine power, the power of divine right to
divine pleasure, that pleasure accurately described as the sexual
debasing of others inferior by birth. In private, the women are posed
for display. In private, the women still sexually service the male, for
whose pleasure they are called into existence. The pleasure of the male
requires the annihilation of women's sexual integrity. There is no
privacy, no closed door, no self-determined meaning, for women with each
other in the world of pornography.



2

Men and Boys

> Just so docs Miller return us to the first question of humanism.
> What, finally, is a Man?

Norman Mailer, Genius and Lust: A
Journey Through the Major Writings of Henry Miller

With a disgust common to all feminists who have tried to be
participants in the so-called humanism of men, only to discover through
bitter experience that the culture of males does not allow honest female
participation, Virginia Woolf wrote: "I detest the masculine point of
view. I am bored by his heroism, virtue, and honour. I think the best
these men can do is not to talk about themselves anymore. "^1^ Men have
claimed the human point of view; they author it; they own it. Men are
humanists, humans, humanism. Men are rapists, batterers, plunderers,
killers; these same men are religious prophets, poets, heroes, figures
of romance, adventure, accomplishment, figures ennobled by tragedy and
defeat. Men have claimed the earth, called it Her. Men ruin Her. Men
have airplanes, guns, bombs, poisonous gases, weapons so perverse and
deadly that they defy any authentically human imagination. Men battle
each other and Her; women battle to be let into the category "human" in
imagination and reality. Men battle to keep the category "human" narrow,
circumscribed by their own values and activities; women battle to change
the meaning that men have given the word, to transform its meaning by
suffusing it with female experience.

Boys are birthed and raised by women. At some point, boys become men,
dim their vision to exclude women.

All children view things as animate. As Jean Piaget's work in
developmental psychology has shown, children hear the wind whisper and
the trees cry. As Bruno Bettelheim expresses it: "To the child, there is
no clear line separating objects from living things; and whatever has
life has life very much like our own. "^2^ But adult men treat women,
and often girls, and sometimes other males, as objects. Adult men are
convinced and sincere in their perception of adult women in particular
as objects. This perception of women transcends categories of sexual
orientation, political philosophy, nationality, class, race, and so
forth. How does it happen that the male child whose sense of life is so
vivid that he imparts humanity to sun and stone changes into the adult
male who cannot grant or even imagine the common humanity of
women?

In, Shulamith Firestone shows
that the boy has a choice: remain loyal to the mother who is in reality
degraded, without authority against the father, unable to protect the
child from the father's violence or the violence of other adult men, or
become a man, one who has the power and the right to hurt, to use force,
to use his will and physical strength over and against women and
children. Be the mother---do the housework---or be the father---carry a
big stick. Be the mother---be fucked---or be the father---do the
fucking. The boy has a choice. The boy chooses to become a man because
it is better to be a man than a woman.

Becoming a man requires that the boy learn to be indifferent to the
fate of women. Indifference requires that the boy learn to experience
women as objects. The poet, the mystic, the prophet, the so-called
sensitive man of any stripe, will still hear the wind whisper and the
trees cry. But to him, women will be mute. He will have learned to be
deaf to the sounds, sighs, whispers, screams of women in order to ally
himself with other men in the hope that they will not treat him as a
child, that is, as one who belongs with the women.

A boy, or his mother, is threatened, hit, or molested. A boy
experiences male force as its victim or as a witness. This nearly
universal event is described by John Stoltenberg is an essay, "Eroticism
and Violence in the Father-Son Relationship":

> The boy will be a witness as the father abuses his wife---once or a
> hundred times, it only needs to happen once, and the boy will be
> tilled with fear and helpless to intercede. Then the father will visit
> his anger upon the boy himself, uncontrollable rage, wrath that seems
> to come from nowhere, punishment out of proportion to any infraction
> of rules the boy knew existed--- once or a hundred times, it only
> needs to happen once, and the boy will wonder in agony why the mother
> did not prevent it. From that point onward, the boy's trust in the
> mother decays, and the son will belong to the father for the rest of
> his natural life. ^1^

The boy seeks to emulate the father because it is safer to be like the
father than like the mother. He learns to threaten or hit because men
can and men must. He dissociates himself from the powerlessness he did
experience, the powerlessness to which females as a class are consigned.
The boy becomes a man by taking on the behaviors of men---to the best of
his ability.

The boy escapes, into manhood, into power. It is his option, based on
the social valuation of his anatomy. This route of escape is the only
one now charted.

But the boy remembers, he always remembers, that once he was a child,
close to women in powerlessness, in potential or actual humiliation, in
danger from male aggression. The boy must build up a male identity, a
fortressed castle with an impenetrable moat, so that he is inaccessible,
so that he is invulnerable to the memory of his origins, to the
sorrowful or enraged calls of the women he left behind. The boy,
whatever his chosen style, turns martial in his masculinity, fierce,
stubborn, rigid, humorless. His fear of men turns into aggression
against women. He keeps the distance between himself and women
unbridgeable, transforms women into the dreaded She, or, as Simone de
Beauvoir expresses it, "the Other. " He learns to be a man---poet man,
gangster man, professional religious man, rapist man, any kind of
man---and the first rule of masculinity is that whatever he is, women
are not. He calls his cowardice heroism, and he keeps women
out---out of humanity (fabled Mankind), out of his sphere of
activity whatever it is, out of all that is valued, rewarded, credible,
out of the diminishing realm of his own capacity to care. Women must be
kept out because wherever there are women, there is one haunting, vivid
memory with numberless smothering tentacles: he is that child, powerless
against the adult male, afraid of him, humiliated by him.

Boys become men to escape being victims by definition. Girls would
become men if girls could, because it would mean freedom
from: freedom from rape most of the time; freedom from
continuous petty insult and violent devaluation of self; freedom from
debilitating economic and emotional dependence on someone else; freedom
from the male aggression channeled against women in intimacy and
throughout the culture.

But male aggression is rapacious. It spills over, not accidentally, but
purposefully. There is war. Older men create wars. Older men kill boys
by generating and financing wars. Boys fight wars. Boys die in wars.
Older men hate boys because boys still have the smell of women on them.
War purifies, washes off the female stink. The blood of death, so
hallowed, so celebrated, overcomes the blood of life, so abhorred, so
defamed. The ones who survive the bloodbath will never again risk the
empathy with women they experienced as children for fear of being found
out and punished for good: killed this time by the male gangs, found in
all spheres of life, that enforce the male code. The child is dead. The
boy has become a man.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Men develop a strong loyalty to violence. Men must come to
terms with violence because it is the prime component of male identity.
Institutionalized in sports, the military, acculturated sexuality, the
history and mythology of heroism, it is taught to boys until they become
its advocates---men, not women. Men become advocates of that which they
most fear. In advocacy they experience mastery of fear. In mastery of
fear they experience freedom. Men transform their fear of male violence
into a metaphysical commitment to male violence. Violence itself becomes
the central definition of any experience that is profound and
significant. So, in
philosopher Norman O. Brown, a sexual radical in the male system,
posits that "\l\ove is violence. The kingdom of heaven suffereth
violence, from hot love and living hope."^4^ In the same text, Brown
defines freedom in the same way: "Freedom is poetry, taking liberties
with words, breaking the rules of normal speech, violating common sense.
Freedom is violence."^5^ Swim in male culture; drown in the male
romanticization of violence. On the Left, on the Right, in the Middle;
authors, statesmen, thieves; so-called humanists and self-declared
fascists; the adventurous and the contemplative; in every realm of male
expression and action, violence is experienced and articulated as love
and freedom. Pacifist males are only apparent exceptions: repelled by
some forms of violence as nearly all men are, they remain impervious to
sexual violence as nearly all men do.

Men choose their spheres of advocacy according to what they can bear
and/or what they can do well. Men will advocate some forms of violence
and not others. Some men will renounce violence in theory, and practice
it in secrecy against women and children. Some men will become icons in
male culture, able to discipline and focus their commitment to violence
by learning a violent skill: boxing, shooting, hunting, hockey,
football, soldiering, policing. Some men will use language as violence,
or money as violence, or religion as violence, or science as violence,
or influence over others as violence. Some men will commit violence
against the minds of others and some against the bodies of others. Most
men, in their life histories, have done both. In the area of sexuality,
this fact was acknowledged with no recognition of its significance by
the scholars of the Institute for Sex Research (the Kinsey Institute)
who studied sex offenders:

> If we labeled all punishable sexual behavior as a sex offense, we
> would find ourselves in the ridiculous situation of having all of our
> male histories consist almost wholly of sex offenders, the remaining
> few being not only nonoffenders but nonconformists. The man who kisses
> a girl in defiance of her expressed wishes
> is committing a forced sexual relationship and is liable to an assault
> charge, but to solemnly label him a sex offender would be to reduce
> our study to a ludicrous level. ^6^

Rather than "reduce \their\ study to a ludicrous level, " which would
be unthinkable, the honorable scientists chose to sanction as normative
the male commitment to the use of force documented by their
study.

Men are distinguished from women by their commitment to do violence
rather than to be victimized by it. Men are rewarded for learning the
practice of violence in virtually any sphere of activity by money,
admiration, recognition, respect, and the genuflection of others
honoring their sacred and proven masculinity. In male culture, police
are heroic and so are outlaws; males who enforce standards are heroic
and so are those who violate them. The conflicts between these groups
embody the male commitment to violence: conflict is action; action is
masculine. It is a mistake to view the warring factions of male culture
as genuinely distinct from one another: in fact, these warring factions
operate in near-perfect harmony to keep women at their mercy, one way or
another. Because male supremacy means precisely that men have learned to
use violence against others, particularly against females, in a random
or disciplined way, loyalty to some form of male violence, its advocacy
in language or action, is a prime criterion of effective masculine
identity. In adoring violence---from the crucifixion of Christ to the
cinematic portrayal of General Patton---men seek to adore themselves, or
those distorted fragments of self left over when the capacity to
perceive the value of life has been paralyzed and maimed by the very
adherence to violence that men articulate as life's central and
energizing meaning.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Men renounce whatever they have in common with women so as to
experience no commonality with women; and what is left, according to
men, is one piece of flesh a few inches long, the penis. The penis is
sensate; the penis is the man; the man is human; the penis signifies
humanity. Though this is the
central male reality in psyche and in culture, male reductionism is more
absurdly expressed when men go one step further and reduce the penis
itself to sperm en masse, or to the one divinely inspired sperm that
manages to fertilize an egg. Always in the vanguard, R. D. Laing, in his
1976 book, expressed this same
male reductionism in an even more bizarre way: "One could remain in love
with one's placenta the rest of one's life. "^7^ Laing expresses both
grief and rage over the loss of his
placenta,^\*^ but this anguish has not yet managed to surpass in
cultural significance the sorrow of those who, from the castigators of
Onan on, mourn lost sperm. In Aeschylus
insisted that all life originates in sperm, that the male is the sole
source of life and that therefore the sole power over life resides
properly with him. The linguistic antecedents of the word
penis include, in Old English and Old High German, the
meanings "offspring" and "fetus. " In the last several centuries nothing
has modified the male compulsion to keep reducing life to fragments of
male physiology; then to make the fragments magical, sources of both
power and menace. The dimension of menace is especially important in
enabling men to value bits and pieces of themselves. Sperm, for
instance, is seen as an agent of death, the woman's death, even when it
is viewed as the originator of life, male life. Childbearing is
glorified in part because women die from it. As Martin Luther put it:
"If a woman grows weary and at last dies from childbearing, it matters
not. Let her only die from bearing; she is there to do it."^8^ Our own
beloved Norman Mailer, in,
contemplated that "women had begun to withdraw respect from men about
the time pregnancy lost its danger\... If \death\ had once been a
possibility real enough for them to look at their mate with eyes of love
or eyes of hate but know their man might yet be the agent of their
death, conceive then of the lost gravity of the act\... "^9^ Mailer here
is not lamenting the advent of female-controlled contraception, though
he does lament it; he is mourning Semmelweis's discovery of the cause of
the epidemics of puerperal fever that killed masses of childbearing
women, including Mary Wollstonecraft.

*\***Antiabortion activists are energetically attempting to
forge a medical definition of the placenta as belonging to the fetus,
not the mother; and a whole host of male-created therapies that explore
trauma before birth give the fetus a male social identity with its
implicit male social suffering, male social alienation, and male social
privilege.*

The obsessive belief that the penis/sperm, once lodged in the woman, is
a male fetus, together with the erotic dimension of the penis/sperm as
agent of female death, accounts in large part for the continuing male
commitment to forced female pregnancy. The vagina/womb, as Erik Erikson
articulated, is perceived by the male as empty space that must be filled
by a penis or a child (male until proven otherwise, in which case
devalued), which is the penis realized---or the woman herself is empty,
that is, a nonentity, worthless.

Force---the violence of the male confirming his masculinity---is seen
as the essential purpose of the penis, its animating principle as it
were, just as sperm ideally impregnates the woman either without
reference to or against her will. The penis must embody the violence of
the male in order for him to be male. Violence is male; the male is the
penis; violence is the penis or the sperm ejaculated from it. What the
penis can do it must do forcibly for a man to be a man. The reduction of
human erotic potential to "sex, " defined as the force of the penis
visited on an unwilling woman, is the governing sexual scenario in
male-supremacist society. Havelock Ellis, considered a feminist by
scholars in the male tradition, sees the penis as properly and
intrinsically suggesting a whip and the whip as a logical and inevitable
expression of the penis:

> We must regard the whip as a natural symbol for the penis. One of the
> most frequent ways in which the idea of coitus first faintly glimmers
> before an infantile mind---and it is a glimmer which, from an
> evolutionary standpoint, is biologically correct---is as a display of
> force, of aggression, of something resembling cruelty. Whipping is the
> most obvious form in which to the young mind this idea might be
> embodied. The penis is the only organ of the body which in any degree
> resembles a whip. ^10^

Throughout male culture, the penis is seen as a weapon, especially a
sword. The word literally means "sheath. " In
male-supremacist society, reproduction takes on this same character:
force leading, at some point inevitably, to death; the penis/ sperm
valued as potential agent of female death. For centuries, female
reluctance to "have sex, " female dislike of "sex, " female frigidity,
female avoidance of "sex, " have been legendary. This has been the
silent rebellion of women against the force of the penis, generations of
women as one with their bodies, chanting in a secret language,
unintelligible even to themselves, a contemporary song of freedom: I
will not be moved. The aversion of women to the penis and to sex as men
define it, overcome only when survival and/or ideology demand it, must
be seen not as puritanism (which is a male strategy to keep the penis
hidden, taboo, and sacred), but as women's refusal to pay homage to the
primary purveyor of male aggression, one on one, against women. In this
way, women have defied men and subverted male power. It has been an
ineffectual rebellion, but it has been rebellion nonetheless.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Boys and men do experience sexual abuse at the hands of men.
The homophobe's distorting concentration on this fact, which cannot and
must not be denied, neatly eliminates from view the primary victims of
male sexual abuse: women and girls. This is congruent with the fact that
crimes against females are ultimately viewed as expressions of male
normalcy, while crimes against men and boys are viewed as perversions of
that same normalcy. Society's general willingness to do anything
necessary to protect boys and men from male sexual aggression is
testimony to the value of a male life. Society's general refusal to do
anything meaningful to protect women and girls from male sexual
aggression is testimony to the worthlessness of a female life. A male
life must be protected for its own sake. A female life warrants
protection only when the female belongs to a male, as wife, daughter,
mistress, whore; it is the owner who has a right to have his rights over
his females protected from other men. A female's bodily integrity or
well-being is not protected because of the value of the woman as a human
being in her own right.

The relatively low incidence of male sexual assault against males, as
contrasted with the pervasive assaults against females, cannot be
attributed to de jure proscriptions. Rape of women, battery of wives,
forcible incest with daughters, are also proscribed by male law but are
widely practiced with virtual impunity by men. The key is not in what is
forbidden but in what is sanctioned, really and truly sanctioned. Sexual
violence against women and girls is sanctioned and encouraged for a
purpose: the active and persistent channeling of male sexual aggression
against females protects men and boys rather effectively from male
sexual abuse. The system is not perfect, but it is formidable.

The homophobe's citing of actual or potential or projected or feared
sexual abuse of boys in particular also functions to sustain male
supremacy by obscuring this crucial fact: male sexual aggression is the
unifying thematic and behavioral reality of male sexuality; it does not
distinguish homosexual men from heterosexual men or heterosexual men
from homosexual men. An absence or repudiation of this aggression, which
is exceptional and which does exist in an eccentric and minuscule
minority composed of both homosexual and heterosexual men, distinguishes
some men from most men, or, to be more precise, the needle from the
haystack.

Prostitution, especially boy prostitution, and prisons are the primary
social institutions through which men express explicit sexual aggression
against other males. Sexual abuse of males by men does take place in
other areas, though its frequency, if not its effect, is
unknown.

While females as a class are always targeted for sexual abuse, boys and
men are targeted according to their devalued position in an exclusively
male hierarchy. Youth, poverty, and race are the special characteristics
that target males as possible victims of other men. Youth functions to
target a male because a youth is not yet fully dissociated from women
and children. The experiencing of sexual aggression is initiatory; the
boy can cross over, soak up the aggression of the aggressor and use it
against others. Boys who have had this experience still grow into men
who defend the sexual privileges of adult men, no matter what abuses
those privileges entail. These males protect themselves against being
victimized, and even the memory of victimization, by turning into
victimizers. Men who have been molested as children, and who as adults
have a clearly defined homosexual orientation, sometimes express
confusion as to whether they did or did not like the experience. Part of
the reason for this confusion is that they longed for sexual contact
with boys or men but were afraid of discovery or harm. Generally, boys
and girls who have active sexual longings do not imagine the hit-and-run
sexuality of the adult male. They are still tied, to differing extents,
to the nonphallic, more diffuse eroticism they experienced with their
mothers. They have longings and desires that are not reducible to
genital sexual contact. Women who were molested as children also
experience confusion as to what they really wanted when the adult male
exercised his sexual will on them, but must, as a condition of forced
femininity, accept the male as constant aggressor and forced sex as
normative. In women, this often results in a passivity bordering on
narcolepsy, morbid selfblame, and punishing self-hatred. Men molested as
children resolve their confusion through action: in crossing over to the
adult side, they remove themselves from the pool of victims. Since as
adults they can experience the commission of forcible sex with others as
freedom, they can say, as poet Allen Ginsberg did on a Boston television
show, that they were molested as children and liked it. This is the
public stance of the boy who has become the man, no matter what his
private or secret ambivalences might be. Unlike women, men as adults are
not likely to be molested again.

Significantly, forcible father-son incest, or sexual abuse of boys by
stepfathers or near relatives, seems to be rare within families, while
the sexual abuse of girls by fathers, stepfathers, and near relatives is
pervasive. It is possible that evidence of extensive sexual abuse of
boys within families has simply not yet been uncovered, since child
abuse in all of its forms is one of this country's best-kept secrets.
But it is more likely that the sexual abuse of boys by close relatives
is actually rare because such abuse is potentially dangerous to the
adult male and would deeply endanger the power of men as a class. The
boy will, at some point, be stronger, more virile, than the father. He
will also be less socialized, that is, not yet fully reconciled to the
abandonment of all commitment to the humanity of women. A sexually
abused boy can become sexual aggressor in turn, attack the father and,
on the physical level, win. Adult men tend not to rape their own sons or
close male relatives so as not to risk rape from them. While the
interests of men sometimes conflict, this is one rift that the
male-supremacist system could not survive. One-to-one sexual combat
between fathers and sons would rend the fabric of patriarchy. The
father's self-interest demands that the boy's burgeoning sexual
aggression, developed to begin with in response to the father as a
personal or social reality, be channeled against others, not against the
patriarch himself. The father creates the monster to control him, not to
suffer sexual retribution at his hands.

Poverty is also the mark of a potential male victim. Prison populations
are poor and so are prostitute populations. Money is one instrument of
male force. Poverty is a humiliating, and therefore a feminizing,
experience; the poor male is less powerful than the wealthier male. The
one with the money in general controls the sexual experience whatever
its nature. In a money society, money is power, and the buying of
another male, especially a boy, is forcible sex. Consent, properly
understood in a society where men have turned both desire and freedom
into dirty jokes, is a reality only between or among peers, and the poor
and the rich are never peers. And boys, in particular poor boys, are not
and cannot be the peers of adult men.

Racism also targets males as likely victims of sexual abuse. Prison
populations in the United States are disproportionately made up of black
males. The indifference of society at large to the sexual abuse of men
in prisons is directly attributable to the fact that prisons are
populated by the poor and by blacks. When society is confronted with the
enormity of the rape problem in male prisons, suddenly the outrage
occasioned by male sexual abuse in any other sphere does not exist; rape
of the sacred male when he is in prison is easy to ignore or to forget.
Those who do care about forcible violation of males in prison tend to
offer the logical solution: since forcible violation of females is
normal, introduce females into the prison population; then the prisoners
can have socially sanctioned sex.

No one really knows the extent of male sexual abuse of other males.
Largely in response to the prejudice against male homosexuals that is
endemic in the United States and the discriminatory attribution of
sexual crimes to homosexual men, the reality of such abuse is often
denied even by those who have experienced it. But sexual abuse of boys
does exist---contained, controlled, discouraged by enforced
heterosexuality which has as one of its main purposes the protection of
males as a whole from the rampant sexual aggression characteristic of
men as a class: the abuse of boys is considered an atrocious crime
primarily because the lives of boys are valued far above the lives of
girls; males are more vulnerable to sexual abuse the lower they are in
the male hierarchy; the labeling of male homosexuals as child molesters
particularly functions to hide the fact that women and girls are the
population most often and most consistently victimized and violated by
men. As long as male sexuality is expressed as force or violence, men as
a class will continue to enforce the taboo against male homosexuality to
protect themselves from having that force or violence directed against
them. Women will be their surrogates, and every institution in the
society will continue to demand that men do to women what men would find
insufferable if done to themselves. T. E. Lawrence, the fabled Lawrence
of Arabia, beaten and raped as an adult, expressed in a letter to
Charlotte Shaw the desperation that such violation by rape is to one not
raised to endure it, that is, to a man:

> You instance my night at Deraa. Well, I'm always afraid of being
> hurt; and to me, while I live, the force of that night will lie in the
> agony which broke me, and made me surrender\....

> About that night. I shouldn't tell you, because decent men don't talk
> about such things. I wanted to put it plain in the book
> \Seven Pillars of Wisdom\, wrestled for days with my
> self-respect \... which wouldn't, hasn't let me. For fear of being
> hurt, or rather to earn five minutes respite from a pain which drove
> me mad, I gave away the only possession we are born into the world
> with---our bodily integrity. It's an unforgiveable matter, an
> irrecoverable position: and it's that which has made me foreswear
> decent living, and the exercise of my not-contemptible wits and
> talents. \"

T. E. Lawrence attempted to exorcise this experience by repeating it:
by having himself flagellated by a younger man whom he paid, he himself
controlling his own humiliation and physical torment. This only
emphasizes the riveting trauma of losing "the only possession we are
born into the world with---our bodily integrity"; and the male option of
finding the means to control sexual reality, however devastating that
reality has been.\

It must also be noted that glorious ancient Greece, so often cited as
the ideal male homosexual society, that is, a society in which sex among
men and boys was entirely acceptable, operated in accordance with these
same principles: male sexual aggression against boys and among men was
highly regulated by custom and in practice; sexual relations between men
and boys expressed a rigid hierarchy of male power; the youth used was
feminized vis-i-vis older men; sex was not consensual, that is, among
peers (in fact, on Crete and in other parts of Greece, boys were
kidnapped into sexual apprenticeship); the boy became the man, changed
status, his reward at the end of an apprenticeship; populations of women
and slaves, neither of which had any rights of citizenship, absorbed the
brunt of male sexual aggression. Male homosexuality in male-supremacist
societies has always been contained and controlled by men as a class,
though the strategies of containment have differed, to protect men from
rape by other men, to order male sexuality so that it is, with reference
to males, predictable and safe. Females and devalued males who
participate in the low status of women are logically the preferred
victims, since male sexuality as it exists in male-supremacist contexts
requires victims, not fully present equals, in order to realize itself.
The devalued males can often change status, escape; women and girls
cannot. And the devalued male who cannot change his devalued
status can always find solace in his own rights of tyranny and
privilege, however circumscribed, over women and girls in his own
family, class, race, or group.

It is unlikely that male-male sexuality will be or can be tolerated by
men as a class until the very nature of masculinity is changed, that is,
until rape is no longer the defining paradigm of sexuality. Those gay
men of our own time who offer ancient Greece as a utopian model are only
confirming that, for them, the continued scapegoating of women and the
sexual exploitation of less powerful males would be an insignificant
price to pay for a comfortable solution to their own social and sexual
dilemma. As adult men, they would have freedom as they understand it,
the freedom of the sexual predator; women, girls, and devalued males
would continue to be the prey. This moral bankruptcy is not in any sense
unique to homosexual men; rather, it is part of what they have in common
with all men.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

> I saw, as so many times before, that sublata nullum
> discrimen interfeminas ("when the lamp is taken away, all
> women are alike").

Giacomo Casanova,

I was born at 1715 hours on October 7th, 1927, into a family that
consisted of my mother and father, living in a small three-room flat on
the south side of Glasgow. My father could not admit to anyone for
several days that I was born.

My mother went into "a decline." A woman was brought in to nurse me who
after six weeks turned out to be a drunken slut and another woman was
brought in. She was a drunken slut as well.

R. D. Laing,

> And it is this that makes the cocksureness of women so dangerous, so
> devastating. It is really out of scheme, it is not in relation to the
> rest of things. So we have the tragedy of cocksure women. They find,
> so often, that instead of having laid an egg, they have laid a vote,
> or an empty-ink-bottle, or some other absolutely unhatchable
> object, which means nothing to
> them.

D. H. Lawrence, "Cocksure Women and Hensure Men, " Sex,
Literature and Censorship

> The interest of the employed woman tends to become one with that of
> her employer; between them they combine to crush the interests of the
> child who represents the race, and to defeat the laws made in the
> interests of the race which are those of the community as a whole. The
> employed woman wishes to earn as much wages as she can and with as
> little interruption as she can\...

> This impulse on the employed woman's part is by no means always and
> entirely the result of poverty, and would not, therefore, be removed
> by raising her wages\.... her home means nothing to her; she only
> returns there to sleep, leaving it next morning at daybreak or
> earlier; she is ignorant even of the simplest domestic arts; she moves
> about in her own home like a stranger and awkward child.

Havelock Ellis,

> The queen is the most dangerous of creatures. He is always on the
> verge of threatening a man's virility. This is not solely because the
> queen represents a man\'s antithesis, the extreme evil to be avoided
> at all costs (American education as a whole being devoted to making
> boys different from girls), but because the queen is so nearly a woman
> that even a hidebound heterosexual may make a mistake.

Georges-Michel Sarotte,
Like a Lover

> "You were saying that a lot of your magazine offends you. Then why do
> you keep on publishing? "

> "Because men all over the country need
> They feel inferior, and they are. Women are naturally superior;
> they're our only hope. I mean, my mother lives with me. I've always
> been close to her. She's a saint. And I'm in favor of the women's
> movement. It's just that they take no responsibility for scaring men.
> Why do you think there's so much bisexuality on campuses? Why do you
> think men molest children! Because they're afraid of relating to
> liberated women. "

Larry Flynt, interviewed by Jeffrey Klein^17^

> \... Why does Samuel Butler say, "Wise men never say what they think
> of women"? Wise men never say anything else apparently.

Virginia Woolf,

Male perceptions of women are askew, wild, inept. Male renderings of
women in art, literature, psychology, religious discourses, philosophy,
and in the common wisdom of the day, whatever the day, are bizarre,
distorted, fragmented at best, demented in the main. Everything is done
to keep women out of the perceptual field altogether, but, like insects,
women creep in; find the slightest chink in the male armor and watch
her, odious thing, crawl in. Even this presence, on hands and knees as
it were, is so disorienting, so fiercely threatening, that attributions
of malice must be made---immediate, intense, slanderous, couched in
language that conveys the man's absolute authority to speak. In male
reality, women cannot enter male consciousness without violating it. The
male is contaminated and distressed by any contact with
woman-not-as-object. He loses ground. His own masculinity cannot
withstand what he regards as an assault unless he steps on the uppity
thing, crushes it by hook or by crook, by insult, open hand flat against
the face or clenched fist crushed into it. The dark comforts him because
it dims personality; he has sex in the dark to convince himself that all
women are the same, without individual substance or importance, a la
Casanova. Dependence on women is abhorrent to him, so even at birth he
was surrounded by drunken sluts, a la Laing. Women who want to work or
vote are vicious, having abandoned every shred of female decency,. which
is qualitatively different and entirely distinct from male decency, a la
D. H. Lawrence and Havelock Ellis. Male decency miraculously survives
the commission of murder and rape; female decency is abnegated when the
woman steps out of the house to work or vote. A male masquerading as a
female is dangerous because men cannot distinguish him from the real
thing here used literally, not idiomatically)
a la Sarotte. The male will even, a la Larry Flynt, attribute some
specious kind of superiority to the female to justify his cruel abuses
of women in reality and in this context, remembered for a split second,
mother was a saint. In the main, the abominable She is held responsible
for everything bad, fearful, or alienating that ever happened to the
fully-human-He. Any assertion of female self leads to the inevitable
decline of society; and when the abominable She calls attention to
herself as human, not object, she violates the male's most essential
sense of masculine self. Every attempt she makes to reclaim the humanity
he has stolen from her makes her subject to insult, ridicule, and abuse.
In his view, she is not a woman unless she acts like a woman as he has
defined woman. His definition need not be coherent. It is never
scrutinized for logic or consistency or even threadbare common sense. He
can theorize, fantasize, call it science or art; whatever he says about
women is true because he says it. He is the authority on what she is
because he has made her, cut away at her as if she were a piece of stone
until the prized inanimate object is extracted. As filmmaker Agnes
Varda, crediting Simone de Beauvoir as the source, expressed it in her
film the Other
Doesn\'t:

Men want women to be objects, controllable as objects are controllable.
Women who deviate from the male definition are monstrous, sluts,
depraved. Since all women do deviate to some degree, all women are
viewed to some degree as monstrous, sluts, depraved, with appetites
that, if unleashed, would swallow up the male, destroy him. Men know
that the object does breathe, but rather than face up to the meaning of
this knowledge, they prefer to believe that under the object lurks a
hungry, angry viper; that the object is a rock that must never be moved
or picked up or the viper will strike. Suddenly, one is confronted with
the fragile, vulnerable male, threatened by reptilian female genitalia
(for instance, the vagina dentata), or the devouring mother, or the
insatiable lust of the nymphomaniac. The fear that what men have
suppressed in women will emerge to destroy them makes the control of
women an urgent and absolute necessity. Men dare to claim not only that
they are fragile but that the power of women over them is immense and
real.

In, Dorothy
Dinnerstein proposes that this delusion originates in the infantile
experience of the all-powerful mother; all infantile ambivalences and
rage are taken out on women for the duration of a male life. (According
to Dinnerstein, women are self-punishing because of this same infantile
rage.) The solution, as Dinnerstein sees it, is child care by
men as well as women, so that the vengeance can be more fairly doled
out.

But it is the male who is powerful, and even the child, early on, knows
it, perceives it, acts to mitigate the danger, to protect himself from
it. This means making an alliance with the one who has the power, the
father; and this is what all boys try to do. To understand, or to know
even without understanding, that survival demands this alliance means
that the boy has passed beyond any infantile experience of the mother's
power over his immediate wellbeing. He has experienced her
powerlessness, and it is this more mature experience of female
powerlessness, of the female's inability to protect the boy from the
power of the adult male, that is the basis of his adult
behavior.

Adult men have made their seedy pact with and for male power. They have
entered the kingdom and once there, they will not return voluntarily to
the degraded world of the female. Because as men they can define reality
without reference to truth, they turn their own experience on its ass to
justify their capitulation to the power of the father, their cowardly
abandonment of the mother. Their guilt must be very great. In all their
communication, shouted and whispered, no matter what men have done to
them, they name women the threat, and the truth is that any loyalty to
women does threaten a man's place in the community of men. Anything,
including memory or conscience, that pulls a man toward women as humans,
not as objects and not as monsters, does endanger him. But the danger is
always from other men. And no matter how afraid he is of those other
men, he has taken a vow---one for all and all for one---and he will not
tell. Women are scapegoated here too, called powerful by men who know
only too well how powerless women are---know it so well that they will
tell any lie and commit any crime so as not to be touched by the stigma
of that powerlessness.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Everything in life is part of it. Nothing is off in its own
corner, isolated from the rest. While on the surface this may seem
self-evident, the favorite conceit of male culture is that experience
can be fractured, literally its bones split, and that one can examine
the splinters as if they were not part of the bone, or the bone as if it
were not part of the body. This conceit replicates in its values and
methodology the sexual reductionism of the male and is derived from it.
Everything is split apart: intellect from feeling and/or imagination;
act from consequence; symbol from reality; mind from body. Some part
substitutes for the whole and the whole is sacrificed to the part. So
the scientist can work on bomb or virus, the artist on poem, the
photographer on picture, with no appreciation of its meaning outside
itself; and even reduce each of these things to an abstract element that
is part of its composition and focus on that abstract element and
nothing else---literally attribute meaning to or discover meaning in
nothing else. In the midtwentieth century, the post-Holocaust world, it
is common for men to find meaning in nothing: nothing has meaning;
Nothing is meaning. In prerevolutionary Russia, men strained to be
nihilists; it took enormous effort. In this world, here and now, after
Auschwitz, after Hiroshima, after Vietnam, after Jonestown, men need not
strain. Nihilism, like gravity, is a law of nature, male nature. The
men, of course, are tired. It has been an exhausting period of
extermination and devastation, on a scale genuinely new, with new
methods, new possibilities. Even when faced with the probable extinction
of themselves at their own hand, men refuse to look at the whole, take
all the causes and all the effects into account, perceive the intricate
connections between the world they make and themselves. They are
alienated, they say, from this world of pain and torment; they make
romance out of this alienation so as to avoid taking responsibility for
what they do and what they are. Male dissociation from life is not new
or particularly modern, but the scale and intensity of this disaffection
are new. And in the midst of this Brave New World, how comforting and
familiar it is to exercise passionate cruelty on women. The
old-fashioned values still obtain. The world may end tomorrow, but
tonight there is rape---a kiss, a fuck, a pat on the ass, a fist in the
face. In the intimate world of men and women, there is no mid-twentieth
century distinct from any other century. There are only the old values,
women there for the taking, the means of taking determined by the male.
It is ancient and it is modern; it is feudal, capitalist, socialist; it
is caveman and astronaut, agricultural and industrial, urban and rural.
For men, the right to abuse women is elemental, the first principle,
with no beginning unless one is willing to trace origins back to God and
with no end plausibly in sight. For men, their right to control and
abuse the bodies of women is the one comforting constant in a world
rigged to blow up but they do not know when.

In pornography, men express the tenets of their unchanging faith, what
they must believe is true of women and of themselves to sustain
themselves as they are, to ward off recognition that a commitment to
masculinity is a double-edged commitment to both suicide and genocide.
In life, the objects are fighting back, rebelling, demanding that every
breath be reckoned with as the breath of a living person, not a viper
trapped under a rock, but an authentic, willful, living being. In
pornography, the object is slut, sticking daggers up her vagina and
smiling. A bible piling up its code for centuries, a secret corpus gone
public, a private corpus gone political, pornography is the male's
sacred stronghold, a monastic retreat for manhood on the verge of its
own destruction. As one goes through the pictures of the tortured and
maimed, reads the stories of gang rape and bondage, what emerges most
clearly is a portrait of men who need to believe in their own absolute,
unchangeable, omnipresent, eternal, limitless power over others. Every
image reveals not the so-called object in it but the man who needs it:
to keep his prick big when every bomb dwarfs it; to keep his sense of
masculine self intact when the world of his own creation has made that
masculine self a useless and rather silly anachronism; to keep women the
enemy even though men will destroy him and he by being faithful to them
will be responsible for that destruction; to sustain his belief in the
righteousness of his real abuses of women when, in fact, they would be
insupportable and unbearable if he dared to experience them as what they
are---the bullying brutalities of a coward too afraid of other men to
betray or abandon them. Pornography is the holy corpus of men who would
rather die than change. Dachau brought into the bedroom and celebrated,
every vile prison or dungeon brought into the bedroom and celebrated,
police torture and thug mentality brought into the bedroom and
celebrated---men reveal themselves and all that matters to them in these
depictions of real history, plasticized and rarefied, represented as the
common erotic stuff of male desire. And the pictures and stories lead
right back to history---to peoples enslaved, maimed, murdered---because
they show that, for men, the history of atrocity they pretend to mourn
is coherent and utterly intentional if one views it as rooted in male
sexual obsession. Pornography reveals that slavery, bondage, murder, and
maiming have been acts suffused with pleasure for those who committed
them or who vicariously experienced the power expressed in them.
Pornography reveals that male pleasure is inextricably tied to
victimizing, hurting, exploiting; that sexual fun and sexual passion in
the privacy of the male imagination are inseparable from the brutality
of male history. The private world of sexual dominance that men demand
as their right and their freedom is the mirror image of the public world
of sadism and atrocity that men consistently and self-righteously
deplore. It is in the male experience of pleasure that one finds the
meaning of male history.



3

The Marquis de Sade
(---{.font5
style="font-weight:bold;"}1814){.font5
style="font-weight:bold;"}

> As flies to wanton boys are we to the gods\
> They kill us for their sport.\
> 
>
> ::: 
> Shakespeare, King Lear\
> 
> :::

Donatien-Alphonse-Francois de Sade---known as the Marquis de Sade,
known to his ardent admirers who are legion as The Divine Marquis---is
the world's foremost pornographer. As such he both embodies and defines
male sexual values. In him, one finds rapist and writer twisted into one
scurvy knot. His life and writing were of a piece, a whole cloth soaked
in the blood of women imagined and real. In his life he tortured and
raped women. He was batterer, rapist, kidnapper, and child abuser. In
his work he relentlessly celebrated brutality as the essence of
eroticism; fucking, torture, and killing were fused; violence and sex,
synonymous. His work and legend have survived nearly two centuries
because literary, artistic, and intellectual men adore him and political
thinkers on the Left claim him as an avatar of freedom. Sainte-Beuve
named Sade and Byron as the two most significant sources of inspiration
for the original and great male writers who followed them. Baudelaire,
Flaubert, Swinburne, Lautreamont, Dostoevski, Cocteau, and Apollinaire
among others found in Sade what Paul Tillich, another devotee of
pornography, might have called "the courage to be. " Simone de Beauvoir
published a long apologia for Sade. Camus, who unlike Sade had an
aversion to murder, romanticized Sade as one who had mounted "the great
offensive against a hostile heaven"^1^ and was possibly "the first
theoretician of absolute rebellion."^2^ Roland Barthes wallowed in the
tiniest details of Sade's crimes, those committed in life as well as on
paper. Sade is precursor to Artaud's theater of cruelty, Nietzsche's
will to power, and the rapist frenzy of William Burroughs. In England in
1966, a twelve-year-old boy and a ten-year-old girl were tortured and
murdered by a self-proclaimed disciple of Sade. The crimes were
photographed and tape-recorded by the murderer, who played them back for
pleasure. In 1975 in the United States, organized crime reportedly sold
"snuff' films to private collectors of pornography. In these films,
women actually were maimed, sliced into pieces, fucked, and killed---the
perfect Sadean synthesis. Magazines and films depicting the mutilation
of women for the sake of sexual pleasure now abound. A major translator
into English of Sade's thousands of pages of butchery and the one
primarily responsible for the publication of Sade's work in accessible
mass-market editions in the United States is Richard Seaver, a respected
figure in establishment publishing. Seaver, instrumental in the
propagation of Sade's work and legend, has reportedly written a film of
Sade's life that will be made by Alain Resnais. Sade's cultural
influence on all levels is pervasive. His ethic---the absolute right of
men to rape and brutalize any "object of desire" at will---resonates in
every sphere.

Sade was born into a noble French family closely related to the
reigning monarch. Sade was raised with the prince, four years his
senior, during his earliest years. When Sade was four, his mother left
the Court and he was sent to live with his grandmother. At the age of
five, he was sent to live with his uncle, the Abbe de Sade, a clergyman
known for his sensual indulgences. Sade's father, a diplomat and
soldier, was absent during Sade's formative years. Inevitably,
biographers trace Sade's character to his mother's personality,
behavior, and alleged sexual repression, despite the fact that very
little is known about her. What is known, but not sufficiently noted, is
that Sade was raised among the male mighty. He wrote in later years of
having been humiliated and controlled by them.

At the age of fifteen, Sade entered the military as an officer. At this
age, he apparently began gambling and frequenting brothels. Purchasing
women was one of the great passions of his life, and most of the women
and girls he abused during his lifetime were whores or servants. Sade
advanced in the military and was promoted several times, each promotion
bringing with it more money.

Those leftists who champion Sade might do well to remember that
prerevolutionary France was filled with starving people. The feudal
system was both cruel and crude. The rights of the aristocracy to the
labor and bodies of the poor were unchallenged and not challengeable.
The tyranny of class was absolute. The poor sold what they could,
including themselves, to survive. Sade learned and upheld the ethic of
his class.

Nearly twenty-three, Sade fell in love with a woman of his own class,
Laure de Lauris. Sade's urgent desire to marry her was frustrated when
she begged her father not to permit the marriage under any
circumstances. Sade was enraged by her "betrayal" of him, possibly
occasioned by the venereal disease both had contracted. Sade blamed her
for infecting him, and his biographers, always credulous, take him at
his word despite his already long and sordid sexual history. There is no
cited evidence that Laure de Lauris had any other sexual
partner.

That same year, Sade entered into an arranged marriage with
Renee-Pelagie de Montreuil, elder daughter of a wealthy family. Within
six weeks after his marriage, Sade had rented an isolated house in which
he acted out his sexual desires on women whom he bought.

Five months after his marriage, Sade terrified and assaulted a
twenty-year-old working-class woman, Jeanne Testard. Testard, a fan
maker, had agreed to service a young nobleman. She was taken to Sade's
private house and locked in a room. Sade made clear to her that she was
a captive. She was subjected to verbal abuse and humiliation. In
particular, Sade raged against her conventional Christian religious
beliefs. He told her that he had masturbated into a chalice in a chapel
and that he had taken two hosts, placed them inside a woman, and fucked
her. Testard told Sade that she was pregnant and could not tolerate
maltreatment. Sade took Testard into a room filled with whips, religious
symbols, and pornographic pictures. He wanted Testard to whip him, and
then he wanted to beat her. She refused. He took two crucifixes, crushed
one, and masturbated on the other. He demanded that she destroy the one
on which he had masturbated. She refused. He threatened her life with
two pistols that were in the room and a sword that he was wearing. She
crushed the crucifix. He wanted to give her an enema and have her shit
on the crucifix. She refused. He wanted to sodomize her. She refused.
Sade threatened, harangued, and lectured her through a very long night
during which she did not eat or sleep. Before releasing her, he made her
sign a blank piece of paper and promise to tell no one about what had
transpired. He wanted her to agree to meet him the following Sunday so
that he could fuck her with a host inside of her.

On being freed, Testard went to the police. Sade was arrested,
apparently because police interviews with prostitutes revealed that Sade
had abused scores of them. Sade was punished because he had become
careless in his excesses. He was imprisoned for two months at Vincennes
in squalor most distressing to a gentleman. He wrote letters to the
authorities in which he begged them to keep the nature of his crime
secret from his family.

After his release, Sade began a series of affairs with actresses and
dancers, who in the eighteenth century were almost always also
courtesans. He kept several of these women and continued purchasing less
distinguished women as well.

Sade's abuse of prostitutes became so alarming that, within a year
after his brutal treatment of Testard, the police warned procuresses not
to provide Sade with women. Sade's valet scavenged the streets for
victims, some of whom, according to Sade's neighbors, were
male.

During this same period, he also managed to impregnate his wife, who
gave birth to a son.

In 1768, Easter Sunday early in the morning, Rose Keller, in her
mid-thirties, a German immigrant, a widow, a cotton spinner who had been
unemployed for approximately a month, approached Sade to beg for alms.
He offered her work housecleaning. She accepted. He told her that she
would be well fed and treated kindly.

Sade took Keller to his private house. He took her to a dark room in
which the windows were boarded and said he was going to get her food. He
locked her in the room. Keller had waited for about an hour when Sade
came to take her into another room. He told her to undress. She refused.
He tore her clothes off, threw her face down onto a couch, tied her arms
and legs with ropes. He whipped her brutally. He took a knife and told
her that he would kill her. According to Keller, Sade kept cutting her
with a knife and rubbing wax into the wounds. Keller believed she would
die and begged Sade not to kill her until she could make her Easter
confession. When Sade was finished with her, he took her back to the
first room and ordered her to wash and rub brandy into her wounds. This
she did. He also rubbed into the wounds an ointment that he had
invented. He was proud of his invention, which he claimed healed wounds
quickly. Later, Sade alleged that he had paid Keller to be whipped so
that he could test his ointment. Sade brought Keller food. He took her
back to the room where he had beaten her and locked her in. Keller
bolted the door from the inside. She unblocked some of the locked
shutters with a knife, injuring herself in the process, made a rope of
bedding, and climbed out of the window and down the wall. Sade's valet
pursued her and offered her money to return. She pushed him off and
ran.

Keller was badly hurt and her clothes were ripped. She ran until she
encountered a village woman, to whom she poured out her story. Other
women joined. They examined her and then took her to an inappropriate
official, since the local magistrate was away. A police official called
in from elsewhere took her statement. Keller was examined by a surgeon
and was given refuge.

Sade's mother-in-law, Madame de Montreuil, settled a large sum of money
on Rose Keller to persuade her to withdraw criminal charges. Despite the
settlement, Sade was imprisoned for nearly eight months, during which
time he impregnated his wife again. When he returned to Lacoste, his
home with his wife, she left for Paris, where, seven months later,
Sade's second son was born. Sade's pursuit of other women began on his
release. Sade weaved in and out of Renee-Pelagie's life. In April 1771 a
daughter was born. In September 1771 Sade began an affair with
his wife's younger sister,
Anne-Prospere.

In June 1772, Sade traveled to Marseilles with his valet, known as
Latour. During the course of Sade's brief stay there, Latour procured
five prostitutes for Sade. Sade (in varying combinations) beat, fucked,
and forcibly sodomized the women, with his usual threats of worse
violence and death. He also had his valet sodomize at least one of the
women and himself. In Marseilles, Sade added another dimension to his
sexual repertoire: he encouraged the women to eat candies that had been
laced with drugs. The women did not know what they were eating. Sade's
defenders claim that the candies were treated with a harmless
aphrodisiac and something to encourage flatulence, which Sade found
particularly charming. Two of the women became violently ill from the
candies, had intense abdominal pain, vomited blood and black mucus. The
women believed that they had been poisoned, and there is little doubt
that had they consumed the quantities of the candy that Sade had wanted
them to eat, they would have become deadly ill. One of the women went to
the police. An investigation of Sade's brutality with the five
prostitutes---the forced flagellation, the forced sodomy, the attempted
poisoning---led to an order to arrest both Sade and Latour. Sade, with
Anne-Prospere as his lover and Latour as his valet, fled to Italy to
escape arrest.

Sade and Latour were found guilty of poisoning and sodomy (a capital
crime irrespective of force) in absentia. They were sentenced to death.
In lieu of the death sentence that could not be carried out, the two men
were burned in effigy.

Sade's mother-in-law, Madame de Montreuil, faced with Sade's
incorrigibility, perhaps in an effort to separate Anne-Prospere from
Sade, used her formidable political influence to have Sade imprisoned in
Italy. For the next four months, Sade wrote letters to high officials in
Italy and France in which he bemoaned the injustice of his imprisonment
and pleaded to be freed. At the end of the fourth month, he escaped.
Shortly after his escape, Sade wrote his mother-in-law several times to
ask for money. When it was not forthcoming, Sade returned to Lacoste. On
his return to France, another order was issued for his arrest.
He again escaped. After a few weeks, he again returned to Lacoste.
Renee-Pelagie filed a complaint against her mother, probably in the hope
that this pressure would encourage Madame de Montreuil to use her
influence to have the charges against Sade dropped. Despite the
complaint against Madame de Montreuil, a new warrant was issued for
Sade's arrest. He went into hiding, then returned again to Lacoste.
Renee-Pelagie continued to try to have her mother arrested. Her efforts
were rewarded with a promise from high government officials that an
appeal would be presented in the parliament to cancel Sade's sentence.
This would then lead to invalidation of the lettre de
cachet (an order from the king that a given person be
imprisoned without trial and with no predetermined sentence) that had
also been issued against Sade.

Sade, with an end to his legal troubles in sight, intensified his
pursuit of pleasure. He had a procuress known as Nanon find him five
fifteen-year-old girls who were taken to Lacoste and forced to submit to
Sade's brutality. Sade's wife was a participant in these new sexual
extravaganzas. She became the prime apologist for Sade's violence
against the girls, even though, as one of them testified, Renee-Pelagie
was herself "the first victim of a fury which can be described only as
madness. "^3^ Parents of three of the girls pressed charges against
Sade, who refused to release his captives. One of the girls was horribly
injured. She was sent to Sade's uncle, the Abbe, to keep her from
testifying against Sade. Renee-Pelagie did everything possible to keep a
doctor from treating the girl, since evidence of bodily injury could be
used against Sade and herself as well. Madame de Montreuil, perhaps to
protect her daughter, joined with Renee-Pelagie and Sade to try to
coerce the parents into dropping their complaints. Meanwhile, Sade
forcibly kept the girls at Lacoste. They would be returned to their
parents only if no charges of kidnapping were made.

Sade brought more women and girls to Lacoste. Human bones were found in
Sade's garden; he claimed one of his mistresses had planted them as a
joke. Nanon, the procuress, became pregnant by Sade. Madame de Montreuil
had a issued for her arrest. Nanon
was imprisoned; her infant daughter died at Lacoste shortly after she
was born because the wet nurse's milk went dry.

Sade was again threatened with arrest. He escaped again to Italy. The
fifteen-year-old girl who had been most severely injured and had been
sent to Sade's uncle had not, in nine months, recovered from her
injuries. She was finally taken to a hospital where the Sade family
conspired to keep her from talking with anyone to whom she might reveal
what had happened to her. By this time, the Abbe believed that Sade
should be imprisoned.

For a year, Sade traveled in Italy. He complained of being lonely. One
of the kidnapped girls, still kept at Lacoste, died. Another escaped and
went to the police. Against the advice of Renee-Pelagie, Sade returned
to Lacoste. More women were procured for him. Sade kept spending money
on women while Renee-Pelagie lived in near penury. He hired servants,
locked them up, forced them to submit to him. A father of a servant
hired by Sade tried to shoot him. The daughter signed a statement
defending Sade. The authorities ordered the woman returned to her
father. She was not.

Another attempt was made to arrest Sade. He hid. On being informed by
Madame de Montreuil that his mother was dying in Paris, he went there.
She died before he arrived, but in Paris Sade was arrested under
a. Madame de Montreuil had told the
police Sade's whereabouts. He was sent to Vincennes, where he was
imprisoned for nearly six years. In 1784, he was transferred to the
Bastille. In 1789, the people of France were near revolution. Sade
rigged up an improvised loudspeaker from his cell and exhorted the
people to lay siege to the Bastille. He was moved to Charenton, a
lunatic asylum. On July 14, 1789, the Bastille was stormed and its
warden killed. In 1790, Sade was released from Charenton along with all
prisoners who had been imprisoned under lettres de
cachet

During the years of his imprisonment in Vincennes and the Bastille,
Sade wrote the body of literature for which he is best known (though his
literary career did not begin in prison; he had done some writing and
even produced and directed theatrical events sporadically). On Sade's
release, Renee-Pelagie, whom Sade had subjected to extraordinary scorn
and abuse during his imprisonment, left him and obtained a legal
separation. Sade's bitterness toward her was unrelenting. Apparently he
felt that he had given her the best years of his life, which were less
than perfect only because he had been maliciously persecuted. He
especially blamed Renee-Pelagie for the loss of manuscripts that had
been taken or destroyed during the siege of the Bastille. She had failed
to rescue them, as he had demanded, and may have burned some herself. In
the ensuing years, he set about re-creating the lost work. After his
release, Sade also met his daughter as an adult for the first time. He
hated her on sight. Early in 1791, Sade began living with
Marie-Constance Renelle, to whom is
dedicated and with whom he had what his biographers consider a sincere,
loving, devoted relationship. Sade was no longer a young rake. In prison
he had become very fat, and the French Revolution had deprived him of
his power as an aristocrat. Necessity, that fabled parent of invention,
gave birth in a few short months to Citizen Sade.

For nearly four years, Sade walked a political tightrope. He played the
role of one who had been abused by the old regime, who had no loyalties
to the old nobility and was entirely committed to the new society. He
made politically correct speeches, renamed streets to reflect the
ideology of the revolution, and worked to keep his own property from the
legitimate claims of the revolution and of Renee-Pelagie. According to
his biographers, Sade's essential humanism was demonstrated during the
Terror when he was on a committee that passed judgment on the
Montreuils: he could have denounced them and had them killed, but he did
not. It is more likely that Sade, a consummate survivor, had understood
that, during the Terror, guilt by past association could endanger his
own life. Condemnation of the Montreuils could eventually have led to
his own death for his having consorted with them.

Revolutionary leader Jean-Paul Marat discovered the nature of the
crimes for which Sade had been imprisoned under the old regime. He
denounced Sade but by mistake someone with a similar name was executed.
Marat, although he became aware of his mistake, did not live to rectify
it: he was assassinated by Charlotte Corday.

Toward the end of 1793, Sade was imprisoned. The charge was that in
1791 he had volunteered to serve the king. Sade insisted that he had
thought the regiment in which he had volunteered to serve was loyal to
the revolution. He remained in prison and in July 1794 was sentenced to
death. The administration of the prisons was so inefficient that Sade
could not be found. He was not executed. Later that same month,
Robespierre was executed, and the Terror ended. Two months later, Sade
was released.

In 1800, Napoleon came to power. In March 1801, Sade was again
arrested, this time for authoring obscene literature
(Justine, published in part in 1791 and in a new version in
1797; and, published in 1797). Except for
his imprisonment for antirevolutionary activity in 1793, all Sade's
imprisonment in France up to this point (he was sixty) had been for
committing brutal crimes against persons. Sade was imprisoned by
administrative order. He denied that he had authored either
Justine and particularly
denounced as filth. He was imprisoned at
Sainte-Pelagie for two years, during which time he sexually assaulted
other prisoners. As a result of his assaultive behavior in
Sainte-Pelagie and because of a change in policy that separated the
treatment of criminals from the treatment of the insane, Sade was
transferred to Bicete, an asylum. He had been there for forty-four days
when, on the basis of an appeal by his sons, he was transferred to
Charenton, where living conditions were considerably better---his
especially, since his family paid the institution handsomely for his
room and board. Marie-Constance Renelle was allowed to live at Charenton
with him. Sade was also permitted to produce expensive theatrical
events, which were open to the public.

Several attempts were made to have Sade transferred back to prison,
since medical opinion was that he was a criminal, not a madman. But Sade
was useful to the head of Charenton, especially as director of drama.
Sade stayed at Charenton until he died in 1814 at the age of
seventy-four. In the last year or two of his life, still cohabiting with
Renelle, he had an affair with Madeleine Leclerc, perhaps fourteen years
old, essentially sold to him by her mother. As he noted in his diary,
from her he wanted and obtained absolute submission as he had, all his
life, understood and appreciated it.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

> Fiddling with the hairs on an elephant's nose is indecent when the
> elephant happens to be standing on the baby.

John Gardner, On Moral
Fiction

In a woman-hating culture, it is particularly difficult to make
credible the claim that a crime committed against a woman must matter.
The belief that women exist to be used by men is so old, so deep set, so
widely accepted, so commonplace in its everyday application, that it is
rarely challenged, even by those who pride themselves on and are
recognized for their intellectual acumen and ethical grace. Keening,
wild, and wailing or sober, severe, and rigorous, feminists keep
pointing to a woman who is real and does exist and who must matter.
Others look and see only insignificant shadows moving under the feet of
those real people to whom real things happen---men---so that in a room
of a hundred "people, " half men, half women, a male-defined observer
will see fifty men and fifty shadows. Rape a shadow and watch it
disappear. Rape a shadow, and does it matter? Sometimes, it appears that
shadows pursue. They cannot be lost. They follow, nipping at the heels.
Attributions of malice are made. Shadows become ominous, haunting. In
histories and biographies, in philosophical and literary essays,
male-supremacist culture perpetuates the power of men over women by
turning women into shadows. The shameful inequities of life are
maintained by the distortions and manipulations pervasive in so-called
nonfiction. What happens to men is portrayed as authentic, significant,
and what happens to women is left out or shown not to matter. Women are
portrayed as the shadows that tamely follow or maliciously haunt men,
never as the significant beings who matter.

So sexual philosopher Georges Bataille, in Death and
Sensuality, can write without embarrassment (or, until the
women's movement, without fear of contradiction): "In his life de Sade
took other people into account, but his conception of fulfilment worked
over and over in his lonely cell led him to deny outright \in writing\
the claim? of other people. "^4^ Sade, of course, had denied outright
the claims of other people since his youth, but the "other people" were
primarily women, real women, and so are of no significance to
Bataille.

In the same way, Donald Thomas, one of Sade's recent biographers, can
claim: "The cruelties of his fiction are quite at variance with almost
all Sade's conduct\... "^5^ Thomas also insists that Sade's sexual
desires were "indulged largely in his fiction. "^6^ The abused bodies of
women, piled up in heaps through a cruel and conscienceless life, are
dismissed by facile distortion or complete denial. Not above writing
false history to trivialize Sade's brutalities against women, Thomas,
with this intellectual sleight of hand, makes the victim disappear into
thin air:

> The Marquis de Sade's true difficulty was not that he had an
> inclination for beating some of the girls
> whom he hired or that he submitted them to unorthodox sexual acts,
> but that he did this in the middle of the eighteenth century when they
> were more likely to complain and be heard. ^7^

It is fair to point out that the feudal system rather effectively
discouraged whores from going to the police with complaints against
noblemen.

Simone de Beauvoir, in an essay entitled "Must We Burn Sade?" first
published in the early fifties, also manages to make the crime and the
victims nearly invisible: "Actually, whipping a few girls
\sic\ (for a consideration agreed upon in advance) is
rather a petty feat; that Sade set so much store on it is enough to cast
suspicion on him."^8^

The rights of women as persons are entirely, if disingenuously, denied
by Richard Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse, Sade's translators into
English, in their foreword to a collection of Sade's work:

> With his usual perception about himself, Sade once noted in a letter
> to his wife that, had the authorities any insight, they would not have
> locked him up to plot and daydream and make philosophical
> disquisitions as wild and vengeful and absolute as any ever
> formulated; they would have set him free and surrounded him with a
> harem on whom to feast. But societies do not cater to strange tastes;
> they condemn them. Thus Sade became a writer. ^9^

Again, brutalities against women are somehow transposed, this time into
something less dangerous and less significant than writing. The victims
of Sade's sexual terrorism are less important than "philosophical
disquisitions. " This valuation is not the final result of any moral
anguish; it is entirely unselfconscious.

In tome after tome, Sade's biographers write the women Sade assaulted
in either invisible ink or spleen. Norman Gear, in The Divine
Demon

> Had he not been more than punished for his sins? And what, after all,
> had they amounted to? He had given a few girls and women a little
> pain, but not so much really, and none of them had been seriously
> harmed. He had seduced some girls, but he had never raped one. Most of
> the women he had used in his orgies had come to him willingly enough,
> for payment, or, oddly enough, because they liked him\.... Even poor
> Rose Keller had soon recovered from her thrashing, and had been very
> well rewarded for a week with a sore behind. As for the whores in
> Marseilles---they had been paid for their services and had not endured
> worse than it was their common lot to endure. ^10^

Jean Paulhan, a Sadean missionary, is outraged that Sade, a significant
being, should have been imprisoned for violating shadows:

> It seems established that Sade gave a spanking to a whore in Paris:
> does that fit with a year in jail? Some aphrodisiac sweets to some
> girls in Marseilles: does that justify ten
> years in the Bastille? He seduces his sister-in-law: does that justify
> a month in the Conciergerie? He causes no end of bother to his
> powerful, his redoubtable in-laws\... does that justify two years in a
> fortress? He enables several moderates to escape (we are in the midst
> of the Terror): does that justify a year in Madelonnettes? It is
> acknowledged that he published some obscene books, that he attacked
> Bonaparte's entourage; and it is not impossible that he feigned
> madness. Does that justify fourteen years in Charenton, three in
> Bicete, and one in Sainte-Pelagie? Would it not strongly appear as if,
> for a whole string of French governments, any and every excuse
> sufficed for clapping him behind bars? ^11^

Paulhan cites neither Sade's actual crimes nor his actual terms of
imprisonment; his version of the correspondences between the two is
entirely whimsical. But the consequences of his inexactitude are not:
Sade the Victim is writ large; Sade's victims are written out.

Sade's biographers attempt to justify, trivialize, or deny (even though
records confirming the facts exist) every assault Sade ever committed
against women and girls. Especially, tireless efforts are made to
discount the kidnapping and torture of Rose Keller, Sade's first
nonprostitute victim of record.

Violence against prostitutes, regardless of its ferocity, is nothing
less than an acceptable fact of life. Who, the biographers ask with mock
wonderment, can deny that these "girls" are there to be used? The man's
right to sexual pleasure on his own terms is the given, the natural
right. Sexual pleasure includes by definition or intrinsically justifies
the use of force, trickery, or violence. The cost to the prostitute's
health or well-being means nothing. Her own will has no value and no
claim to value. The use of force against prostitutes means less than
nothing. Freedom, that hallowed word, is valued only when used in
reference to male desire. For women, freedom means only that men are
free to use them.

In describing what is usually referred to as the Rose Keller
incident---a sublime euphemism---even Sade's biographers seem to
recognize that their hero did do something very mean indeed--- unless
Rose Keller was a whore or a liar, in which case Sade\'s use of her was
of no consequence. So they set out to prove that she was both, a task
made easy not by the truth (she was neither) but by the power of the
biographers to define their own terms within the accepted bounds of a
woman-hating society. Rose Keller was a whore because all women,
especially working-class women, are whores; Rose Keller was a whore
because any woman who is hungry or unemployed will whore; Rose Keller
was a whore because there is no absolute proof for every day of her life
that she was not a whore; Rose Keller was a whore because Sade said she
was a whore; Rose Keller was a whore because, after being tortured and
escaping, she accepted money from Sade's mother-in-law. Rose Keller was
a liar because all women are liars, especially when they accuse men of
forcing them to any sexual activity; Rose Keller was a liar because Sade
said she was a liar; Rose Keller was a liar because she accepted money,
which proved that she had made up the story to obtain money; Rose Keller
was a liar because who was she anyway compared to the heroic
Sade?

Hobart Ryland, the translator of Sade's Adelaide of
Brunswick into English, claimed that Keller "made up a
fantastic story. "^12^ Geoffrey Gorer shed doubt on Keller's credibility
by meticulous analysis of detail: "A woman so badly wounded would surely
have had some difficulty in climbing walls. "^,\ 13^ Thomas acknowledged
that "\g\rievous bodily harm had been done to the young woman, " and
he sternly admonished that "there was no question of excusing it even if
she was a whore. "^14^ Excusing it nonetheless, Thomas characterized
Sade's torture of Keller as "a rather disagreeable hour or two, and a
few minutes of actual discomfort not far removed in degree from a visit
to an eighteenth-century dentist. "^15^ The money made it all worthwhile
and "sensible men saw it in perspective and knew that it was just an
incident. "^16^ Ronald Hay man, author of a so-called critical
biography, strikes the same wretched note: "Scores of men were taking
their pleasure in very much the same way; scores of girls
\sic\, no doubt, were exploiting the situation for what it
was worth. Money was an effective pain-killer. "^17^ Angela Carter, in a
recent pseudofeminist literary essay, claims that Keller "turn\ed\ her
hand to blackmail and who can blame her? "^18^ Entering the realm of
literary affectation heretofore reserved for the boys, Carter
writes: "The affair enchants me. It has the completeness and lucidity of
a script by Brecht. A woman of the third estate, a beggar, the poorest
of the poor, turns the very vices of the rich into weapons to wound them
with. "^19^ Her flight of fancy nearly matches that of Hayman, who
warns:

> Again we should not take it for granted that Sade was enjoying
> himself. Was he even doing what he felt he wanted to do? As Gide said:
> "One can never know to what extent one feels and to what extent one
> plays at feeling. This ambivalence constitutes the feeling.
> "^20^

But it is Roland Barthes who most callously robs Rose Keller of her
real life in order to sustain Sade's legend in pretty, if meaningless,
prose:

> In the total disengagement from value produced by the pleasure of the
> Text, what I get from Sade's life is not the spectacle, albeit
> grandiose, of a man oppressed by an entire society because of his
> passion, it is not the solemn contemplation of a fate, it is,
> inter alia, that Provencal way in which Sade says "milli"
> (mademoiselle) Rousset, or milli Henriette, or milli Lepinai, it is
> his white muff when he accosts Rose Keller\... ^2I^

Sade's white muff matters.

All of the girls and women hurt by Sade are treated by biographers and
intellectuals with this same endemic contempt. An exchange of money,
male to female, especially wipes away crime, negates harm---whether the
commentator is a pedestrian biographer or a grand literary critic. The
use of money to buy women is apparently mesmerizing. It magically
licenses any crime against women. Once a woman has been paid, crime is
expiated. That no real harm was done, no matter what actually was done,
is a particularly important theme. This point is echoed in the Kinsey
Institute's study of sex offenders (see pages 188-198) and in a vast
body of contemporary social analyses that, explicitly or implicitly,
define sexual freedom as men doing what they want without foolish
resistance from "puritanical" or "repressed" women who are incapable of
knowing or telling sexual truth. According to Gear, the poisoned
prostitutes in Marseilles had "upset stomachs and were none the worse
for their adventures. "^22^ According to Thomas, the Marseilles
prostitutes, whom he acknowledges were poisoned, went to the police
because they "were only too anxious now to find a villain on whom all
their ills and all official disapproval could be placed. "^23^ According
to Hay man, "it was obvious that the poisoning was accidental\...
\Sade\ had no conceivable motive for wanting to murder them. "^24^ To
give credit where it is due: Edmund Wilson, in 1952, reacting to the
mindless defenses of Sade's crimes among the literati, asserted that
"there is not a shred of evidence for assuming that \the candies\ were
not intended, if not to kill the girls at
least to have painful results, and the, behavior of Sade himself, as
reported by one of the girls seems
decidedly to show that they were. "^25^ Once one has entered the realm
of existing discourse on Sade, Wilson's willingness to believe the
testimony of "one of the girls" is almost shocking.

The avenging wrath of Sadean sycophants is reserved, however, for
Madame de Montreuil, Sade's mother-in-law, the one woman who during his
lifetime tried to stop him. The critics' strategy with the unpropertied
victims is to erase them. Madame de Montreuil cannot be erased. She was
responsible for Sade's imprisonment in Italy, for the issuance of
several against him. She also, at
various stages of Sade's life, tried to buy him out of trouble, to
reconcile Sade to his marriage and to his wife. As an active woman, a
mother, one who took action to restrict the cruel indulgences of a male,
Madame de Montreuil's life monumentally insults Sade's biographers.
According to Gorer, "her one aim was de Sade's destruction. "^26^ He
also speculates that she was jealous of Sade's relationship with her
younger daughter; this jealousy "drove her to attack and ruin him to the
best of her ability during the next thirty years. "^27^ According to the
various biographers: Madame de Montreuil lusted for Sade but he refused
her; had nothing to do with her time and therefore turned to intrigues
against her son-in-law; was a vengeful and sadistic woman who chose Sade
as her victim; had a thin skin and resented the endless gossip about
Sade's various atrocities, and therefore tried to have the state murder
him; lusted after her younger daughter, whom Sade took from her; had to
marry off her younger daughter, with which Sade interfered; was ruthless
and evil because women who meddle in the affairs of men are. Edmund
Wilson demonstrates some charity in stating: "No: one cannot blame
Sade's family for locking him up. "^28^ But Madame de Montreuil, mother
of two daughters who were both ruined by Sade, caretaker of his children
in the years when Renee-Pelagie lived with Sade as a participant in his
crimes, is not redeemed by any critic's vague sympathy. In the
literature on Sade, she is the villain, the one who was cruel, the one
who abused power, the one who was sadistic, the one who was dangerous,
the one who should have been stopped.

Throughout the writings on Sade, his own mother and Renee-Pelagie are
insulted in a lethargic and haphazard way. Other women were more
important to Sade; his literary friends are happy to have the same set
of priorities. Those incapable of imagining the suffering of one who has
been kidnapped and tortured, poisoned and raped, cannot be expected to
grasp the long-term, complex suffering of women in legal captivity.
Sade's mother is especially blamed for withdrawing into religion. She is
also blamed for dying, since Sade was arrested when he attempted to
visit her on her deathbed. Renee-Pelagie is especially blamed for
leaving Sade and for burning some of his manuscripts, which she may or
may not have done. She is also blamed for aging, becoming fat, going
blind. She is also blamed for being sexually repressed, that is, not
particularly eager to satisfy Sade's appetites. She is not blamed for
her years of loyalty to Sade, her efforts to keep him out of prison, her
attempts to have her mother arrested, or her participation with Sade in
the sexual and physical torture of five fifteen-year-old girls. Sade's
violence against Renee-Pelagie, as opposed to his violence against other
women, was fully sanctioned by the law. As her husband, he had the
authority to do what he wanted to her. He also had the authority to
spend her money, which he did. The savagery of his life created the
strange desperation of hers. The nightmare of her life has been lost in
the celebration of his.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

> Repeat the syllables\
> until the lesson is pumped through the heart:\
> Nicriven,accused of lasciviousness, burned 1569.\
> Barbara Gobel described by her jailors\
>    as "the fairest maid in Wurzburg\
>    burned 1629, age nineteen.\
> Frau Peller, raped by Inquisition torturers\
>    because her sister refused\
>    the witch-judge Franz Buirman, 1631.\
> Maria Walburga Rung, tried at a secular court\
>    in Manheim as a witch\
>    released as "merely a prostitute\
>    accused again by the episcopal court\
>    at Eichstadt, tortured into confession,\
>    and then burned alive, 1723,age twenty-two.

> What have they done to me?

Robin Morgan,\
"The Network of the Imaginary Mother"

Camus captured the essence of Sade's legend when he wrote: "His
desperate demand for freedom led Sade into the kingdom of servitude\...
"^29^ Throughout the literature on him, with some small qualifying
asides, Sade is viewed as one whose voracious appetite was for
freedom; this appetite was cruelly punished by an unjust and
repressive society. The notion is that Sade, called by Apollinaire "that
freest of spirits to have lived so far, "'^0^ was a monster as the word
used to be defined: something unnaturally marvelous. Sade's violation of
sexual and social boundaries, in his writings and in his life, is seen
as inherently revolutionary. The antisocial character of his sexuality
is seen as a radical challenge to a society deadly in its repressive
sexual conventions. Sade is seen as an outlaw in the mythic sense, a
grand figure of rebellion in action and in literature whose sexual
hunger, like a terrorist's bomb, threatened to blow apart the
established order. The imprisonment of Sade is seen to demonstrate the
despotism of a system that must contain, control, and manipulate
sexuality, not allow it to run free toward anarchic self-fulfillment.
Sade is seen as the victim of that cruel System, as one who was punished
because of the bravery of his antagonism to it. The legend of Sade is
particularly vitalized by the false claim, widely believed, that he
rotted in prison for most of his life as punishment for obscene
writings. Sade's story is generally thought to be this: he was a genius
whose mind was too big for the petty puritans around him; he was locked
up for his sexual abandonment, especially in writing; he was kept in
jail because nothing less could defuse the danger he presented to the
established order; he was victimized, unjustly imprisoned, persecuted,
for daring to express radical sexual values in his life and in his
writing; as "that freest of spirits to have lived so far, " his very
being was an insult to a system that demanded conformity. It was left to
Erica Jong to insist in an article in ("You
Have to Be Liberated to Laugh") that Sade was jailed for his sense of
humor.

Writers on Sade are fascinated by both his life and his work, and it is
impossible to know whether Sade's legend could have been sustained if
one had existed without the other. Edmund Wilson, repelled by fade's
work, is fascinated by his life. Simone de Beauvoir, repelled by Sade's
life, is fascinated by his work. Most of the writers on Sade advocate
rather than analyze him, are infatuated with him as a subject precisely
because his sexual obsessions are both forbidden and common. The books
and essays on Sade are crusading, romanticizing, mystifying in the
literal sense (that is, intentionally perplexing to the mind). Infused
with a missionary passion, they boil down to this: Sade died for
you---for all the sexual crimes you have committed, for all the sexual
crimes you want to commit, for every sexual crime you can imagine
committing. Sade suffered because he did what you want to do; he was
imprisoned as you might be imprisoned. The "you" is masculine. The
freedom Sade is credited with demanding is freedom as men conceive it.
Sade's suffering or victimization, whatever its cause or degree, is
authentic because a man experienced it (Sade in being imprisoned, the
writers in morbid contemplation of a man brought down). No woman's life
has ever been so adored; no woman's suffering has ever been so mourned;
no woman's ethic, action, or obsession has been so hallowed in the male
search for the meaning of freedom.\*

\\*"\And\ no woman's{.font3
style="font-size: medium; font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}crime"{.font3
style="font-size: medium; font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}wrote
Robin Morgan to me in a letter, July 20, 1979, "for that matter, has
(sure as hell) ever been so justified, excused, romanticized,
glamorized."\{.font3
style="font-size: medium; font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}\


The essential content of Sade's legend was created by Sade himself,
especially in his prison letters and in the rambling philosophical
discourses that permeate his fiction. Maurice Heine, a Left libertarian,
and his disciple Gilbert Lely, the first so-called Sade scholars,
rewrote Sade's elaborate self-justifications, in the process transmuting
them into accepted fact. Sade wrote his own legend; Heine and Lely
resurrected it; subsequent writers paraphrased, defended, and
embellished it.

In the letters, Sade is militant, with the pride of one martyred in
righteousness: "Misfortune will never debase me\..., " he wrote to
Renee-Pelagie from Vincennes in 1781. "Nor will I ever take a slave's
heart. Were these wretched chains to lead me to the grave, you will
always see me the same. I have the misfortune to have received from
Heaven a resolute soul which has never been able to yield and will never
do so. I have absolutely no fear of offending anyone."^31^

It was Sade who painted the picture of Madame de Montreuil that his
biographers now turn out, without the master's touch, by the dozens. As
Sade wrote: "This terrible torture is not enough according to this
horrible creature: it has to be increased further by everything her
imagination can devise to redouble its horror. You will admit there is
only one monster capable of taking vengeance to such a point.
"^32^

Sade's defense of everything he ever did is very simple: he never did
anything wrong. This defense has two distinct parts. First, he did not
do anything he was accused of doing that might
warrant imprisonment, because no one could prove that he did,
including eyewitnesses whose word could never match his own: "A child's
testimony? But this was a servant; thus, in his capacity as a child and
as a servant he cannot be believed. "^31^ Second, everything he had done
was common practice. These two contradictory strains of self-defense
often fuse to reveal the Sade obscured by his mesmerized apologists.
Here he defends himself, again to his wife, vis-a-vis his abuse of the
five fifteen-year-old girls originally procured by Nanon, who later bore
his child:

> I go off with them; I use them. Six months later, some parents come
> along to demand their return. I give them back \he did not\, and
> suddenly a charge of abduction and rape is brought against me. It is a
> monstrous injustice. The law on this point is \... as follows: it is
> expressly forbidden in France for any procuress to supply virgin
> maidens, and if the girl supplied is a virgin and lodges a complaint,
> it is not the man who is charged but the procuress who is punished
> severely on the spot. But even if the male offender has requested a
> virgin he is not liable to punishment: he is merely doing what all men
> do. It is, I repeat, the procuress who provided him with the girl and
> who is perfectly aware that she is expressly forbidden to do so, who
> is guilty. Therefore this first charge against me in Lyon of abduction
> and rape was entirely illegal: I have committed no offence. It is the
> procuress to whom I have applied who is liable to punishment---not I.
> ^34^

The use of women, as far as Sade was concerned, was an absolute right,
one that could not fairly be limited or abrogated under any
circumstances. His outrage at being punished for his assaults on females
never abated. His claim to innocence rested finally on a simple
assertion: "I am guilty of nothing more than simple libertinage such as
it is practised by all men more or less according to their natural
temperaments or tendencies. "^35^ Sade's fraternal ties were apparent
only when he used the crimes of other men to justify his own.

Sade designated "libertinage" as the main theme of his work. Richard
Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse, in a foreword to a collection of
Sade's work, point out with grave emphasis that "libertine" comes from
the Latin, which means "free. " In fact,
originally a libertine was a manumitted slave. Sade's use of the word
contradicts its early meaning, despite the claim of his sycophantic
translators. For Sade, libertinage was the cruel use of others for one's
own sexual pleasure. Sade's libertinage demanded slavery; sexual
despotism misnamed "freedom" is Sade's most enduring legacy.

Sade's work is nearly indescribable. In sheer quantity of horror, it is
unparalleled in the history of writing. In its fanatical and fully
realized commitment to depicting and reveling in torture and murder to
gratify lust, it raises the question so central to pornography as a
genre: why? why did someone do (make) this? In Sade's case, the motive
most often named is revenge against a society that persecuted him. This
explanation does not take into account the fact that Sade was a sexual
predator and that the pornography he created was part of that
predation.

It is not adequate to describe Sade's ethic as rapist. For Sade, rape
was a modest, not fully gratifying mode of violation. In Sade's work,
rape is foreplay, preparation for the main event, which is maiming unto
death. Rape is an essential dimension because force is fundamental to
Sade's conception of sexual action. But over time, with repetition, it
pales, becomes boring, a stupendous waste of energy unless accompanied
by the torture, and often the murder, of the victim. Sade is the
consummate literary snuff artist: orgasm eventually requires murder.
Victims are sliced up, impaled on stakes, burned alive, roasted slowly
on spits, eaten, decapitated, flayed until they die. Women's vaginas and
rectums are sewn up to be torn through. Women are used as tables on
which burning food is served, on which candles are burned. One would
require the thousands of pages Sade himself used to list the atrocities
he described. Nevertheless, some themes emerge.

In Sade's fiction, men, women, boys and girls are used, violated,
destroyed. At the top, in control, are the libertines, mostly old men,
aristocrats, powerful by virtue of gender, wealth, position, and
cruelty. Sade describes the sexuality of these men essentially as
addiction: each sex act contributes to the development of a tolerance;
that is, arousal requires more cruelty each time, orgasm requires more
cruelty each time; victims must increase in abjectness and numbers both.
Everyone inferior to the aristocrats on top in wealth, in social status,
or in her or his capacity for cruelty becomes sexual\' fodder. Wives,
daughters, and mothers are particularly singled out for ridicule,
humiliation, and contempt. Servants of both sexes and female prostitutes
are the main population of the abused, dismembered, executed. Lesbian
acts decorate the slaughter; they are imagined by a man for men; they
are so male-imagined that the divine fuck imbued with murder is their
only possible resolution.

In the bulk of Sade's work, female victims greatly outnumber male
victims, but his cruelty is all-inclusive. He manifests a pansexual
dominance---the male who knows no boundaries but still hates women
more.

While the aristocrats on top are never maimed, they are, at their own
command, whipped and sodomized. They remain entirely in control even
when whipped or sodomized. Everything done to them or by them is for the
purpose of bringing them to orgasm on their own terms. Sade established
impotence as a characteristic of the aging libertine: viler and viler
crimes are necessary to achieve erection and ejaculation. George
Steiner, perhaps to his credit, fails to appreciate the significance of
the progression of lust in Sade's work, especially in The 120
Days of Sodom: "In short: given the physiological and nervous
complexion of the human body, the numbers of ways in which orgasm can be
achieved or arrested, the total modes of intercourse are fundamentally
finite. The mathematics of sex stop somewhere in the region of
soixante-neuf; there are no transcendental series. "^36^
Displaying his own brand of misogyny, Steiner goes on to say that
"things have remained fairly generally the same since man first met goat
and woman. "^37^ But Sade is saying precisely that men become sated too
soon with what they have had, whatever it is, especially woman, also
goat.

In Sade's fiction, the men on top exchange and share victims in an
attempt to forge a community based on a common, if
carnivorous, sexuality. The shared victim results in the
shared orgasm, a bond among the male characters and between the author
and his male readers.

The men on top also share the shit of the victims. They control
elimination and physical cleanliness, a stratagem that suggests the Nazi
death camps. They eat turds and control the diets of their victims to
control the quality of the turds. While Freudian values apply here---the
anal being indicative of greed, of obsession with material
wealth---excrement, like blood, like flesh itself, is ingested because
these men have gone beyond vampirism toward a sexuality that is entirely
cannibalistic.

Much is made of the fact that two of Sade's main characters, Justine
and Juliette, are women. Juliette especially is cited as an emancipated
woman because she takes to maiming and murder with all the spectacular
ease of Sade's male characters; she is the one who knows how to take
pleasure, how to transform pain into pleasure, slavery into freedom. It
is, Sade's literary friends claim, a matter of
attitude: here we have Justine, raped, tortured, violated,
and she hates it, so she is a victim; here we have Juliette, raped,
tortured, violated, and she loves it, so she is free. As expressed by
Roland Barthes:

> The scream is the victim's mark; she makes herself a victim because
> she chooses to scream; if, under the same vexation she were to
> ejaculate she would cease to be a victim,
> would be transformed into a libertine: to scream! to
> discharge, this paradigm is the beginning of choice, i. e.
> Sadian meaning.^,\ 8^

"Sadian meaning, " then, reduces to the more familiar preachment: if
you can't do anything about it (and I will see to it that you cannot),
lie back and enjoy it. In the critical writings on Sade's pornography,
rape in the criminal sense exists mainly as a subjective value judgment
of the one who was used, to whom hysteria is always attributed. Women,
according to Sade, Barthes, and their ilk, can and should choose to
experience the rape of women as men experience it: as pleasure.

Sade's view of women was hailed by Apollinaire as prophetic: "Justine
is woman as she has been hitherto, enslaved, miserable and less than
human; her opposite, Juliette, represents the woman whose advent he
anticipated, a figure of whom minds have as yet no conception, who is
arising out of mankind, who shall have wings, and who shall renew the
world. "'^9^

Justine and Juliette are the two prototypical female figures in male
pornography of all types. Both are wax dolls into which things are
stuck. One suffers and is provocative in her suffering. The more she
suffers, the more she provokes men to make her suffer. Her suffering is
arousing; the more she suffers, the more aroused her torturers become.
She, then, becomes responsible for her suffering, since she invites it
by suffering. The other revels in all that men do to her; she is the
woman who likes it, no matter what the "it. " In Sade, the "attitude"
(to use Barthes's word) on which one's status as victim or master
depends is an attitude toward male power. The victim actually refuses to
ally herself with male power, to take on its values as her own. She
screams, she refuses. Men conceptualize this resistance as conformity to
ridiculous feminine notions about purity and goodness; whereas in fact
the victim refuses to ally herself with those who demand her complicity
in her own degradation. Degradation is implicit in inhabiting a
predetermined universe in which one cannot choose what one does, only
one's attitude (to scream, to discharge) toward what is done to one.
Unable to manifest her resistance as power, the woman who suffers
manifests it as passivity, except for the scream.

The so-called libertine re-creates herself in the image of the crudest
(most powerful) man she can find and in her alliance with him takes on
some of his power over others. The female libertines in Sade's work are
always subordinate to their male counterparts, always dependent on them
for wealth and continued good health. They have female anatomies by
fiat; that is, Sade says so. In every other respect---values, behaviors,
tastes, even in such a symptomatic detail as ejaculating sperm, which
they all do---Sade's libertine women are men. They are, in fact,
literary transvestites.

Sade himself, in a footnote to, claimed an
authenticity for Juliette based on his conviction that women are more
malevolent than men:.. the more sensitive an individual, the more
sharply this atrocious Nature will bend him into conformance with evil's
irresistible laws; whence it is that women surrender to it more heatedly
and perform it with greater artistry than men. "^40^ The message that
women are evil and must be punished permeates Sade's work, whether the
female figures in question are supposed to represent good or evil. The
vileness of women and an intense hatred of female genitalia are major
themes in every Sadean opus. Both male and female characters evince a
deep aversion to and loathing of the vagina. Anal penetration is not
only preferred; often the vagina must be hidden for the male to be
aroused at all. Sade's female libertines are eloquent on the inferiority
of the vagina to the rectum. While boys and men are used in Sade's lust
murders, women are excoriated for all the characteristics that
distinguish them from men. In Sade's scheme of things, women are
aggressively slaughtered because women are repulsive as both biological
and emotional beings. The arrogance of women in claiming any rights over
their own bodies is particularly offensive to Sade. Any uppity pretense
to bodily integrity on a woman's part must be fiercely and horribly
punished. Even where Sade, in one or two places, insists on women's
right to abort pregnancies at will, his sustained celebration of
abortion as erotically charged murder places abortion squarely within
the context of his own utterly and unredeemably male value system: in
this system, women have no bodily rights.

A religious scholar, John T. Noonan, Jr., names Sade as "the first in
Western Europe to praise abortion\... "^41^ Citing Noonan, Linda Bird
Francke, in, claims that
Sade's advocacy of abortion was instrumental in the papal decision that
abortion must be prohibited from gestation on. Characterizing Sade's
work as part of the proabortion movement, she asserts that Sade
"actually extolled the values of abortion. "^42^ Sade extolled the
sexual value of murder and he saw abortion as a form of murder. For
Sade, abortion was a sexual act, an act of lust. In his system,
pregnancy always demanded murder, usually the murder\* of the pregnant
woman, rendered more exciting if she was in an advanced stage of
pregnancy. Nothing could be calculated to please Sade more than the
horrible deaths of women butchered in illegal abortions. This is Sade's
sexuality realized.

In Sade's work, both male and female children are maimed, raped,
tortured, killed. Men especially go after their daughters, sometimes
raising them specifically to become paramours, most often abusing them
and then passing them on to close male friends to be used and killed.
Sade's obsession with sexual violence against children of both sexes is
transformed by his literary lackeys, true to form, into another
demonstration of Sade's progressive sexual radicalism. As Geoffrey Gorer
wrote: "According to de Sade, very young children are shameless,
sexually inquisitive and endowed with strong sexual feelings. Children
are naturally polymorphous perverts. "^43^ Actually, according to Sade,
adult men find it particularly gratifying to kidnap, rape, torture, and
kill children.

Sade is concerned too with the violation of the mother---not only as
wife to her husband but also as victim of her children. A constant
conceit throughout Sade's fiction is that fathers are wondrous sexual
beings, mothers stupid and repressed prudes who would be better off as
whores (or as the whores they really are). As a philosopher, Sade
maintains consistently that one owes nothing to one's mother, for the
father is the source of human life:

> \... Be unafraid, Eugenie \the heroine\, and adopt these same
> sentiments; they are natural: uniquely formed of our sires' blood, we
> owe absolutely nothing to our mothers. What, furthermore, did they do
> but co-operate in the act which our fathers, on the contrary,
> solicited? Thus, it was the father who desired our birth, whereas the
> mother merely consented thereto. ^44^

Contempt for the mother is an integral part of Sade's
discourse:

> It is madness to suppose one owes something to one's mother. And upon
> what, then, would gratitude be based? Is one to be thankful that she
> discharged when someone once fucked her?
> ^45^

A daughter's turning on her mother, forcing her mother to submit to
rape and torture, defaming and debasing her mother, and finally
luxuriating in the killing of her mother is a crucial Sadean
scenario.

Sade's ideas on women and sexual freedom are explicated throughout his
work. He has few ideas about women and sexual freedom and no fear of
repetition. Women are meant to be prostitutes: "\... your sex never
serves Nature better than when it prostitutes itself to ours; that 'tis,
in a word, to be fucked that you were born.. In rape a man exercises his
natural rights over women:

> If then it becomes incontestable that we have received from Nature
> the right indiscriminately to express our wishes to all women, it
> likewise becomes incontestable that we have the right to compel their
> submission, not exclusively, for I should then be contradicting
> myself, but temporarily \the doctrine of "nonpossessiveness"\. It
> cannot be denied that we have the right to decree laws that compel
> woman to yield to the flames of him who would have her; violence
> itself being one of that right's effects, we can employ it lawfully.
> ^47^

Sade pioneered what became the ethos of the male-dominated sexual
revolution: collective ownership of women by men, no woman ever
justified in refusal. Sade took these ideas to their logical conclusion:
state brothels in which all females would be forced to serve from
childhood on. The idea of unrestricted access to an absolutely available
female population, there to be raped, to which one could do anything,
has gripped the male imagination, especially on the Left, and has been
translated into the euphemistic demand for "free sex, free women. " The
belief that this urge toward unrestrained use of women is revolutionary
brings into bitter focus the meaning of "sexual freedom" in leftist
sexual theory and practice. Sade says: use women because women exist to
be used by men; do what you want to them for your own pleasure, no
matter what the cost to them. Following leftist tradition, Peter Weiss,
in the play known as paraphrased Sade in
this happily disingenuous way: "And what's the point of a
revolution/without general copulation.
"^48^

In a variation of leftist theme, Christopher Lasch, in The
Culture of Narcissism, sees Sade not as the originator of a
new ethic of sexual collectivity, but as one who foresaw the fall of the
bourgeois family with its "sentimental cult of womanhood"^49^ and the
fall of capitalism itself. According to Lasch, Sade anticipated a
"defense of woman's sexual rights---their
rights to dispose of their own bodies, as feminists would put it
today\... He perceived, more clearly than the feminists, that all
freedoms under capitalism come in the end to the same thing, the same
universal obligation to enjoy and be enjoyed. "^50^ Lasch's particular,
and peculiar, interpretation of Sade appears to derive from his stubborn
misunderstanding of sexual integrity as feminists envision it. In Sade's
universe, the obligation to enjoy is extended to women as the obligation
to enjoy being enjoyed---failing which, sex remains what it was, as it
was: a forced passage to death. The notion that Sade presages feminist
demands for women's sexual rights is rivaled in self-serving absurdity
only by the opinion of Gerald and Caroline Greene, in S-M: The
Last Taboo, that "\i\f there was one thing de Sade was not,
it was a sexist. "^51^

De Beauvoir had understood that "\t\he fact is that the original
intuition which lies at the basis of Sade's entire sexuality, and hence
his ethic, is the fundamental identity of coition and cruelty. "^52^
Camus had understood that "\t\wo centuries ahead of time and on a
reduced scale \compared to Stalinists and Nazis\, Sade extolled
totalitarian societies in the name of unbridled freedom\... "^53^
Neither they nor Sade's less conscientious critics perceived that Sade's
valuation of women has been the one constant in history--- imagined and
enacted---having as its consequence the destruction of real lives; that
Sade's advocacy and celebration of rape and battery have been history's
sustaining themes. Sade's spectacular endurance as a cultural force has
been because of, not despite, the virulence of the sexual violence
toward women in both his work and his life. Sade's work embodies the
common values and desires of men. Described in terms of its "excesses, "
as it often is, the power of Sade's work in exciting the
imaginations of men is lost. Nothing in Sade's work takes place outside
the realm of common male belief. In story and discourse, Sade's
conception of romance is this: "I've already told you: the only way to a
woman's heart is along the path of torment. I know none other as
sure."^54^ Sade's conception of sexuality is
this:

> \... there is no more selfish passion than lust; none that is severer
> in its demands; smitten stiff by desire, 'tis with yourself you must
> be solely concerned, and as for the object that serves you, it must
> always be considered as some sort of victim, destined to that
> passion's fury. Do not all passions require victims? ^55^

These convictions are ordinary, expressed often in less grand language,
upheld in their rightness by the application of male-supremacist law
especially in the areas of rape, battery, and reproduction; they are
fully consonant with the practices (if not the preachments) of ordinary
men with ordinary women. Had Sade's work---boring, repetitive, ugly as
it is---not embodied these common values, it would long ago have been
forgotten. Had Sade himself---a sexual terrorist, a sexual tyrant---not
embodied in his life these same values, he would not have excited the
twisted, self-righteous admiration of those who have portrayed him as
revolutionary, hero, martyr (or, in the banal prose of Richard Gilman,
"the first compelling enunciator in modern times of the desire to be
other than what society determined, to act otherwise than existing moral
structures coerced one into doing"^56^).

Sade's importance, finally, is not as dissident or deviant: it is as
Everyman, a designation the power-crazed aristocrat would have found
repugnant but one that women, on examination, will find true. In Sade,
the authentic equation is revealed: the power of the pornographer is the
power of the rapist/batterer is the power of the man.



::: 
4\
:::

Objects

> The creation of a rich and dependable object world; the building-in
> of secure sequences of behavioral time; the comfortable mastery of
> space; firm links between the acting organism and the external world;
> all of these add up to solid answers to our four common human
> problems. "What shall I do? What may I hope? What can I know?
> What

Ernest Becker,

> I was so drunk all the time that I took bottles for girls and girls
> for bottles.

Anton Chekhov, in a letter, April 25, 1887

> A sex toy is anything that isn't you when you're having whatever it
> is you define as sex.

Ian Young, quoted in "Devices and Desires, " by Gerald Hannon,
The Body Politic

> There is something every woman wears around her neck on a thin chain
> of fear---an amulet of madness. For each of us, there exists somewhere
> a moment of insult so intense that she will reach up and rip the
> amulet off, even if the chain tears at the flesh of her neck.

Robin Morgan, "Goodbye to All That, "

Through most of patriarchal history, which is estimated variously to
have lasted (thus far) five thousand to twelve thousand years, women
have been chattel property. Chattel property, in the main, is movable
property---cattle, wives, concubines, offspring, slaves, beasts of
burden, domesticated animals. Chattel property is reckoned as part of a
man's estate. It is wealth and accumulations of it both are wealth and
demonstrate wealth. Chattel property for the most part is animate and
sensate, but it is perceived and valued as commodity. To be chattel,
even when human, is to be valued and used as property, as
thing.

It is fashionable to think that women, who have come a long way, baby,
are entirely removed from chattel status. It is fashionable to think
that the chattel status of women is ancient, buried with the old cities
of defunct civilizations. But in the United States and England, married
women were economic chattel through most of the nineteenth century.
Married women were allowed to own property---which meant that they
themselves were considered persons, not property---toward the end of the
nineteenth century, but that right was made effectual only in the first
decades of the twentieth century. In some states in the United States,
married women still cannot engage in some economic transactions without
the consent or participation of their husbands.

In the areas of sex and reproduction, the chattel status of women is
preserved in law and in practice. A married woman is obligated to engage
in coitus with her husband. He, not she, controls access to her body.
With few exceptions, a married woman cannot be raped by her husband as
rape is legally defined, because marriage means that the husband has a
legal right to coital access. When women were clearly and unambiguously
sexual chattel, the wife could be "chastised" by her husband at
will---whipped, flogged, caned, hit, tied up, locked up---to punish her
for real or imagined bad behavior or to improve her character. The bad
behavior, then as now, was often an attempt to refuse the husband sexual
access. The English suffragists thought a new era had arrived when, in
1891, a court set limits to the force a husband could use against his
wife. As Sylvia Pankhurst recorded:

> The Jackson case of 1891, described by the Law
> TimesMarried Woman's Charter of personal
> liberty, " wherein it
> was decided that a husband
> might not imprison his wife to enforce his conjugal rights, was
> eagerly hailed, and was an evidence of the change which was coming
> over opinion in general. ^1^

But the general opinion did not change, not in England, not in the
United, States. Today there are laws against battery, which so often
includes both captivity and rape: unenforced laws. In practice, assault
and battery of a wife by a husband is both commonplace and protected by
a male-supremacist system that, in its heart of hearts, still views the
wife's body as her husband's sexual property; and, needless to say, the
rape part of any battery is almost never against the law at all. Using
FBI statistics, feminists calculate that in the United States one woman
is raped every three minutes, one wife battered every eighteen seconds.
There are currently an estimated twenty-eight million battered wives in
the United States. In thirteen states, the right of marital rape has
been extended by statute to cohabitation. In five of those states, a man
who rapes a so-called is
partially protected by statute. In one of those states, West Virginia,
he is fully protected. In only three states is the right of a husband to
rape fully abrogated. The right to obtain an abortion at will, defined
as a right of privacy by the United States Supreme Court in 1973, has
been limited in some states by a requirement of male consent, despite a
subsequent 1976 Supreme Court decision holding that no one has a right
to exercise veto power over a woman's decision to abort. The chattel
status of women, especially married women, is not yet dead. It is not
even vestigial, some useless and unusable remain which long ago lost its
function or importance. It is still central in fixing male sexual and
reproductive control of women.

With this formidable history and ongoing reality of women as sexual
property, it is not surprising that men conspicuously view themselves as
authentic persons and the others clustered around them, especially their
sexual intimates, especially women and children, as objects.

The tradition of regarding sensate beings as objects is now
particularly honored, even enforced, in psychiatry and
psychology. The whole world outside man himself is viewed as
the object world, a series of things to which man/men must learn to
relate. This project of learning to relate to objects outside himself
is, needless to say, awesomely difficult but nevertheless necessary
because, as Ernest Becker, a so-called humanist in the realm of
psychology, puts it:.. we know that man needs objects in order to come
into being as an organism, and subsequently in order to provide for
continuing action and experience. The organism needs objects in order to
feel its own powers and presence. "^2^ Man, the organism in question,
uses objects---women, children, animals (cattle are still
important---the myth of the cowboy), sensate beings called objects as a
matter of course---to feel own power and
presence. The use of the word to characterize
persons who are not adult men is considered normative and appropriate.
Psychologists do not make a distinction between men who relate to
persons as such and men who relate to persons as objects. Instead, they
consider it appropriate to relate to some persons as objects,
inappropriate to relate to other persons as objects, and inappropriate
to relate to some objects as sexual objects. One of the reasons that
male homosexuality is so disreputable in the realm of psychology is that
it is deemed inappropriate for a man to relate to another man as an
object, the only sexual response possible in the male sexual system as
it now stands. A man must function as the human center of a
chattel-oriented sensibility, surrounded by objects to be used so that
he can experience his own power and presence. He must not reduce himself
to the level of women, for instance, by becoming an object for another
man. This degrades the whole male sex, which is inappropriate.

The notion that appropriate responses to appropriate objects signify
the mentally healthy male enables Becker to write:

> \... the schizophrenic, who relates to people only on the basis of
> their sex, is not showing a hypersexuality so much as a poverty in the
> behavioral range: he reduces the object to that aspect with which he
> can cope. ^1^

Though Becker suggests that viewing women merely as vaginas is not
wonderful, the nearly universal reduction of women to sex ("that aspect
with which he can cope") in psychology or in high culture or among his
peers does not, apparently, indicate a poverty of behavior. Becker
himself, of course, does not show a poverty of behavior in reducing
persons to objects because that is normal, neutral, and not reductive.
"One's whole life, " Becker claims, "is an education in broadening his
range of behavior to objects. "^4^ So, too, Christopher Lasch
characterizes the contemporary run of patients seen by psychologists as
shallow because of their inadequate response to objects:

> These patients, though often ingratiating, tend to cultivate a
> protective shallowness in emotional relations. They lack the capacity
> to mourn, because the intensity of their rage against lost love
> objects, in particular against their parents, prevents their reliving
> happy experiences or treasuring them in memory. ^5^

Lasch himself, of course, is not shallow in regarding loved persons, in
particular one's parents, as "love objects. " The mourning of a lost
object does not seem to Lasch either shallow or futile.

The first object in a male's personal history and in cultural
importance is the mother. It is in properly internalizing her as an
object that the male learns everything from heterosexuality to
heterosexuality (homosexuality being generally regarded as a failure to
learn), including: how to be a separate human being, that is, how to
separate from the first object; how to possess suitable objects that are
appropriate substitutes for the first object; and what to expect from an
object by way of care and devotion, including being kept clean, fed,
groomed, smiled at, and humored. According to Mahler, Pine, and Bergman,
who use the standard vocabulary: "The establishment of affective
(emotional) object constancy depends upon the gradual internalization of
a constant, positively cathected, inner image of the mother."^6^ The
inability "to use the mother as a real external object as a basis for
developing a stable sense of separateness from, and relatedness to, the
world of reality"^7^ may well be responsible for psychosis (autism and
schizophrenia) in children. Even when the first object does her duty and
by divine grace manages to get the infant positively cathected to an
inner image of her while being an external reality from which he can
separate and through which he can relate to the whole world of reality,
still, according to Becker, the infant/he will not be happy: "The
infant's long period of helpless dependence fills him with one great
anxiety: the anxiety of object-loss, the fear of losing the succoring
maternal object. "^8^ This clarifies, at least, the sense in which the
object is alive: she is an object that/who succors, which, in its Latin
past, meant "runs to help. " He is afraid that he will lose the object
that runs to help: and here one finds the chattel sense of motherhood as
it resonates in the modem realm of male-supremacist psychology---she is
the first object that belongs to the male in his life, movable property
that runs to help.

Like any human chattel without a revolution in which to fight, her
rebellions will be personal, small, sometimes mean, and relatively
ineffectual. Since the infant/he is dependent on her---as masters are on
servants and slaves---she will subvert her male child's rights over her,
his very masculinity, to make him less her master and more her equal.
The indignity implicit in the futile effort of this actual adult to
establish an equal authenticity with the infant dependent on her should
be obvious. She will have the bizarre idea that she is an adult person,
an idea that prohibits the demands of service required of her as a
mother in a male-supremacist context. She will perhaps think that the
child, as he grows, will come to know and love her for herself, for her
own qualities as a person. But the father and/or the society built on
his real power will step in and destroy the subversion inherent in this
idea by requiring her son to define himself in opposition to her, as her
opposite. He cannot have her qualities; she cannot have his. If he is to
be a person, she must be regarded as an object. She will be damned and
cursed for any attempt, small or large, to step outside the bounds of
this valuation of her; and the boy will be encouraged to carry out the
male revenge on her. As Bettelheim counsels:

> There is no need for the child to repress \revenge\ fantasies; on
> the contrary, he can enjoy them to the fullest, if he is subtly guided
> to direct them to a target which is close enough to the true
> parent but clearly not his parent. What more suitable object of
> vengeful thoughts than the person who has usurped the parent's place:
> the fairy-story step-parent? If one vents vicious fantasies of revenge
> against such an evil usurper, there is no reason to feel guilty or
> need to fear retaliation, because that figure clearly deserves it\....
> Thus, the fairy story permits the child to have the best of both
> worlds; he can fully engage in and enjoy revenge fantasies about the
> step-parent of the story, without any guilt or fear in respect to the
> true parent. ^9^

Notice the incredible obfuscation of gender: which fairy tales involve
a wicked stepfather? The male child is encouraged to learn that the
mothering female is wicked and is a "suitable object of vengeful
thoughts"; he is encouraged to enjoy fantasies of revenge against this
figure who is more like his mother than she is like anyone else;
ideally, he will not feel guilt or fear. The strategy endorsed by
Bettelheim with reference to fairy tales is basic to children's stories
of all sorts: the male child is taught to experience his mother not as
she is but as an object with symbolic meaning. The adult male never
seems to move beyond the boy enjoying his fantasies of revenge on a
female object, except in one respect: he acts, using real women. Still
calling revenge fantasy, he acts.

The way in which the adult male acts was described with sublime
understatement and delicacy by pseudofeminist Havelock Ellis: "She is,
on the physical side, inevitably the instrument in love; it must be his
hand and his bow which evoke the music. "^10^ Rabid antifeminists
Ferdinand Lundberg and Marynia F. Farnham make the same point with less
elegance:

> Here, we should again like to point out to female egalitarians, is a
> good place to ponder this fact: for the male, sex involves an
> objective act of his doing but for the female it does not. As an act
> in which he is playing the leading role (leading, that is, within the
> confines of the copulatory process) it is both superficially and
> deeply important to the male that it be carried out without faltering.
> Any failure to carry through the act is
> failure, not the woman's. Her role is passive. It is not as easy
> as falling off a log for her. It is easier. It is as easy as
> being the log itself. \"

Does one (female) prefer to be perhaps a violin or definitely a log?
This is the range of choice. It is also the range of political
difference in the sexual philosophies of "profeminist" and antifeminist
psychologists: one side insists that in the physical act of love a woman
is an unspecified stringed instrument; the other side insists that in
the copulatory process a woman is a log. Male-defined discourse is full
of such knotty and poignant disputes.

Note too that the male commits an objective act. Men are able to be
objective, an exalted capacity, precisely because they are not objects.
To be objective means that one knows the world, sees it as it is, acts
on the objects in it appropriately. Objectivity by definition requires a
capacity to know, an ability to see. Women, the logs at issue, cannot be
objective or act objectively because objects do not see or know. A log
does not cognize. A log is what it is---a log. A log that resists being
rolled is a log that does not know its nature or its place. A log that
resists being rolled by definition is not a log. A woman who resists
being a log is by definition not a woman.

Is it any wonder, then, that a hypothetical freshman conjured up by
Becker in is somewhat
confused. He is courting "the attractive blonde in his English class";
he is having trouble responding to her "as a total organismic behavioral
object"; it is likely "that magazine had
provided him with a sufficient vocabulary and imagery of what girls 'are
like' (if his red-blooded American interests were along these lines)";
even though has given him an accurate idea
"of what is like, " only his "own dependable
response pattern\... can convey the real meaning of 'girl. '"^12^ And
if has given him a sufficient and accurate
vocabulary and imagery of what a girl is like,
when he conquers his trouble in responding to her as a total organismic
behavioral object, what will he do and what will she be? Hannah Tillich
gave the emblematic answer:

> In Paris, Paulus took me to a street that had what looked at first
> like the window displays in one of the big Fifth
> Avenue department stores. But the dummies in different
> outfits were human beings. I was intrigued. This was the dream street
> of male desire and female submission. Here was the simply dressed girl
> looking like a neighbor or the sleeping beauty in pink veils; here was
> the girl with high boots and a whip or the lady in violet velvet; here
> was the girl begging for punishment. It was a window into hidden
> truth. ^1^\*

The advantage of the living dummy over the inert kind was expressed by
the French eroticist Theophile Gautier in his naughty novel,
Mademoiselle de Maupin, first published in 1835. The
poet-protagonist D'Albert says: "A woman possesses this unquestionable
advantage over a statue, that she turns of herself in the direction you
wish, whereas you are obliged to walk round the statue and place
yourself at the point of sight---which is fatiguing. "^14^ A woman,
D'Albert claims, is "a toy which is more intelligent than if it were
ivory or gold, " this superior intelligence demonstrated in the fact
that it "gets up of itself if we let it fall. "^15^ 

The inevitable and intrinsic cruelty involved in turning a person into
an object should be apparent, but since this constricting, this
undermining, this devaluing, is normative, no particular cruelty is
recognized in it. Instead, there is only normal and natural cruelty---
the normal and natural sadism of the male, happily complemented by the
normal and natural masochism of the female. Each psychologist puts this
view forth in his own quiet, unassuming way. Anthony Storr, considered
an expert on violence, suggests that "\i\t is probably true that men
are generally more 'sadistic' and women more masochistic. '\... there
are many women who nag unmercifully in the hope that their man will
finally treat them with the force that they find exciting. "^16^ The
object is allowed to desire if she desires to be an object: to be
formed; especially to be used. The log can desire to be cut down to
size, chopped, rolled, burned: formed and used in ways appropriate to
its nature. As Anthony M. Ludovici wrote in response to the first wave
of feminism:

> \... I cannot uphold the view that Woman has any destiny to work out
> for herself. She has no "true Womanhood" that has yet to be sought and
> found while we leave her alone. We cannot leave her alone.
> The moment we leave her alone she ceases to be true Woman: where,
> then, could she go alone to seek and find her "true Womanhood"?
> ^17^

This same view was expressed with rawer passion by Otto Weininger
in Sex and
Character^1(#chapter4.xhtml#bookmark1)^
(1903), an influential book in pre-Hitler Europe that equated women and
Jews as worthless, lying, cheating, deceiving. While he has since been
surpassed as an anti-Semite by the men whom he influenced, he still
holds his own as a misogynist:

> When man became sexual he formed woman. That woman is at all has
> happened simply because man has accepted his sexuality. Woman is
> merely the result of this affirmation; she is sexuality itself.
> Woman's existence is dependent on man; when man, as man, in
> contradistinction to woman, is sexual, he is giving woman form,
> calling her into existence. ^18^

The unembodied woman apparently described by Weininger---she does not
exist until man calls her into existence---is not really unembodied,
just truncated: "To put it bluntly, man possesses sexual organs; her
sexual organs possess woman. "^19^ To put it more bluntly: she is cunt,
formed by men, used by men, her sexual organs constituting her whole
being and her whole value.

And what is the value of this sexual object to men, since it is they
who form her, use her, and give her what value she has? The pioneering
male masochist Leopold von Sacher-Masoch, who spent most of his life
bullying bewildered women into wearing furs and halfheartedly whipping
him, candidly wrote in his diary that "my cruel ideal woman is for me
simply the instrument by which I terrorise myself. "^20^ The nature of
the act does not change the nature of the act: the female is the
instrument; the male is the center of sensibility and power. Roland
Barthes, with himself as the lover, essentially endorses the same view
of the object's value and purpose:

> Enough that, in a flash, I should see the other in the guise of an
> inert object, like a kind of stuffed doll, for me to shift my desire
> from this annulled object to my desire itself; it is my desire I
> desire, and the loved being is no more than its tool. ^21^

The object's purpose is to be the means by which the lover, the male,
experiences himself: his desire. Girls, who also play with dolls, only
learn to change diapers or arrange hair.

The object, the woman, goes out into the world formed as men have
formed her to be used as men wish to use her. She is then a provocation.
The object provokes its use. It provokes its use because of its form,
determined by the one who is provoked. The carpenter makes a chair, sits
on it, then blames the chair because he is not standing. When the object
complains about the use to which she is put, she is told, simply and
firmly, not to provoke. Antifeminist H. L. Mencken, in a response to the
first wave of feminism, offered this generous solution:

> The way to put an end to the gaudy crimes that the suffragist
> alarmists talk about is to shave the heads of all the pretty girls in
> the world, and pluck out their eyebrows, and pull their teeth, and put
> them in khaki, and forbid them to wriggle on dancefloors, or to wear
> scents, or to use lip-sticks, or to roll their eyes. ^22^

James Brain, an anthropologist who supports the second wave of
feminism, asserts that women's bodies in themselves

> can seem to be signaling their readiness for sex at any time---a
> problem to which no one has any totally adequate answer, unless one
> considers the orthodox Muslim solution of completely covering a woman
> from head to foot in enveloping black garments to be one.
> ^23^

Brain is absolutely clear that "\r\ape can never be condoned,
excused, or justified. On the other hand, woman
\sic\ should realize the powerful effect that their clothes
have in stimulating male sexual interests."^24^ The wide wide world of
male ideas again astonishes.

But it is left to Norman Mailer to proclaim the true nature and power
of women who are made, not born: in particular, to focus on, explicate,
and enthuse about the extraordinary tribute inherent in being used as a
cunt (if and only if one is a woman) by a man. Mailer finds this tribute
most exhilarating and indelible in the world of Henry Miller:

> In all of \Miller's\ faceless, characterless, pullulating broads,
> in all those cunts which undulate with the movements of eels, in all
> those clearly described broths of soup and grease and marrow and wine
> which are all he will give us of them---their cunts are always closer
> to us than their faces---in all the indignities of position, the
> humiliation of situation, and the endless presentation of women as
> pure artifacts of farce, their asses all up in the air, still he
> screams his barbaric yawp of utter adoration for the power and the
> glory and the grandeur of the female in the universe, and it is his
> genius to show us that this power is ready to survive any context or
> abuse. ^25^

The power Mailer refers to is the power to excite lust, to provoke the
fuck, especially the power to cause erection: the appropriate sphere of
power for a cunt, whether in the air or on the ground. For the fuck to
exist, the cunt must exist: and abuse and humiliation only serve to
enhance the cuntiness of a cunt, which is her power, glory, and so
forth, no matter how horribly she is used or degraded. The appropriate
use of an object---called cunt, instrument, tool, or woman---can never
cease to be appropriate if the use correctly uses the object's nature
and function. Objects exist or are made in order to be used: in this
case, used so that the male can experience his desire, or his desire to
desire, or his alienation from his desire, or his desire to enact
desire, or his desire to play a stringed instrument or to roll a log, or
his desire to make dependable response patterns to organismic behavioral
objects. Women are used in the making and made in the using.

The love of or desire for or obsession with a sexual object is, in male
culture, seen as a response to the qualities of the object itself. Since
the first preoccupation is with the form of the object, men make great
claims for the particular forms that provoke lust or the ability to fuck
in them. What Becker refers to as a dependable response pattern, in the
field of sexual psychology, is most often called objectification.
Objectification is the accomplished fact: an internalized, nearly
invariable response by the male to a form that is, in his estimation and
experience, sufficiently whatever he needs to provoke arousal. The
proper bounds of objectification as an appropriate response to an
appropriate object are set by psychologists, the high priests of secular
culture: the form of a woman, a composite of women's attributes, a part
of a woman's body. Anything or anyone else is seen as some kind of
substitute for a woman or the male-defined sexual parts of her body. It
is inappropriate to substitute. Male supremacy depends on the ability of
men to view women as sexual objects, and deviations from this exercise
in male power and female oblivion are discouraged. Nevertheless,
objectification occurs on a massive scale with regard to inappropriate
objects: males, leather, rubber, underwear, and so on.
Objectification---that fixed response to the form of another that has as
its inevitable consequence erection---is really a value system that has
ejaculation as its inexorable, if momentary, denouement.
Objectification, carried by the male not only as if it were his personal
nature but as if it were nature itself, denotes who or what the male
loves to hate; who or what he wants to possess, act on, conquer, define
himself in opposition to; where he wants to spill his seed. The primary
target of objectification is the woman. In male culture, men do argue
about the proper bounds of objectification, especially about the
viability of objectifying other males; but men do not argue about the
moral meaning of objectification as such. It is taken for granted that a
sexual response is an objectified response: that is, a response aroused
by an object with specific attributes that in themselves provoke sexual
desire. Objectification is a rather sterile word for the phenomenon that
Thomas Hardy explored in

> To his Well-Beloved he had always been faithful, but she had had many
> embodiments. Each individuality known as Lucy, Jane, Flora,
> Evangeline, or whatnot, had been merely a transient condition of her.
> He did not recognize this as an excuse or as a defence, but as a fact
> simply. Essentially she was perhaps of no tangible substance; a
> spirit, a dream, a frenzy, a conception, an aroma, an epitomized sex,
> a light of the eye, a parting of the lips. ^26^

Sometimes objectification operates on what appears to be a silly and
commonplace level, as when Ernest Hemingway had his fourth wife, Mary
Welsh, dye her reddish hair blond. As she recorded: "Deeply rooted in
his field of esthetics was some mystical devotion to blondness, the
blonder the lovelier, I never learned why. He would have been ecstatic
in a world of women dandelions. "^27^ Sometimes objectification is
clearly sinister, for instance when it signifies, as it often does,
racial hatred. As Robert Stoller points out, not necessarily with
aversion, "\... some people need the excremental:\... to choose people
they consider fecal (e. g., black, Jewish, poor, uneducated,
prostituted). "^28^ Stoller's formulation refers to those instances
where objectification of the despised category facilitates intercourse.
Jean-Paul Sartre describes the same sort of objectification with reverse
consequences: "Some men are suddenly struck with impotence if they learn
from the woman with whom they are making love that she is a Jewess.
There is a disgust for the Jew, just as there is a disgust for the
Chinese or the Negro among certain people. "^29^ The relationship
between the supposedly silly and commonplace objectification of blonds
as beautiful and the sinister objectification of those considered in
some way filth is, of course, a direct one: the same value system is
embodied in this range of sexual obsession, sexual response. With this
value system in mind, it becomes clear that the love of blonds is in
fact as socially significant as, and inseparable from, the hatred of
those who are seen to embody opposite qualities or characteristics.
Objectification, in fact and in consequence, is never trivial.

Men, perpetually searching to justify their perpetual search for
objects that move them to experience their own desire transmuted to
power, claim especially to love beauty as such; and under the formidable
guise of aesthetic devotion, objectification is defended or presented as
the recognition of the beautiful. Women ideally embody beauty: so the
theory goes, even though men in practice seem to hate the female body
per se. The notion that female beauty inspires male love is pervasive.
One can hardly argue (so it seems) with the aesthetic values of the
sublime artists of male culture who freeze the female form in time and
render it exquisite, as in, for instance, the Venus de Milo, ancient
Aphrodite, the women of Rubens, and so forth. It is nearly
unconscionable to challenge, for instance, the aesthetic sensibility in
Keats's exquisite "Ode on a Grecian Urn, " where the object is first the
urn itself, then the figures on it:

>   Bold Lover, never, never canst thou kiss;\
> Though winning near the goal---yet, do not grieve;\
>     She cannot fade, though thou hast not thy bliss,\
>         For ever wilt thou love, and she be fair! ^30^

The meaning of the male idealization of beauty is hidden by the very
beauty of the art that proclaims woman, at her highest, a beautiful
object. Keats has found the ideal crystallization of objectifying love:
the bold lover perpetually desires the unchanging beauty of the
unchanging female frozen in time; he will always love and she will
always be fair; he will always love because she will always be fair.
This same model of love is found in every soap and cosmetic commercial.
In Keats, objectification is raised to its highest aesthetic level. With
pinups too the bold lover will forever love and she be fair.

The love that the male feels for the ideal beauty is evoked (or
provoked) by beauty itself. Scarcely any woman dares to ignore male
ideas of ideal female beauty altogether because these ideas will
significantly determine the quality and limits of any woman's life. But
these ideas---which change from society to society or from time to time,
or which exist in contrasting or opposing formulations at the same time
within the same society---have a common premise: the object must be that
which it is supposed to be; its behavior must be appropriate to its
function. Inappropriate behavior ruins female beauty. Since women are
capable of everything but permitted almost nothing (without the
consequences of male revenge or grudge), acts that enhance the sensual
or aesthetic dimension of a man become virtual physical stains on a
woman. The one static standard of female beauty is that the woman must
conform to the male's definition of her as an object with respect to
function as well as form. George Sand, for instance, attributed her own
lack of beauty in male eyes (and therefore her own) to her intellectual
and physical activity. In so doing, she gives a still-accurate picture
of what the female beauty in Western culture may be and of what she must
not do:

> I had a sound constitution, and as a child seemed likely to become
> beautiful, a promise I did not keep. This was perhaps my fault, since
> at the age when beauty blossoms I was already spending my nights
> reading and writing\....

> Not to work so that my eyes would sparkle; not to run and play in the
> sun when God's sun attracts me so; not to walk in sturdy wooden shoes
> for fear of deforming my ankles; to wear gloves, that is, to renounce
> the quickness and strength of my hands; to doom myself to be clumsy
> and feeble; never to tire myself, when everything urges me to use up
> my energy; to live, in short, under a bell jar; to be neither burned,
> nor chapped, nor faded before my time---such things were always
> impossible for me. ^31^

Reading and writing, especially writing, have been seen as the
antithesis of beauty in the female, as deadly as cyanide. Physical
activity, even when prohibited, has been better tolerated.

Women are reared, and often forced, to conform to the specific
requirements of ideal beauty, whatever they are at any given time. From
foot-binding to waist binding to breast binding, ideal
Beauty often requires deforming of the natural body. From
clitoridectomy to breast enlargement or reduction to surgically altered
noses, ideal beauty often requires mutilation of the natural body. From
hair dyeing to face painting to necessary ornamentation (for instance,
high-heeled shoes), ideal beauty often requires distortion or denial of
the natural body. Ranging from idiocy to atrocity, any and all
strategies are employed so that the natural female body will fit the
male idea of ideal female
beauty.

The mystification of female beauty in male culture knows no limit but
one: somehow the beauty herself ends up dead or mutilated. Even an
unregenerate materialist like Herbert Marcuse cannot stay earthbound
when expostulating on beauty personified in the female---in this case
Medusa, cut into pieces by Perseus:

> As desired object, the beautiful pertains to the domain of the
> primary instincts, Eros and Thanatos. The mythos links the
> adversaries: pleasure and terror. Beauty has the power to check
> aggression: it forbids and immobilizes the aggressor. The beautiful
> Medusa petrifies him who confronts her. "Poseidon, the god with azure
> locks, slept with her in a soft meadow on a bed with springtime
> flowers" \Hesiod,, trans. Norman O.
> Brown\. She is slain by Perseus, and from her truncated body springs
> the winged horse Pegasus, symbol of poetic imagination. ^12^

Poetry, the genre of purest beauty, was born of a truncated woman: her
head severed from her body with a sword, a symbolic penis, so that
poetry is born not only of a dead woman but of one sadistically
mutilated. Poe, whose debt to Perseus cannot be overestimated, wrote
that "\t\he death of a beautiful woman is, unquestionably, the most
poetical topic in the world. "" The function of beauty in the realm of
the so-called erotic was further elucidated by Bataille when he wrote:
"Beauty is desired in order that it may be befouled; not for its own
sake, but for the joy brought by the certainty of profaning it. "\*^4^
Beauty, then, consistently has meaning in the sphere of female death or
violation. An object is always destroyed in the end by its use when it
is used to the fullest and enough; and in the realm of female
beauty, the final value of the object is precisely to be found in its
cruel or deadly destruction.

Female knowledge of objectification usually stops at a necessary but
superficial understanding: beauty is rewarded and lack of beauty is
punished. The punishments are understood as personal misfortune; they
are not seen as systematic, institutional, or historical. Women do not
understand that they are also punished through sexual use for being
beautiful; and women do not understand the lengths to which men go to
protect themselves and their society from contamination by ugly women
who do not induce a lustful desire to punish, violate, or destroy,
though men manage to punish, violate, or destroy these women anyway. The
Goncourt brothers, honored as authorities both on women and on
eighteenth-century France, praised the eighteenth-century convent as "a
refuge rather than a prison, " benign because it kept women scarred by
smallpox out of the sight of men:

> \The convent\ is above all the haven of broken lives, the almost
> obligatory asylum of women suffering from small-pox, a malady all but
> forgotten to-day, but one which disfigured a good quarter of the women
> of that time. Society, with every argument at its command, and the
> family, with every conceivable exhortation, urged the victim of this
> scourge toward the obscurity of the cloister. Even her mother
> consented, out of love, to surrender her luckless child, whose
> unsightliness excluded her from society and who ended by submitting to
> the pitiless precept of the time---"An ill-favored woman is a being
> without state in Nature or place in the world. "^35^

According to the Goncourts, two hundred thousand women or more,
called ("foul faces"), were locked up in
eighteenth-century French convents. The ostracism and exclusion of women
who are not perceived as beautiful enough to be desirable from work and
social participation is the modem equivalent of segregating the
laiderons;
laideron

Since the value of the object is finally in its violation or
destruction, it is no surprise to find that there are men who have
sexually objectified the woman who is that violated object: especially
the prostitute ravaged by the life or the racially degraded woman, both
of whom are seen as pure and dangerous sexuality, used, reeking with
violation. This woman is the sexual object for those men who want to
violate, as Baudelaire expressed it, the abominable:

> Woman is hungry and wishes to eat. Thirsty\
>    and wishes to drink.\
> She is in heat and wishes to be fucked.\
> Is that not splendid?\
> Woman is natural, that is to say abominable. ^36^

The prostitute is the emblematic used woman, natural in that she most
purely fulfills her sexual function; the despised---by virtue of race,
class, or ethnicity---compose the bulk of the prostituted; prostitution
signifies in and of itself male power in every sphere and constitutes in
and of itself a bedrock of sexual excitement. As Flaubert wrote: "It is
perhaps a perverted taste, but I love prostitution for itself and
independently of what it means underneath. I've never been able to see
one of these women, in low-cut dresses, pass, beneath the light of the
gas lamps, without my heart beating fast. "^37^ But it is precisely what
prostitution means "underneath" that makes for the excitement. At the
end of, Flaubert's novel about
the passage of male youths into cynical maturity, Frederic and
Deslauriers, two great friends, remember the first time they visited a
brothel: "\... the very pleasure of seeing at a single glance so many
women at his disposal affected \Frederic\ so powerfully that he turned
deathly pale, and stood still, without saying a word. "^38^ The whores
laugh, he runs, and since he has the money, his friend is compelled to
follow him. The novel ends as the two men agree that ^u^\t\hat was the
happiest time we ever had. "^39^ Looking back, they realize that they
had never again experienced such a formidable sense of power, such an
absolute recognition of the meaning of their masculinity, and that this
feeling constituted happiness.

The prostitute is seen as the antithesis of the man. In Baudelaire's
language, the man is civilized, the dandy; the woman is natural, the
abominable. The language changes from writer to writer, but what remains
constant is that this intense sense of estrangement from the female
provides the necessary basis for sexual excitement. The woman whom the
male knows as a person, not as object, can never, as Havelock Ellis puts
it, be "a real girl":

> But only the girl with whom one has not grown up from childhood, and
> become accustomed to, can ever be to us in the truly sexual sense, a
> real girl. That is to say, she alone can possess these powerful
> stimuli to the sense of sexual desirability, never developed in the
> people one has grown unconsciously used to, which are essential to the
> making of a real girl. ^40^

Ellis goes on to claim that this inability to be aroused by a
girl with whom one has grown up has biological
origins in both man and lower animals. The baboon-next-door, apparently,
is not "a real girl" either.

For Becker "the making of a real girl" distinguishes man from other
animals; "the making of a real girl" takes on sublime significance as
man searches for meaning and especially for a meaningful sense of his
own importance. Becker is simply more abstract than Ellis:

> No ontology of human striving can be complete without discussing what
> is most peculiar to man---the urge to love. When we understand that
> man is the only animal who must meaning,
> who must open a wedge into neutral nature, we already understand the
> essence of love. Love is the problem of an animal who must
> find a dialogue with
> nature in order to experience his own being. It is another dimension
> of the need to be brought into the world, by being brought into
> contact with life at its quickest and most striking. As Spinoza saw,
> love is the increase of self by means of the object. Love is the
> sentiment of a peculiarly alienated animal, one who is separate from
> the natural, instinctive process, and must be urged back into the
> world. ^41^

The intense and obsessive use of person as object is seen as the
solution to man's alienation---not as the source of it nor as one of its
most numbing manifestations.

Not only does "love\... increase \the\ self by means of the object";
but the fact of objectification---this diminished capacity to perceive
and respond to life---is viewed as a key and dynamic element of
individuality. Since men characteristically respond only to sexual
fragments, bits and pieces, slivers of flesh costumed this way or that,
this very incapacity is consistently transformed into one of love's
defining virtues. Krafft-Ebing, a pioneering sexologist currently out of
fashion (unlike Kinsey and Ellis) because his goal was to move sexual
deviation out of the realm of the criminal into the realm of the medical
(not into the realm of the normal), enunciated a still-current appraisal
of the value of objectification:

> In the considerations concerning the psychology of the normal sexual
> life in the first chapter of this work it was shown that, within
> psychological limits, the pronounced preference for a certain portion
> of the body of persons of the opposite sex, particularly for a certain
> form of this part, may attain great psychosexual importance. Indeed,
> the especial power of attraction possessed by certain forms and
> peculiarities for many men---in fact, the majority---may be regarded
> as the real principle of individualism in love. ^42^

The automatic, predetermined, fixed, intransigent response to a
particular form or part of the body is supposed to be a manifestation of
individuality rather than a paralyzation of individuality. The male's
individuality, in effect, can be reckoned by how little he responds to,
how little he perceives, how little he values. Sexual myopia, then,
becomes the paradigm for individuality.

Sexologist C. A. Tripp very much in fashion, considers male sexual
objectification an evolutionary high point:.. the selection of a
particular partner whose smallest details may be so invested with
meaning as to bring a person's sexual
response to fever pitch---represents more than a culmination of
individual development. It can also be seen as the culmination of a
trend in evolution. "^43^ In Tripp's rather surreal portrait of
progress, the person in question is male, since Tripp, a disciple of
Kinsey, insists that women have virtually no sex drive at all; and
psychologists of all persuasions concur that real objectification is a
male event, since objectification is necessary for arousal and arousal
always means erection. Objectification signifies the male's capacity for
individualism and also his extreme selectivity and discernment, most
clear, according to Tripp, in the situation of the homosexual male,
where both partners by definition objectify:

> Homosexual promiscuity, in particular, frequently entails a
> remarkable amount of discrimination. Even a person who never wants a
> second contact with any of his partners may spend much time selecting
> from dozens or even hundreds of possibilities. In fact, some of the
> most promiscuous individuals sustain considerable frustration not from
> any lack of opportunity but from being exceedingly selective.
> ^44^

Tripp believes that this evolutionary summit has a biological source:
"The cortical organization of human
sexuality is such that it eventually becomes keyed to specific cues, or
to whole contexts of association. "^45^ The cortical organization of the
male--- responsible in Tripp's view for the fact of sexual
objectification and all its attendant virtues (individuality,
selectivity, discrimination, and promiscuity itself)---is superior to
that of the female, who lumbers along with her mere capacity for
unlimited orgasm and her dull taste for personality. Tripp's phrase
"whole contexts of association, " which sounds expansive rather than
constricting, in reality means a program, a scenario, a response to
preordained events that must proceed according to script for the male to
maintain arousal. "On close examination, " Tripp explains, fully
articulating the wisdom of our time, "nearly every adult's
\sic\ highest level of response is limited to relatively
few situations that fulfill specific personal demands---demands that are
decidedly fetishlike in character. "^46^

------------------------------------------------------------------------

> And, in that case, what is it in this loved body which has the
> vocation of a fetish for me?

Roland Barthes, A Lover\'s
Discourse

The word
feitigo, which means "charm" or "made thing. " A fetish is a
magical, symbolic object. Its first meaning is religious: the magical
object is regarded with irrational, extreme, extravagant trust or
reverence (to paraphrase Merriam-Webster). In its sexual meaning, the
magic of the fetish is in its power to cause and sustain penile
erection. In Maurice North
offers a neutral definition of fetishism:\

> a preference for a particular part of the body not directly entering
> into coitus, an article of clothing or some other extrasexual object
> or combination of any of the aforementioned that is carried to the
> point where this becomes dominant in
> the individual's sex life, or without which sexual satisfaction is
> incomplete or impossible. ^47^

Krafft-Ebing, in his definition, reveals a preoccupation with
perpetuating heterosexual intercourse as the norm of sexual
behavior:

> The concentration of the sexual interest on a certain portion of the
> body that has no direct relation to sex (as have breasts and external
> genitals)---a peculiarity to be emphasized---often leads
> body-fetishists to such a condition that they do not regard coitus as
> the real means of sexual gratification, but rather some form of
> manipulation of that portion of the body that is effectual as a
> fetish. ^48^

Fetishism is seen as an inappropriate narrowing of sexual
responsiveness; objectification is seen as an appropriate narrowing of
sexual responsiveness. The two are not really distinct at all; they
reveal a continuum of incapacity. Fetishism too, as part of the male
condition, is dignified as a sign of the human condition: "Fetishism, in
other words, " writes Becker, "represents a relatively desperate attempt
by a limited organism to come to grips in some satisfying way with a
portion of reality. And, of course, the more limited the reality is, the
more striking and overpowering---as when a cat singles out a robin on a
lawn. "^49^

The image of the cat hunting the robin is not, of course, either
accidental or irrelevant. The fetish is the magical object that causes
erection. The irrational, extreme, extravagant trust or reverence felt
by the male is not for the fetish object but for the erection. The
fetish is valued because it consistently enables penile erection. Sex
itself---behavior toward the fetish---remains predatory, hostile; it is
the use of things to experience self. This usage and hostility when
directed at real objects are considered, in the main, abnormal; when
directed at whole women or their breasts or genitals it is considered
normal and appropriate.

Freud claimed that "the fetish is a substitute for the woman's (the
mother's) penis that the little boy once believed in and---for reasons
familiar to us \fear of castration\---does not want to give up. "^50^
Storr suggests that the fetish stands in for female genitals, "since the
fetishist feels towards the fetish the same excitement and fascination
which is aroused by the genital organs in the normal male. "^51^ Since
in Storr's view fetishes substitute for female genitals, the fetishes
themselves are likely to be feminine symbols, especially articles of
clothing particularly associated with women. "Women, " Storr claims,
using the common, solipsistic argument of psychologists, "have no need
of fetishes because they do not have to achieve or sustain an erection.
"^52^ Storr maintains, however, that women do use fetishes---to attract
men: "\a\ fetish may, as it were, be a flag hung out by the woman to
proclaim her sexual availability\... "^5J^ Since there is virtually no
bodily part or piece of apparel or substance that is not fetishized by
some men somewhere, it would be hard indeed for a woman not to hang out
a flag without going naked, which would be construed as definitely
hanging out a flag. From underwear to rubber boots and raincoats to
leather belts to long hair to all varieties of shoes to feet in and of
themselves: all these and more are fodder for male fetishists. The fact
is that men can and do fetishize everything; and no woman can possibly
know how to match up any given man with any given fetish, nor how to
anticipate, nor how to avoid, "provoking" sexual arousal due to a
fetishized response. What women can know, but do not sufficiently
appreciate, is that common male fetishes determine female fashion:
attracting a male through acceptable style or dress means that one has
conformed to the requirements of one or more common male fetishes.
Combat boots and dung-colored rags do the same.

Kinsey, in his volume on the human female, categorizes fetishism as "an
almost exclusively male phenomenon"; then he softens the meaning by a
gender-neutral description of what fetishism entails:

> Persons who respond only or primarily to objects which are remote
> from the sexual partner, or remote from the overt sexual activities
> with a partner, are not rare in the population. This is particularly
> true of individuals who are erotically aroused by high heels, by
> boots, by corsets, by tight clothing, by long gloves, by whips, or by
> other objects which suggest sado masochistic relationships\...
> ^54^

All of the fetishes listed by Kinsey, in the male frame of reference,
suggest bondage. As with Becker's image of the cat ready to pounce on
the robin, the sexual meaning attributed to the fetish cannot exist
outside a context of power and predation.

The shoe is a commonly fetishized article of dress, though how the shoe
comes to substitute for the female is a male mystery. Charles Winick
suggests that

> \t\he shoe is the one item of costume which reflects gender most
> sensitively, perhaps because the foot's position in the shoe is so
> analogous to the position of the sexual organs during intercourse.
> ^55^

Explanations like Winick's are commonplace in the literature on foot
and shoe fetishism: note the logic or absence thereof. Also note the
elevation of male obsession into the sphere of the meaningful.

All kinds of shoes are fetishized, but in the West the high-heeled shoe
and the boot have the widest, most enduring significance.
Lars ,
writes that "\w\hen women's fashion decrees high-heeled boots, many
men walk the streets with a permanent erection. "^56^ "Women's fashion"
is a euphemism for fashion created by men for women; the failure to
follow the dicta of this fashion has severe economic repercussions for
any woman. The clear, unavoidable male concern with female footwear
demonstrates the scale of male fascination with female feet. Hannah
Tillich, with her characteristic good humor, noted the extraordinary
effect her bare feet had on Paul Tillich:

> When I took off my shoes, Paulus became ecstatic about my feet. In
> later years, I often said that if I hadn't walked barefoot with him
> that day, we would never have married. That was after I had learned
> that his preoccupation with feet had always been extraordinary.
> ^57^

The Chinese were preoccupied with feet for a thousand years, during
which they bound and crippled the feet of young girls and the deformed
foot was the main focus of sexual interest. The bound foot was the
fetish; the binding and the sexual use of the crippled female were
saturated with the values of bondage and conquest. The preoccupation in
the West with high-heeled shoes is no less ominous.

The sexual fetish often has a function that obscures its significance
as a magical cause of erection. The shoe, for instance, is seen by women
in many ways, but almost never as a magical cause of erection in the
male. Some women even wear shoes because the streets are dirty or cold
or dangerous to the bare foot. The cultural level on which the fetish
manifests varies greatly. Paul Tillich, for instance, was a great
Christian thinker. Underneath the high-minded, humanistic philosophizing
was a grimmer reality, as Hannah Tillich revealed in her
memoir:

> The old man \Paul Tillich\ had pushed the buttons on his
> custom-made screen. There was the familiar cross shooting up the wall.
> "So fitting for a Christian and a theologian, " she \Hannah Tillich\
> sneered. A naked girl hung on it, hands tied in front of her private
> parts. Another naked figure lashed the crucified one with a whip that
> reached further to another cross, on which a girl was exposed from
> behind. More and more crosses appeared, all with women tied and
> exposed in various positions. Some were exposed from the front, some
> from the side, some from behind, some crouched in fetal position, some
> head down, or legs apart, or legs crossed---and always whips, crosses,
> whips. ^58^

Which comes first, the fetish or the philosophy, is an unsolvable
riddle: but every fetish, expressed on whatever level, manifests the
power of the erect penis, especially its power in determining the
sensibility of the male himself, his ethical as well as his sexual
nature. Since men never judge ethical capacity on the basis of justice
toward women, the sexual meaning of the fetish remains subterranean,
while on the cultural level the fetish is expanded into myth, religion,
idea, aesthetics, all necessarily and intrinsically male-supremacist.
The uniting theme is the hatred expressed toward women.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Male culture thrives on argument and prides itself on distinctions.
Objectification is natural, normal, to be encouraged; fetishism is
unnatural, abnormal, to be discouraged. But surely fetishism proceeds
logically from objectification: and if the perception of persons as
objects is not a crime against the person so perceived, then there is no
crime, because every violation of the female proceeds from this
so-called normal phenomenon. And, in the final analysis, it must be
recognized that the woman is the fetish, not just object, but magical
charm, charged with symbolic meaning: the made thing that most
consistently provokes erection. In Marcuse's words (arguing
against Love\'s
Body): "This is it. The woman, the land is here on earth, to
be found here on earth, living and dying, female for male,
distinguished, particular, tension to be renewed, Romeo's and Don
Juan's, self and another, yours or mine, fulfillment in alienation.
"^59^

Mother, whore, beauty, abomination, nature or ornament, she is the
thing in contradistinction to which the male is human. Without her as
fetish---the charmed object---the male, including the male homosexual,
would be unable to experience his own selfhood, his own power, his own
penile presence and sexual superiority. Male homosexual culture
consistently uses the symbolic female---the male in drag, effeminacy as
a style, the various accoutrements that denote female subjection---as
part of its indigenous environment, as a touchstone against which
masculinity can be experienced as meaningful and sublime. Male
homosexuals, especially in the arts and in fashion, conspire with male
heterosexuals to enforce the male-supremacist rule that the female must
be that made thing against which the male acts to experience himself as
male. Woman is not born; she is made. In the making, her humanity is
destroyed. She becomes symbol of this, symbol of that: mother of the
earth, slut of the universe; but she never becomes herself because it is
forbidden for her to do so. No act of hers can overturn the way in which
she is consistently perceived: as some sort of thing. No sense of her
own purpose can supercede, finally, the male's sense of her purpose: to
be that thing that enables him to experience raw phallic power. In
pornography, his sense of purpose is fully realized. She is the pinup,
the centerfold, the poster, the postcard, the dirty picture, naked,
half-dressed, laid out, legs spread, breasts or ass protruding. She is
the thing she is supposed to be: the thing that makes him erect. In
literary and cinematic pornography, she is taught to be that thing:
raped, beaten, bound, used, until she recognizes her true nature and
purpose and complies---happily, greedily, begging for more. She is used
until she knows only that she is a thing to be used. This knowledge is
her authentic erotic sensibility: her erotic destiny. The more she is a
thing, the more she provokes erection; the more she is a thing, the more
she fulfills her purpose; her purpose is to be the thing that provokes
erection. She starts out searching for love or in love with love. She
finds love as men understand it in being the thing men use. As Mario,
the master eroticist in the film, says to
the heroine after he has had her repeatedly raped and used: "Real love
is the erection, not the orgasm. " As Adrienne Rich wrote: "No one has
imagined us. "^60^

1(#chapter4.xhtml#footnote1)

Freud considered the book "remarkable" and its author "highly gifted
but sexually deranged. " Cf. Two
Case Histories
The Standard Edition of the Complete Psychological Works of Sigmund
Freud, eds. and trans. James Strachey and Anna Freud (London:
Hogarth Press and Institute of Psycho-Analysis, 1962), p. 36n.{.font3
style="font-weight:bold;"}



5

Force

> Indeed the Pentateuch is a long painful record of war, corruption,
> rapine, and lust. Why Christians who wished to convert the heathen to
> our religion should send them these books, passes all understanding.
> It is most demoralizing reading for children and the unthinking
> masses, giving all alike the lowest possible idea of womanhood, having
> no hope nor ambition beyond conjugal unions with men they scarcely
> knew, for whom they could not have had the slightest sentiment of
> friendship, to say nothing of affection.

Elizabeth Cady Stanton,

> And it should be realised, too, that captives, animals or
> men are not constantly absorbed by the
> notion of escape, for all their restless pacing behind the bars\...
> The long glance, the unquiet step are only reflexes, brought about by
> habit or the size of their prison. Open the door that the bird, the
> squirrel, the wild beast have been eyeing, besieging, imploring, and
> instead of the leap, the sudden flurry of wings you expected, the
> disconcerted creature will stiffen and draw back into the depths of
> its cage. I had plenty of time to think, and I was constantly hearing
> the same grand, contemptuous, sarcastic words, shining links of a
> fine-wrought chain: "After all, you are perfectly free\.... "

Colette,

There are two photographs, part of a four-page layout with text. In the
first photograph, there are two women. The woman on the left is older.
Her head is swathed in a black turban. Her skin is a tawny brown. Her
race is ambiguous. From her ear hangs a shiny silver half-moon earring.
From her neck, on a barely visible cord, is a small ivory tooth. Her
body is draped in a bright red robe that has Oriental characters on it.
The neck of the robe is opened into a deep V but her breasts do not
show. On her left wrist is a silver bracelet. On her left hand are two
large silver rings. In her left hand is a pair of silver scissors. One
finger of her left hand appears to touch the pubic area of the second
woman. The scissors, held between the thumb and first finger, are
slightly raised above the pubic area. Her right hand, with one large
silver ring, holds up a black garter, unfastened to provide access to
the pubic area of the second woman. The first woman's eyes are downcast
so that only her heavily made-up eyelids show. Her eyes appear to be
focused on the pubic area of the second woman. The first woman wears
bright red lipstick the color of her robe and has nails painted the same
color. The color is usually called blood red. The second woman has
curly, light brown hair. She is clearly white-skinned. The text, titled
"Barbered Pole, " identifies her as Polish and turns her into an ethnic
joke. She wears a red-and-black lace corset with black garters, one
garter attached to the black nylon stocking on her right leg. Her left
leg extends under the arm and behind the first woman, so that her legs
are spread wide open. The garter belt on the left is unfastened and
lifted up by the first woman and draped over her hand. The second woman
wears a pinker shade of lipstick, her cheeks are very pink, her nails
are painted blood red. Her exposed pubic area is just below the visual
center of the photograph. The scissors poised above her pubic area are
dead center. The second photograph is a close-up of the pubic area,
which fills the whole frame: flesh, spread thighs, the vulva. The vulva
is pink and highlighted. The scissors rest right next to the vulva,
pointed toward it. A comb with hair in its teeth is just above the
vaginal opening. It is held by a hand with bloodred fingernails, one of
which is pointed toward the vulva. Most of the hair has been cut or
shaved away (in accompanying photographs), except for a discernible V
pattern right above the vulva. Red specks that could be blood or bruises
or cuts are on the skin of the inner thighs. The text in part reads:
"When Katherina was asked why she was having her pubic hair styled, she
told us that it was purely for her own self."

The first woman is defined through age, color, and activity. She is old
in the male value system, beyond sexual desirability. She is used,
hardened, potentially dangerous yet performing a menial service. Her
proper sexual role is to prepare, to groom, a younger woman for sexual
service. She is a woman of color, though it is not clear which color.
Turban, ivory tooth, heavy silver jewelry with the half-moon earring,
Oriental characters on her robe, a gypsylike appearance as if a
fortune-teller, suggest that she is an old witch woman filled with
racial mysteries, malice, and magic---a prototypical female figure in
the racist imagination. Both her servility and hostility to the white
woman are articulated in the activity she performs, menial in relation
to the white woman yet also potentially dangerous to her. This is the
classic situation of the racially degraded servant: her literal ability
to hurt the one she serves is, in a moment, absolute, but she cannot
survive beyond the literal act because her group is powerless, she will
be destroyed, and so she serves.

The white woman---Polish, in ethnic humor characterized as extremely
stupid---stares into the camera with an unflinching gaze, with no hint
of embarrassment, modesty, or shame. She is unafraid. She wants what she
is getting. She is, in a literal sense, imperiled, at the mercy of the
woman of color, but she does not even acknowledge her. The Polish joke
in the layout may be that the Polish woman thinks that all of this is
"purely for her own self. "

The white woman is the whore, the sexual object of the moment. The
woman of color is the sexual veteran. The woman of color is the menial.
The white woman is the boss. The older woman is the preparer. The
younger woman is the thing prepared. In the realm of age, the
relationship parodies the mother-daughter arrangement in the
male-supremacist system: the mother teaches her daughter how to groom
herself or grooms her; the mother is the carrier and enforcer of male
aesthetic values vis-i-vis the female body; the mother's success is
measured by the daughter's success in becoming what the mother has tried
to make her. The older woman has the weapon in her hand. Still, the
older woman serves. The one she actually serves is not
pictured.

These are two women together, within the male framework a lesbian
scenario. No male figure as such is present. The scissors are the
explicit phallic presence means sheath). The
scissors are poised near the entrance to the vagina, as the comb, also a
phallic object, is poised above it. Pressed against the skin, the
scissors cut the hair so close to the skin that the skin is left bruised
or cut. The teeth of the comb suggest vagina dentata. The ivory tooth
hanging from the neck of the older woman suggests the same, removed from
the genitals and generalized to the whole personality.

The two photographs posit an all-female sadism. The lesbian motif is
supposed to mean that the values in the photographs really have to do
with women, not men. The threat of the scissors gives testimony to the
fact that in the male mind two women cannot be together without a
phallic third, but despite this reassuring expression of phallic faith,
two women without a man purposefully underlines the femaleness of the
sexuality pictured. The older woman's cruelty is conveyed especially by
the scissors but the younger woman is also cruel, hard, tough. These are
the same woman, one younger, one older, one white, one of color. They
are the shameless women of sex, the whores whose carnality is assaultive
in its arrogance. They are lesbian---purely female--- bitches. They are
lesbian---purely masculine---bitches. The scissors suggest or promise
phallic penetration but they also suggest or promise castration, women
with scissors aimed at the genitals. Female genital mutilation
(practiced widely, mother to daughter, in sections of the Third World)
and the castrating phallic woman (fantasized so energetically in this
world) are conjured up simultaneously. The V shape of the hair that is
left suggests vulva, vagina, and also victory. The victory of the vagina
over the male is a castrating victory. These are the cruel
women.

The absence of men from the photographs encourages the belief that men
are seeing women as they really are, in private, with each other---a
pure female sexuality, a basic carnality usually hidden by the dull
conventions of civilization, that tamer of the female.
The underlying message is that the female in her pure
sexuality is sadistic, a conviction articulated not only by the
pornographers but also by the enlightened philosophers of sex on all
levels. The Christians called women carnal and evil and killed nine
million as witches. The. enlightened thinkers secularize the conviction,
turn faith to idea. According to women's best friend, Havelock Ellis, in
his classic, female
sadism is a biologically evident norm, while male sadism is abnormal,
unnatural, manifesting in civilization:

> In that abnormal sadism which appears from time to time among
> civilized human beings it is nearly always the female who becomes the
> victim of the male. But in the normal sadism which occurs throughout a
> large part of nature it is nearly always the male who is the victim of
> the female. It is the male spider who impregnates the female at the
> risk of his life and sometimes perishes in the attempt; it is the male
> bee who, after intercourse with the queen, falls dead from that fatal
> embrace, leaving her to fling aside his entrails and calmly pursue her
> course. *If it may seem to some that the course of our inquiry leads
> us to contemplate with equanimity as a natural phenomenon a certain
> semblance of cruelty in man in his relation to woman, they may, if
> they will, reflect that this phenomenon is but a very slight
> counterpoise to that cruelty which has been naturally exerted by the
> female on the male long even before man began to be.* ^*1*^
> \Italics mine\

Ellis, like so many other male thinkers contemplating the human female,
looks to various insects and eight-legged things. Here he has
contradicted his main thesis, which is that natural (biological) human
sex requires a forceful or cruel male and a woman who pretends to resist
or does resist and must be conquered. But he contradicts himself for a
purpose: to justify the male force used against women in sex by positing
a more fundamental female sadism.

Robert Briffault, author of The Mothers: The Matriarchal
Theory of Social Origins and another best friend of women,
turns to camels and crabs to posit an equality of sexual sadism in male
and female:

> With both the male and the female, "love, " or sexual attraction, is
> originally and preeminently "sadic"; it is positively gratified by the
> infliction of pain; it is as cruel as hunger. That is the direct,
> fundamental, and longest established sentiment connected with the
> sexual impulse. The male animal captures, mauls and bites the female,
> who in turn uses her teeth and claws freely, and the "lovers" issue
> from the sexual combat bleeding and mangled. Crustaceans usually lose
> a limb or two in the encounter. All mammals without exception use
> their teeth on these occasions. Pallas describes the mating of camels:
> as soon as impregnation has taken place, the female, with a vicious
> snarl, turns round and attacks the male with her teeth, and the latter
> is driven away in terror. ^2^

The equality of sadism here is patently false: the male animal does the
capturing; the poor female camel is a bit late in terrorizing the
male---she is already pregnant and barefoot, as it were. But a basis is
clearly established for fearing the sexual sadism of the female. The
hit-and-run sexuality of the human male seems, in this context, a
reasonable attempt to save life and limb from the sadistic treachery of
the female. Of course, it would make more sense if he were attempting to
fuck a camel.

The more contemporary advocates of crawling, swimming, and flying
things as illuminators of human sexual and social behavior take an
unambiguous stand in favor of the male as the consummate biological
sadist: naturally, they pick bugs, fish, and fowl appropriate to their
point of view. Essentially, they maintain that the women's movement is
biologically deviant: if women were capable of
power (taking power seen exclusively as a function of inherent sexual
sadism), then perhaps women might even be capable of using and
maintaining power. Since this idea is repugnant, the strategy of this
particular male-supremacist clique is to assert that it is a biological
impossibility for females to use sexual force, that is, to be sexually
controlling or dominant. In, Kate
Millett gave a representative example of this way of thinking. She
described the so-called cichlid effect, "\... a theory of human
sexuality modeled on the reactions of a prehistoric fish whom
Konrad Lorenz examined to conclude that male cichlids failed to find the
courage to mate unless the female of their species responded with 'awe.
'" Millett notes that ^u^\h\ow one measures 'awe' in a fish is a
question perhaps better left unanswered\... "^3^ The use of the cichlid
to buttress male sexual supremacy---not to mention the multitudes of
insects that people Edward O. Wilson's Sociobiology: The New
Synthesis---may be seen to indicate either a new militancy or
a new desperation on the part of those who look to other species to
justify male domination.

Psychiatrists and psychologists, however, still postulate a basic
female sadism. Their proof is clinical, that is, deduced or imagined
from what they observe in patients. Bruno Bettelheim suggests that in
females sexual sadism would naturally lead to self-mutilation:

> The desires of our little boys indeed suggest that some men would
> excise part of the female sex organs if not prevented. But the example
> of the girl who had to take special precautions to prevent herself
> from tearing off her own clitoris raises a doubt as to whether this
> far-reaching mutilation also may not be reenforced at least in part by
> desires that spring up autonomously in women. ^4^

Bettelheim's generalization from the behavior of one disturbed girl
expresses a wish, one also expressed in the photographs, scissors in the
hand of a woman aimed at the genitals of a woman.

Robert Stoller, concerned ultimately with the paradisical heterosexual
adjustment of angry women, posits, much as Briffault did, a sexual
sadism that manifests in both males and females. He is particularly
contemptuous of women who fail to meet elementary standards of humanism
because they think that males alone are sadistic:

> Belle \Stoller's prototypical female\ suffered endlessly from her
> anger at males and envy at their happier lot, without hope that she
> could move from her inferior position and ashamed that she mismanaged
> these issues. Yet she discovered that knowing men to be sadists (she
> did not make that up), she was using that knowledge to read sadism
> into all our acts. And that is propaganda, whether used for social
> causes or for masturbation.

> Women, too, are sadists; she ignored that. Humans, whether by nature
> or nurture, are often villains. Big news. ^5^

Actually, this is "big news" to women whose lives are circumscribed by
the sexual sadism of males; but it is good news to those males who
justify their abuse of women by believing that women are sexually
sadistic at heart and that the sadism of women is formidable despite the
fact that it is not socially or historically self-evident. The cage is
justified because the animal inside it is wild and dangerous. The sexual
philosophers, like the pornographers, need to believe that women are
more dangerous than men or as dangerous as men so as to be justified in
their social and sexual domination of them. As long as this alleged
female sadism is controlled by men, it can be manipulated to give men
pleasure: dominance in the male system is pleasure.

At the same time, essential to this gratification on some level is the
illusion that the women are not controlled by men but are acting freely.
The photographs of the two women are a peek through a keyhole. The
conceit is that since the male is not in the photographs, the women are
doing what they want to do willfully and for themselves: "When Katherina
was asked why she was having her pubic hair styled, she told us that it
was purely for her own self. " What women in private want to do just
happens to be what men want them to do. This is the meanest theme of
pornography: the elucidation of what men insist is the secret, hidden,
true carnality of women, free women. When the secret is revealed, the
whore is exposed. The woman in private (female privacy as a state of
being that is emphasized when two females are pictured together without
a male) is, in fact, the shameless slut, all life and value in the
vagina, all pride in the genitals, the scissors the appropriate tool of
entry. Cut the castrating woman before she cuts. Coleridge's "willing
suspension of disbelief' operates more consistently in the viewing of
pornography than it ever has in the reading of literature. The willing
suspension of disbelief is crucial. Without it, one might remember that
this rendition of women in private is not women in private at all, but
women in makeup and costumes under hot lights in uncomfortable positions
posed before a camera behind which is a photographer behind whom is a
publisher behind whom is a multibillion-dollar industry behind which are
rich lawyers claiming that the photographs are constitutionally
protected speech essential to human freedom behind whom are
intellectuals who find all of this revolutionary behind all of
whom---except the models---are women who launder their underwear and
clean their toilets. Indeed, to be a consumer of pornography one must be
adept at suspending disbelief. Should disbelief prove stubborn and not
easy to suspend, the knowledge that the models posed for money provides
confirmation that they are whores and then the photographs are a simple
expression of a general truth. For the viewer who remembers that the
photographs are artificial constructs, the photographs prove what the
photographs show: that women are whores, dumb and evil whores at that;
that women like to whore; that women choose to whore. The harlot nature
of women is authenticated by the very existence of the
photographs. as an adjective means "not
subject to control. "^4^ The imperative is clear: the harlot nature of
women must be controlled or the castrating potential of these wild women
might run amok. The scissors might be pointed in another direction. The
very illusion that these are free women doing what they want creates an
inevitable necessity: these females, basically cruel, must be
controlled, and any strategy that effectively controls them is warranted
because they have no recognizable civilized sensibility or intellectual
capacity---they are wild. Finally, of course, the male can relax: the
photographs themselves are his proof that male control has fully
contained and subdued any authentic female sexuality.

The photographs also document a rape, a rape first enacted when the
women were set up and used; a rape repeated each time the viewer
consumes the photographs. As described by Elizabeth Janeway, "\... one
of the charms of pornography is that it records session after session of
guiltless rape in which the powerful are licensed to have their will of
the weak because the weak 'really like it that way. "'^7^ The weak are
women as a class---economically, socially, and sexually degraded as a
given condition of birth: and the women in these photographs graphically
embody devotion to the male sexual system that uses them. "Really liking
it that way" is the ultimate survival necessity of women raped as a
matter of course---women who exist to be used by men, as these models
do. "The essence of rape, " as Suzanne Brogger wrote, "\... lies not in
the degree of psychological and physical force\... but in the
very toward women that makes disguised or
undisguised rape possible. The same attitude that requires a woman to be
dead, or at least a bloody mess, before she has earned the right to be
considered a victim at all. "^8^ The essence of rape, then, is in the
conviction that no woman, however clearly degraded by what she does, is
a victim. If the harlot nature of the female is her true nature, then
nothing that signifies or reveals that nature is either violating or
victimizing. The essence of rape is in the conviction that such
photographs---in any way, to any degree---show a female sexuality
independent of male power, outside the bounds of male supremacy,
uncontaminated by male force. The rape of women who appear to "really
like it that way" by camera is the first definition of the female as
victim in contemporary society---not dead, not a bloody mess. Not
yet.

There are two photographs, part of a four-picture, two-page layout with
text. In the first photograph, a woman stands upright. The front of her
body faces the camera directly. Her head is tilted slightly backwards
and turned to the left, so that she is looking up. Her eyes are black.
Her eye makeup is thick and black, emphasizing the blackness of her
eyes. Her hair is black, thick, and wavy. Her lips are full. Her skin is
olive in some places, brown in others, depending on how the light falls.
Her nipples are dark and so is her pubic hair which is abundant. Her
breasts are full. She wears black high heels, spiked, that appear to be
open at the toes, and black gloves that extend slightly past the elbows.
Her arms are raised above her head. Her hands are chained together at
the wrists and attached to a horizontal pole. Her body is bound in black
straps: a V opening up from her crotch, wrapped around her waist, an
upside-down V that crisscrosses between her breasts to form another V
that disappears behind her neck. Zigzagged across her body, in front and
behind, are bluish white laser beams. The woman is held stationary by
the laser beams that cut across and behind her body. A second photograph
shows the woman's naked ass and legs. The top border of the photograph
is cropped just below the woman's waist. She is standing. Her legs are
spread. She is wearing black spiked heels. Her ankles are manacled. The
manacles are fastened by chains to a pole that runs across the top part
of the photograph, blocked from view only where the woman's ass blocks
it. The chains that fasten the woman to the pole are attached to the
outside of each ankle and run perpendicular to the pole without any
slack. The woman's skin is brown. Several laser beams appear to
penetrate her vagina from behind. The rays of laser light converge from
below at what appears to be the point of entry into the woman. It is as
if the woman were hoisted on laser beams going into her vagina. The text
explains that has eight foreign editions and
that the favorite of the editors in the United States is the German one:
when they pass the German edition on to their Porsche mechanic, "our car
will---inexplicably---run that much better. "
editors in Munich "have a slightly different approach to eroticism, one
that is a refreshing break from the home-grown variety. As you can see
from these pictures, their taste runs to the technological. " The woman
is called "an exquisite volunteer. "

The laser promises burning. The word "laser" is an acronym for light
amplification by stimulated emission of radiation. Laser light is atomic
light. Alex Mallow and Leon Chabot, in the Laser Safety
Handbook, explain: "Light is produced by internal atomic
actions, and a particular form of these internal actions generates laser
light. "^9^ Laser light is especially distinguished from "regular"
light--- for instance, the light emitted from a light bulb---by its
incredible intensity, the fact that it is light of a very pure color,
that it manifests as a straight-arrow beam that can be directed with
nearly absolute accuracy at any target near or far (for instance,
according to, March 3, 1980, the
Pentagon is already developing laser weapons that can destroy tanks,
aircraft, missiles, and orbiting satellites). The intensity of light
emitted by a laser means that it also generates incredible heat. Laser
light is burning light. In, H.
G. Wells, with characteristic prescience, wrote of a ray that caused
whatever it touched to burn. He called it "that pitiless sword of heat,
"^10^ a fairly good description of the modem laser. In popular culture,
especially in science fiction and futuristic adventure films, a laser
beam, emitted from a gun, will cause a person or thing to vaporize.
Scientists have already acknowledged the laser as a potential
antipersonnel weapon of astonishing destructive capability. Nehrich,
Voran, and Dessel, in their basic book Atomic Light:
Lasers,
write that "\t\he use of the laser for a death ray cannot be avoided
as a possibility. It stands to reason that a light ray powerful enough
to penetrate steel could also burn through a nice soft human being.
"\"

The amount of energy used in a laser does not indicate its power.
In, Ronald Brown
explains: "A pulse from a ruby laser, focused by a lens, can blast a
hole in steel plate a third of a centimeter thick, yet it does not
contain enough energy to boil an egg. There is no contradiction here:
although the total energy in a pulse is not very great, it is very
highly concentrated. "^12^ According to O. S. Heavens in
Lasers:

> The hazard of the high-power carbon dioxide laser---which will burn a
> hole through a firebrick in seconds---is an obvious one so far as
> danger to humans is concerned. Less obvious is the potential harm that
> can result from looking at say, a helium-neon laser beam of
> only. Because the lens of
> the eye focuses the beam on to a minute spot on the retina, the
> intensity of illumination on the retinal cells could easily be high
> enough to cause damage. ^13^ \Italics mine\

In 1964, the United States Navy issued a report on hazards to laser
personnel:

> Whether the laser is used in the laboratory as a research tool, in
> the field as a simulator or as a weapon, or in a space vehicle as a
> means of communication, its property of generating intense light, and
> therefore heat, constitutes a potential hazard to the personnel who
> use it. ^14^

No reference is made, of course, to the use of the laser in
pornography, but one must assume that the hazards are not mitigated by
the fun factor.

O. S. Heavens summarizes the dangers of the laser as they are widely
recognized by authorities in the field:

> What are the ways in which laser radiation will affect biological
> material?\... First, the high intensity in a laser beam may produce
> heating, so producing a burn or even complete volatilisation of the
> material. Secondly, the laser beam may generate high-intensity
> acoustic (sound or ultrasonic) waves which may\... damage material in
> the neighbourhood of the laser shot\... Thirdly, the large electric
> field associated with the intense beam may affect the biological
> material. Fourthly, a pressure wave may spread out from the point of
> impact. Our present understanding of many of these effects is at a
> very primitive level\... ^I5^

Nehrich, Voran, and Dessel stress the foolishness involved in
underestimating the danger of any laser, however weak:

> It cannot be emphasized too strongly that there are many dangers in
> laser operations. Even the least powerful laser beam must be treated
> as potentially dangerous. It is not necessary, for example, to look
> directly into the laser beam in order to sustain eye damage.
> Accidental reflections from such things as wristwatch crystals, metal
> watch bands, buttons, jewels, or even a glossy enamelled surface may
> reflect a portion of the beam into someone's eye.^16^

Mallow and Chabot emphasize that "\electrocution is a real
possibility. Indeed, four documented electrocutions from laser-related
activities have occurred in the United States. "^17^ In addition to
citing dangers to eyes and skin and the possibility of electrical
accidents, John F. Ready warns against another threat commonly mentioned
in the literature on lasers: "there are hazards\... from the poisonous
materials which are used in many lasers and in laser-associated
equipment. These potential dangers have to be balanced against the
benefits to be gained from the use of lasers. "^18^ Mr. Ready, like the
U. S. Navy in its report on the hazards of lasers, did not
anticipate Perhaps in science and warfare
one must balance dangers against benefits, but in pornography there is
no viable argument against whatever works in exciting the male. The
importance of pornography to the human male is counted in gold; danger
to the female is counted in feathers. After all, the use of laser beams
to restrain and then apparently penetrate a woman is "a refreshing break
from the home-grown variety" of pornography, and once the mechanic sees
the photographs, "our car will--- inexplicably---run that much better. "
Should one---inexplicably--- argue that the use of the laser was both
hazardous and gratuitous--- and therefore too dangerous to be
warranted---one would be wrong. It was only hazardous. It was not
gratuitous.

The laser beams promise burning. The taste of some Germans has indeed
run to the technological: ovens in which masses of Jews were
exterminated. There was no laser in Hitler's time, but he and his men
pioneered the field of technologically proficient mass extermination.
The ethnic or racial identity of the model in this context becomes
clear: she is a Jewish physical type. A racial as well as a sexual
stereotype is exploited: she walks willingly into the oven. The
technological dimension, according to the text, distinguishes the
photographs as German; the technological dimension distinguished the
German slaughter of the Jews from all other mass slaughters of the Jews.
The technology used to kill is what made the numbers possible. The
ambition of the Germans to exterminate the Jews was realized to such a
staggering extent because of a commitment on the part of the Germans to
a technology of extermination. The mention of the Porsche---apparently
gratuitous---which "inexplicably" functions better, conjures up the
German transport of the Jews.^\*^ She is the Jew, the willing victim:
the Jews walked willingly into the ovens. She is the woman, the
volunteer for bondage. Women, too, were burned en masse in Germany: the
witchcraft persecutions. The manual character of those burnings meant
that killing was slower. As described by Pennethorne Hughes in
Witchcraft: "In almost every province of Germany the
persecution raged with increasing intensity. Six hundred were said to
have been burned by a single bishopric in Bamberg, where the special
witch jail was kept fully packed. Nine hundred were destroyed in a
single year in the bishopric of Wurzburg, and in Nuremberg and other
great cities there were one or two hundred burnings a year."^19^ All
Western Europe participated in the witch killings, but the mass
slaughters were horribly fierce in Germany. For the most part, the
witches were burned. The laser promises burning. The photographs
reprinted from the German, like all pieces
of pornography, do not exist in a historical vacuum. On the contrary,
they exploit history---especially historical hatreds and historical
suffering. The witches were burned. The Jews were burned. The laser
burns. Jew and woman, model is captive,
bound, in danger of burning.

\\*Ferdinand Porsche and his son Ferry developed assorted tanks for
Hitler as well as a champion racing car and the Volkswagen. The Porsches
worked for Krupp.\

The sexualization of "the Jewess" in cultures that abhor the
Jew---subtly or overtly---is the paradigm for the sexualization of all
racially or ethnically degraded women. As Sartre wrote in his
classic

> There is in the words "a beautiful Jewess" a very special sexual
> signification\... This phrase carries an aura of rape and massacre.
> The "beautiful Jewess" is she whom the Cossacks under the czars
> dragged by her hair through the streets of her burning village. And
> the special works which are given over to accounts of flagellation
> reserve a place of honor for the Jewess. But it is not necessary to
> look into esoteric \pornographic\ literature\.... the Jewess has a
> well-defined function in even the most serious novels. Frequently
> violated or beaten, she sometimes succeeds in escaping dishonor by
> means of death, but that is a form of justice. ^20^

Building on Sartre's insight, Susan Brownmiller, in Against
Our  linked the experience of black women in the
United States with that of the sexualized Jewess:

> It is reasonable to conjecture that the reputation for unbridled
> sensuality that has followed Jewish woman throughout history\... has
> its origins in the Jewish woman's historical experience of forcible
> rape, and is a projection onto them of male sex fantasies. In this
> respect, Jewish women and black women have a common bond: the
> reputation of lasciviousness and promiscuity that haunts black women
> in America today may be attributed to the same high degree of
> historical forcible rape.^21^

In this context, "forcible rape" (the word "forcible" underscoring the
reality of rape) does not mean the rape of Jew by Jew or black by black
or wife by husband or child by father or any other tribal or familial
forced sex act. In this context "forcible rape" means rape by an
outsider who is racially superior in a given social system and who
expresses this racial superiority through rape. The same outsider may
also rape women in his own group---also forcible rape though less often
recognized as such---but racially motivated rape is a discrete
historical reality and has meaning as a discrete phenomenon for both
rapists and victims.

The beautiful Jewess ravaged and dragged through the streets by her
hair is still enticing, still vibrantly alive in the pool of sexual
images that mystify the Jewish woman. But the Nazis in reality created a
kind of sexual degradation that was---and remains--- unspeakable. Even
Sade did not dare to imagine what the Nazis created and neither did the
Cossacks. And so the sexualization of the Jewish woman took on a new
dimension. She became the carrier of a new sexual memory, one so brutal
and sadistic that its very existence changed the character of the
mainstream sexual imagination. The concentration camp woman, a
Jew---emaciated with bulging eyes and sagging breasts and bones sticking
out all over and shaved head and covered in her own filth and cut up and
whipped and stomped on and punched out and starved---became the hidden
sexual secret of our time. The barely faded, easily accessible memory of
her sexual degradation is at the heart of the sadism against all women
that is now promoted in mainstream sexual propaganda: she in the
millions, she naked in the millions, she utterly at the mercy of---in
the millions, she to whom anything could be and was done---in the
millions, she for whom there will never be any justice or revenge---in
the millions. It is her existence that has defined contemporary mass
sexuality, given it its distinctly and unabashedly mass-sadistic
character. The Germans had her, had the power to make her. The others
want her, want the power to make her. And it must be said that the male
of a racially despised group suffers because he has been kept from
having her, from having the power to make her. He may mourn less what
has happened to her than that he did not have the power to do it. When
he takes back his manhood, he takes her back, and on her he avenges
himself: through rape, prostitution, and forced pregnancy; through
despising her, his contempt expressed in art and politics and pleasure.
This avenging---the reclamation of masculinity---is evident among Jewish
and black males, though it is in no way limited to them. In fact, in
creating a female degraded beyond human recognition, the Nazis set a new
standard of masculinity, honored especially in the benumbed conscience
that does not even notice sadism against women because that sadism is so
ordinary.

In his essay "Night Words, " literary critic George Steiner has
recognized the assimilation of concentration camp values into the
present erotic sensibility:

> The novels being produced under the new code of total statement shout
> at their personages: strip, fornicate, perform this or that act of
> sexual perversion. So did the S. S. guards at rows of living men and
> women. The total attitudes are not, I think, entirely distinct. There
> may be deeper affinities than we as yet understand between the "total
> freedom" of the uncensored erotic imagination and the total freedom of
> the sadist. That these two freedoms have emerged in close historical
> proximity may not be coincidence. Both are exercised at the expense of
> someone else's humanity, of someone else's most precious right---the
> right to a private life of feeling. ^22^

This cautious statement avoids the two crucial specifics: Jews and
women. It is not that only women were sexually abused or that the sadism
in every aspect of the camps had only to do with women. On the contrary,
men and boys were sexually used and castrated, giving credence to the
idea that unrestrained male sadism would not be gender specific. It is
not that only Jews were imprisoned and killed: many other groups,
including Gypsies, Poles, and homosexuals, were also captured and
slaughtered. The importance of the two specifics---Jew and
woman---resides in the resonating power of sexual memory. It is her
image---hiding, running, captive', dead--- that evokes the sexual
triumph of the sadist. She is his sexual memory and he lives in all men.
But this memory is not recognized as a sexual fact, nor is it
acknowledged as male desire: it is too horrible. Instead, she wants it,
they all do. The Jews went voluntarily to the ovens.

The central question is not: what is force and what is freedom? That is
a good question, but in the realm of human cruelty---the realm of
history---it is utterly abstract. The central question is: why is force
never acknowledged as such when used against the racially or sexually
despised? Nazi terror used against the Jews is not in dispute. Still,
there is an almost universal---and intrinsically
anti-Semitic---conviction that the Jews went voluntarily to the ovens.
Rational discourse on how the Jews were terrorized does not displace or
transform this irrational conviction. And similarly, no matter what
force is used against women as a class or as individuals, the universal
conviction is that women want (either seek out or assent to) whatever
happens to them, however awful, dangerous, destructive, painful, or
humiliating. A statement is made about the nature of the Jew, the nature
of the woman. The nature of each and both is to be a victim. A
metaphysical victim is never forced, only actualized.

The ideology that justifies force against the metaphysical victim and
then renders it invisible appears to be contradictory, whereas in fact
it is all-encompassing. Hitler painted the Jewish male as a rapist, a
despoiler of Aryan women. He painted the Jewish female as a harlot,
wild, promiscuous, the sensuous antithesis of the Aryan female, who was
blond and pure. Both male and female Jews were characterized as bestial
in their sexuality. The wild animal is dangerous and must be caged.
Hitler's first and most basic anti-Semitic appeal was not economic, that
is, the Jews control the money; it was sexual---and it was the sexuality
of the Jews, as portrayed by Hitler, that provoked the German response.
Real manhood demanded that the sexual beasts be tamed so that pure Aryan
women would not be ravished by the lustful Jew, and Aryan sperm, lured
by the lascivious Jewess, would not be misspent in producing
half-breeds. This is the paradigm of racist sexual ideology---every
racially despised group is invested with a bestial sexual nature. So the
force is marshaled and the terror is executed. The men are conquered,
castrated, killed. The women are raped, sterilized, tortured, killed.
When the terror subsides, the survivors are reevaluated: previously seen
as animals, now they are not recognizable as animal or human. They are
garbage, remains, degraded beyond recognition They are seen as
compliant, submissive, passive. They did not have to be conquered or
tamed or terrorized: they are too pitiful, too ruined. The use of force
is erased---it has no meaning---because these battered survivors must
have complied, consented: how else could they have been degraded to such
an appalling degree? The sexual nature of the metaphysical
victim---rapist or harlot---provokes force. The sexual nature of the
metaphysical victim---passive, submissive---erases force as the
authentic reason for compliance or submission.

The same sexual ideology that both justifies force and makes it
invisible is applied to all women, without reference to race, because
women are metaphysical victims: actualized, not forced.

The female is seen as sexual provocateur (harlot) or sexual submissive
or combinations thereof. "Good woman/bad woman" or "Madonna/whore" as
catchwords do not accurately describe the male conceptualization of
female nature(s), though each is popular as a coded reference to the
female dilemma. Each phrase denotes a conceptual polarity, commonly
thought of as "two sides of the same coin. " But in male ideology, the
elements of harlot and submissive are not really distinct because they
are applied simultaneously or sequentially in any proportions to any
woman in any circumstance. Rather than being "two sides of the same
coin, " the harlot-submissive elements are more like the elements in an
hourglass: always the same, always present, yet the proportions shift
relative to each other, the shifts being manipulated by the one who
manipulates the hourglass.

Havelock Ellis maintained that "\... the primary part of the female in
courtship is the playful, yet serious, assumption of the role of a
hunted animal who lures on the pursuer, not with the object of escaping,
but with the object of being finally caught. "^23^ Here her resistance
is a form of provocation that enables her to submit. Ellis considered
"modesty" the single most important defining characteristic of the
female. In his world view, which is so significant because his study is
the first modern codification of male sexual values, force is required
to conquer modesty: "Force is the foundation of virility, and its
psychic manifestation is courage. In the struggle for life violence is
the first virtue. The modesty of women---in its primordial form
consisting in physical resistance, active or passive, to the assaults of
the male---aided selection by putting to the test man's most important
quality, force. Thus it is that when choosing among rivals for her
favors a woman attributes value to violence. "^24^ This view of sex
exists with or without reference to genes, hormones, and the like. It is
old and it is new. It is male. It means that a woman naturally resists
force because she wants to be conquered by it. It means that the
violence she resists is ultimately what she values. It means that she is
responsible for giving violence its sexual value by selecting the
violent male. It demands that one believe that once the violent male has
captured her, it is she who has selected, she who has made the choice.
This is the fate of the metaphysical victim: to be seen as responsible
for the violence used against her. She wants it, they all do. The
violence used against her is never a measure of her authentic
resistance. Her final submission is not seen as the triumph of
terrorism; it is seen as her nature, her choice---her design all along.
The simple, self-evident equation between the force of the aggressor and
the will of the victim---that force means a violation of will---is never
plausible when the one violated is a woman. Given the premises of this
utterly irrational belief system, it is then easy to assert, as Ellis
does, that women like the pain inevitably inflicted on them by the
sexual violence of men: "While in men it is possible to trace a tendency
to inflict pain, or the simulacrum of pain, on the women they love, it
is still easier to trace in women a delight in experiencing physical
pain when inflicted by a lover, and an eagerness to accept subjection to
his will. Such a tendency is certainly normal. "^25^

Masochism, then, is defined as synonymous with normal femininity as it
manifests in normal women. As expressed so gracelessly by Theodor Reik
in "Feminine masochism of the
woman? Sounds like a pleonasm. It is comparable to an expression like,
'the Negro has dark skin. ' But the color of the skin is defined simply
by the term Negro; a white Negro is no Negro. "^26^ For a white in a
white-supremacist society, the color of the skin determines race; it is
an oppressor's criterion, not authentically derived from the experiences
of those measured by it. The white determines that the color of the skin
is the measure of identity, whether or not the color of the skin
corresponds to racial, social, cultural, or familial history or
experience of the ones defined from the outside. The essence of
oppression is that one is defined from the outside by those who define
themselves as superior by criteria of their own choice. That is why
women are defined---from the outside, by men---as masochistic. Masochism
is intrinsically both provocation and submission. The ideology that
justifies force against women, and at the same time makes that force
invisible, requires that masochism be the normal female state: she wants
it, they all do. But since masochism defined more specifically as sexual
gratification that is derived from pain manifests in some few men, the
masochism of the female---even that---must be seen as inferior to the
masochism of men. The fictive dichotomy of absolute male and female
sexual natures rooted in anatomical differences must be maintained;
otherwise---especially when it is acknowledged that the male is capable
of masochism---male sexual supremacy might be perceived as delusional.
Reik's solution is dazzlingly simple:

> But how does it happen that in female masochism the ferocity and
> resoluteness, the aggressiveness and the vigor of the male masochism
> is missing? I believe personally that the anatomical situation does
> not permit the cultivation of a strong sadism within the woman. The
> prerequisite of the penis as the carrier of aggression is missing.
> ^27^

Masochism in the male is transformed into a form of sadism. He suffers
to conquer; she suffers to submit.

In, Robert Stoller psychoanalyzes
his pseudonymous but eloquently named patient, Belle. Interpreting
Belle's sexual fantasy life, Stoller discovers that female suffering is
an occasion for female triumph:

> Secreted in the apparent suffering is the triumph. The way is open to
> full pleasure. What better disguise than to display publicly the
> opposite---suffering---of what one is secretly or unconsciously
> experiencing: revenge, undoing, triumph. She has even more control
> than all these brutal, powerful men. They try to dominate her, but
> nothing they can do\... enslaves her. Instead, she belongs to herself,
> ultimately at the mercy only of her own oversexed nature.
> ^28^

The ideological commitment on the part of the male thinker here is
clear: Belle chooses to suffer and the "brutal, powerful men" do what
she wants. Stoller's vehicle for his ideology is so-called fantasy: he
is describing and analyzing Belle's sexual fantasy which she "authored";
so the concept of choice is particularly underscored. Rather than seeing
the sexual images in Belle's inner life as symbolic images---symbolic of
a sexual reality in which she is used, trapped, humiliated, angry,
powerless to change the values of the men who devalue her---Stoller
attributes her sexual masochism as expressed in her inner life to her
own free choice. The conceit, popular with psychiatrists and
psychologists, is that a free mind can exist within a colonialized body.
According to Stoller, Belle chooses sexual masochism because through it
she triumphs over men whom ultimately she controls because she is the
provocation to which they respond. This is an expression "of her own
oversexed nature. " She wants it, they all do.

The limitless possibilities of female choice are articulated with
slightly different emphasis by Georges Bataille:

> \... prostitution is the logical consequence of the feminine
> attitude. In so far as she is attractive, a woman is a prey to men's
> desire. Unless she refuses completely because she is determined to
> remain chaste, the question is at what price and under what
> circumstances will she yield. But if the conditions are fulfilled she
> always offers herself as an object. Prostitution proper only brings in
> a commercial element. ^29^

Bataille introduces the all-or-nothing variant: she can choose to be
chaste or she can choose to be whore. The assertion that she has even
this choice---that she can choose chastity---ignores the whole history
of the world, in which rape is the perpetual sexual motion of the male.
Any so-called choice for sex is a choice for prostitution. Since she is
prey "in so far as she is attractive, " she can choose chastity only
insofar as she is not attractive. Once raped she is, ipso facto,
attractive because she has attracted a predator. Once raped,
retroactively speaking, she has chosen---chosen her prostitute nature.
Since she is prey "in so far as she is attractive, " forced sex reveals
the prostitute nature that is her true nature "in so far as she is
attractive. " If a man wants her and takes her, she is a whore and has
made a choice. No matter what is done to or with her, the idea is that
she has chosen her "price" and "circumstances. "

The meaning of force is also obscured by the liberal view, which grants
that there is a social tendency to degrade women but assumes that women
who want to resist can do so successfully. This means that women who are
in fact mercilessly degraded bring it on themselves. In The
Homosexual Matrix, a book saturated with misogyny and
condescension toward all women, homosexual or not, C. A. Tripp insists
that "\... a woman's status is highly variable. It is determined more by
how she conducts herself than by other people's predispositions toward
her. "^30^ If she does not want it, she does not get it. If she gets it,
she wants it. Tripp describes a woman's rugged, willful descent to the
bottom: "To take an extreme example, not even in the most chauvinistic
societies is a wife a drudge on her wedding day, or for some time
following. It is as if she only slowly works her way down to this level
(admittedly with the help of social pressures)\... "^31^ Requisite to
this view is Tripp's conviction, based on faith, not fact: "Nor in any
era has the individual woman suffered low status whenever she has been
'willful' or has simply had the power---be it political, financial, or
social---to express her independence or even her own choices. "^32^ A
simple exercise of individual will can supposedly establish a woman as
an exception to what is acknowledged as the generally demoralized status
of her kind. A failure to exercise this will is a bona fide choice:
since one can, if one does not, then one has chosen not to. The use of
the exception (with reference to women more imagined than not) to
reconcile all the rest to the rule is clearly shown for what it is in
this resourceful example from R. H. Tawney's
Equality, an analysis of class oppression in
England:

> It is possible that intelligent tadpoles reconcile themselves to the
> inconveniences of their position, by reflecting that, though most of
> them will live and die as tadpoles and nothing more, the more
> fortunate of the species will one day shed their tails, distend their
> mouths and stomachs, hop nimbly on to dry land, and croak addresses to
> their former friends on the virtues by means of which tadpoles of
> character and capacity can rise to be frogs. This conception of
> society may be described, perhaps, as the Tadpole Philosophy, since
> the consolation which it offers for social evils consists in the
> statement that exceptional individuals can succeed in evading them.
> ^33^

Women, alas, become Mrs. Frog or frog's girl. Should the female aspire
to be a frog in her own right---as an intellectual or artist or lawyer
or anything outside the realm of femininity (harlotry and
submission)---she will be, as Mary Wollstonecraft described, "hunted out
of society as masculine. '"^4^ The force of the hunt, the violence
intrinsic to it, is justified by the deviance of the one
hunted.

And so there is a woman, tied with black rope, hands chained together
at the wrists above her head, her body constrained by laser beams that
crisscross in front of and behind her body. She is "an exquisite
volunteer. " And so there is a woman, her ankles manacled, laser beams
appearing to penetrate her vagina. The laser cuts as well as burns. The
laser is used in surgery. The laser functions as a knife.
Vagina means sheath. She is "an exquisite volunteer. " She
volunteers to be what she is, what all women are: harlot and submissive
in one, her presence and representation an affirmation and an echo of
her essence as a woman---she wants it, they all do. In describing the
laser, one pioneer in the field said that "\l\ight has become
something not only to look with, but also a palpable force to be
reckoned with. '"^5^ Used as a sadistic weapon against a woman in
pornography, a laser cannot be regarded as a palpable force or any force
at all because force has no reality when used against a metaphysical
victim: she is always "an exquisite volunteer"--- expressing her own
free will and/or actualizing her own true nature. She wants it, they all
do.

The scene is a Mexican jail.

First photograph, two full pages: A Mexican policeman holds a rifle
butt in the back of a Mexican woman. The rifle butt pushes her up
against the bars of a cell. An Anglo man in the cell is holding the
woman around the waist with one hand, lifting her T-shirt to reveal her
breasts with the other.

Second photograph, one full page: The woman is on her knees. Her denim
shorts are pulled down to her ankles. Her T-shirt is raised above her
breasts. Her hands are brought together as if in prayer. The policeman
is sitting, his uniform open to reveal a hairy chest, balls, and
semierect cock. In one hand he holds the keys to the jail cell. With the
other hand, he points to his penis.

Third photograph, one full page: The woman is supporting herself on her
hands, she is on all fours except that her knees are raised slightly off
the floor. The policeman, sitting, is apparently fucking her in the
ass.

Fourth, fifth, and sixth photographs, two full pages: In the fourth
photograph, the policeman sits drinking tequila from a bottle. The woman
sits on the floor masturbating. The man in the cell holds the arm of the
woman and watches her masturbate. He and the woman hold the keys to the
cell. In the fifth photograph, the woman is naked. Her arms are
stretched to hold the top crossbar of the doorway of the now open cell.
The Anglo man holds her from behind around the waist. He appears to be
fucking her. In the sixth photograph, the Anglo man is sitting on the
bed in the cell. His hands are embracing the woman's back. The woman is
on her knees. Her ass is in the forefront of the photograph. Labia hang
between her legs.

Seventh photograph, two full pages: The woman is on the bed in the
cell, legs spread, vulva bright pink, masturbating. The skin just below
her knee is badly bruised. The Anglo man is on his knees on the floor.
His ass is emphasized by his position. His mouth is approaching her
breast. In the background, through the bars of the cell, the policeman
is sleeping, his rifle upright beside him.

Eighth photograph, one full page: The Anglo man and the woman are on
the bed. Her vulva, painted pink, is exposed by the spread of her legs.
His hand is on the inside of her thigh. Her hand is just above his
balls.

Ninth photograph, one full page: The woman is on top, the man is under
her, they appear to be fucking, he appears to be completely inside
her.

Tenth photograph, two full pages: The woman lies in the forefront
masturbating, her vulva is extremely pink, the man reclines behind her.
The bruises on the woman's leg are in the forefront of the
photograph.

According to the text, printed within the photographic frames, the
woman is named Consuela ("consolation"). Consuela has a Yankee
boyfriend. He got into a fight in a bar and was arrested. Consuela
cannot bear to be without him; so, "driven by passion, she bribes her
way past her lover's jailer. The guard has no trouble getting it up for
the hot-blooded senorita, but he's a mite greedy. Finally, he OD's on
lust (and tequila). " The boyfriend \"has had to watch and now he's a
little greedy himself. " The moral of the story is that "\a\ spell in
jail doesn't seem such a terrible fate after all. " 

Everyone's skin is approximately the same color, a light brown.
Consuela and the policeman have black hair. The policeman has a black
mustache. The boyfriend has lighter hair, still brown, and he too has a
mustache with stubble making a dark, shadowy beard. Consuela's lips are
painted a glossy pinkish red, her nails are a duller red, her vulva is
pink. She wears a bright red flower behind one ear. Consuela's facial
expressions indicate rapture, except in the photograph in which she is
being fucked in the ass by the policeman---there her expression
indicates pain and rapture. Her boyfriend's expressions indicate
rapture. The policeman's face is hard and indifferent. One never sees
his eyes. They are always either blocked by the visor on his policeman's
cap, which he wears throughout, or they are closed. Consuela is "the
hot-blooded senorita, " the ethnic slur cast so as to be both specific
(she is Mexican) and evocative (she is the hot-blooded Latin or Hispanic
woman, the hot woman of the south, Carmen Miranda or D. H. Lawrence's
mythic Etruscan female). She is the woman sexed by the climate. The
color of her skin signals the climate. The climate signals the color of
her skin. The text refers to "Siesta time" and "the sticky heat" and the
cockroaches in the cell, so that the heat of the climate is part of the
sexual imagery. The heat of the climate heats the blood of "the
hot-blooded senorita, " heats her skin, heats her sex. She happily
offers herself to the policeman because she must be fucked by her
boyfriend. In the Anglo-Amerikan sexual lexicon, the Latin or Hispanic
woman is the woman who cannot do without it. She begs for it. With
Mexicans and Puerto Ricans among the poorest of the poor in the United
States and with Mexicans particularly despised and exploited as aliens,
the photographs have a cruel immediacy. The depiction of "the
hot-blooded senorita" who is willing to do anything---even to submit
sexually to one of her own kind---in order to be fucked by her Anglo
boyfriend embodies an imperial malice. She is used by the Mexican
policeman but she belongs to the Anglo boyfriend. She prostitutes
herself for him, not because he wants it, but because she wants
it.

Once the male figure enters the pornographic picture, he himself is not
enough. The paraphernalia of manhood must enter with him: especially
uniforms and guns. His sexual force must be emphasized through
reiteration: the jail bars (especially when her body is stretched up
against them), the rifle (especially when it is pushed against her from
behind), the policeman as a figure of brute force, even huge cacti drawn
to look like phalluslike growths outside the windows throughout the
photographs. The presence of two males is in and of itself a reiteration
of male sexual force, even though each male figure has a different
racial ^\*^ significance. The pictorial center is the woman: she is
visually lush; she is sexually used. But the drama, such as it is, is in
the racial and sexual tension between the two men.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

\*The power relationship is racist, even though the literal distinction
between the two men is ethnic. Racism is not comprehensible as a
phenomenon based on color of skin alone: for instance, anti-Semitism is
a form of racism regardless of whether Jews are noticeably darker than
the non-Jewish population and regardless of whether the Jewish genetic
pool in question forms a distinct and verifiable race. The perception of
a group as not-white and an actual history of contempt, exploitation,
and abuse based on that perception mark as racist the relationship of a
white-superior group to any other group not perceived as part of that
white-superior group. 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Mexican male is the figure of overt force and brute sexuality.
Every aspect of his stance expresses the brutality of the fuck and a
corresponding incapacity to feel. He is the insensitive brute. He fucks
the woman without taking off his pants or hat or shirt. When he is
finished with her, he drinks tequila from a bottle. The Anglo boyfriend,
by contrast, is presented as a sensitive figure: he is, in contrast, the
delicate lover. His face always expresses rapture. He is slighter in
build than the Mexican male, taller, even more delicate in his physique.
A basic opposition of light and dark is established, even though the
skin colors of the two males are approximately the same: the Anglo's
hair is lighter, he has less chest hair---even the relative delicacy of
build contributes to the stereotypical light-dark contrast. The Anglo
does more than fuck the woman; he touches her, approaches her nipple,
puts his hand on her thigh, sleeps peacefully while she---never having
enough---masturbates, Compared with the Mexican male, he expresses a
delicacy of feeling as well as a delicacy of touch. This, indeed, is
basic to racist sexual ideology: the white male is the civilized male,
the bearer of a civilized sexuality. The darker male, the inferior male,
has a brute sexual nature. Yet the white male is in Mexico, in a Mexican
jail. The power relationship between the two men puts the Mexican on
top: it is the white male who, without the woman present, is endangered
by the brute sexuality of the Mexican. The danger is most clearly
conveyed in the two-page photograph in which the woman masturbates as
the white male approaches her nipple; he is down on his knees on the
floor as she lies legs spread on the bed, his ass is prominently
displayed, behind his ass is the sleeping policeman with his rifle
upright beside him. The white male, as the delicate male, is the
sexually endangered male. The rifle is the phallic presence, near entry
to the vulnerable ass of the white male. The white male is captive; the
Mexican male is captor. The sexuality of the white male is depicted as
superior in sensitivity. The sexuality of the Mexican male is depicted
as superior in terms of brute sexual force. The racially degraded male
is, in fact, consistently depicted in this fashion: his alleged sexual
nature, being brute and thus bestial, is precisely what licenses
violence against him in a racist value system. His sexuality is a savage
masculinity, while the phallus of the white carries civilization to the
dark places. This is the nexus of sex and race. If women really amount
to nothing, are worth nothing, then the conquest of them--- except for
the momentary pleasure of it---means nothing, proves nothing. It is not
sustaining. It cannot sustain a sense of masculine superiority because
the conquest of nothing is nothing. But the conquest of other men,
especially men with a more massive, more brute sexuality, does amount to
something. It is sustaining because the conquest of bigger, better cock
is the ultimate conquest. And here one finds the bribe. The racially
degraded male collaborates in the degradation of women---all
women---because he is offered something important for his complicity: an
acknowledgment of a sexuality of which the racially superior male is
envious. There is praise in the insult, so much praise, or such
essential praise, that the racially degraded male is mesmerized by the
myth of his own masculinity, mesmerized into accepting the ideology that
posits the force of his sex as his identity, ever though this myth often
costs him his life. The solution then seems simple: he will avenge
himself on the women of the racially superior group through taboo sexual
relations or he will take back his own women using his sexuality against
them. He cannot see his way clear to making an alliance with
women---even the women of his peer group---based on sexual justice
because he has accepted the bribe: masculinity belongs to him; he brings
it to its purest expression; to contaminate it through empathy with the
female would mean weakening or losing it, the one thing he has,
masculinity. And so, in Hispanic communities in the United States, one
sees the cult of machismo, the cult of masculine suicide, lived to its
fullest: gang warfare, the organized supermasculine packs that maim and
kill each other because masculine pride depends on it. The bribe, once
accepted by the racially degraded male of any group, insures that if the
racially superior male does not kill him, he will kill himself. The
triumph of masculinity is realized in the triumph of male over male,
whether the sphere of conflict for dominance is intraracial or
interracial. The genius of the bribe is in the fact that, metaphorically
speaking, no matter which gang wins the battle, the white man wins the
war. The sexuality of the racially degraded male---the only capacity
allowed him---becomes both justification for taming or colonializing or
castrating him and the mechanism by which he destroys himself, because
he honors masculinity as authentic identity.

The essential sexual antagonism that is basic to racism is expressed as
if the possession of women were the issue, but fundamentally the
antagonism is homoerotic. Antagonism is established in male sexual
thought as a key element in sexual excitement. The importance of
antagonism, proclaimed with trumpets and fanfare by sexual philosophers
when the conflict is male-female, is understated when applied to race
because its fascist content is more easily perceived. For instance,
Tripp consistently maintains that wife beating is an expression of an
erotic, exciting sexual antagonism. So did Havelock Ellis, and this
assertion is common in the ruminations of the male sexual philosophers.
In describing the systematic devaluing of the female, Tripp can point to
the sexual benefits of this devaluing. It increases sexual antagonism,
which increases sexual pleasure:

> From this vantage point it is evident that the many derogations of
> women are more than merely the incidental offshoots of male supremacy
> and female "inferiority. " They also qualify as contrivances that
> sharpen the breach between the sexes, increase the tension
> (resistance) between them, and add spice to their relations.
> ^36^

Has a liberal, serious thinker ever postulated that racial insults or
the violence of white supremacy adds "spice" to race relations? Instead,
the thinker (in this case Tripp) is more circumspect: "The clash between
social levels, between races, between partners who are dispositionally
mismatched can all lead to arousing situations as easily, or more
easily, than contacts between conventionally compatible partners.
"^37^

Stoller carries the notion of antagonism, which he calls hostility or
resistance, into the realm of danger:

> To me, "excitement" implies anticipation in which one alternates with
> extreme rapidity between expectation of danger and just about equal
> expectation of avoidance of danger, and in some cases, such as in
> eroticism, of replacing danger with pleasure. ^38^

The heightening of sexual pleasure in the male system demands a
heightening of antagonism, an intensification of danger---and in a
racist society, racial conflict represents the most keenly felt, the
most dangerous, form of antagonism: this alone is enough to give it its
sexual value in the male system. In rigid class societies, class has the
same value. Possession of the woman is presented as the reason for the
antagonism, whereas in fact it is the antagonism that gives value to
possession of the woman. The antagonism that counts in the sexual sphere
is the antagonism between male and male because it is between two real
(that is, phallic) beings. A racist male hierarchy heightens this
antagonism and further sexualizes the male-male interactions that take
place over and through women's bodies. This sexualization occurs both in
men elevated and in men demeaned by the racist system. But the elevated
male tells a lie: he claims that he is afraid that the brute sexuality
of the racially degraded male will be used against "his" women. In fact,
he is afraid that this sexuality will be used against him. This is the
meaning of the pornographic depiction of the Anglo in a Mexican jail,
his ass exposed and highlighted next to the erect rifle of a Mexican
policeman---this depiction published in the United States, where the
power relationship in reality is precisely the opposite. Since sexual
force used against the white male is recognized as force, it need only
be suggested to provoke racial hatreds---one of the main functions of
pornography since these hatreds are highly sexualized. To make the
sexual tension pleasurable, a resolution is provided. The woman is the
resolution. The sexual use of the racially degraded female, common
usage, allows the male viewer, whatever his background or ethnic values,
to experience the male-male sexual antagonism not as anguish but as
pleasure: she can be fucked by both of them, used by both of them,
because she begs for it, she cannot do without it. Her usage
protects---in this case---the white male from violation by the Mexican
male. Neither male violates her because she cannot do without it. She is
not forced; she begs for it.

The feature is called "The Art of Dominating Women. " It consists of
four black-and-white photographs and a "case history" with an
introduction by a "Dr. " The first photograph is a full page. A white
woman, very white skin, dark hair, gagged, her wrists bound together by
rope, hangs suspended by her bound wrists from a light fixture. Her legs
are spread. Each ankle is tied by rope to the thigh of the same leg. She
is wearing sheer black tights that cover the legs and stop at the waist.
She is wearing black high heels. A workman dressed in overalls is
squeezing one of her breasts apparently to pulp. The next three
photographs are all three inches by two and a half inches. They are the
middle column of a page, with the print of the accompanying story on
each side. The second photograph, the first of the small ones, shows the
woman on her back, her legs spread open, her knees flexed. She wears a
black corset that goes from her waist to just below her nipples,
apparently squeezing the breasts tightly. She is gagged and the gag is
reinforced with some kind of metal contraption that fastens behind her
neck. Her hands, raised above her head, are fastened by white chains
that are wrapped around her arms and around her neck. Her legs, flexed
at the knees, are bound, thigh to calf of each separate leg, by various
metal contraptions and straps. There are so many metal or leather
constraints on each leg that flesh is barely visible, except right
between her legs, the pubic area. Her ankles are manacled. The third
photograph, the second small one, shows the woman tied at her wrists and
above her elbows by white rope, arms raised over her head, gagged. The
workman in overalls is grabbing her breast. He is approaching the breast
with pliers. The fourth photograph, the third small one, shows the
gagged woman to just below her breasts. The hand with the pliers is also
in the picture. The pliers appear to be cutting her breast. The feature
promises \"\i\ntimate details of a thoroughly submissive female and
the incredible excesses she requires for total satisfaction." The doctor
explains that all relationships are really sadomasochistic. The doctor
explains that the sadist is a leader, a guide, and that this role
properly falls to the male. The doctor explains that with the growth of
the women's movement more men than usual seem to be sexually submissive
but, never fear, the male will never give up or lose his role of
leadership. The doctor explains that most men remain interested in the
genuinely submissive woman. The doctor explains that in his private
practice as a sexologist he has met many such women and he is now going
to open up his private files so that the reader can delve, be edified,
and masturbate. The "case history" is as follows. She finds her life
confusing. She is without purpose. She needs guidance. Also, she
remembers her father squeezing her when she was a child. For these
reasons, she likes to be bound, gagged, humiliated, and badly hurt:
"nothing will get my snatch drippier. " She can manage to get off while
being beaten with a hairbrush if she is handcuffed. The most extreme
bondage she experienced almost killed her. She was bound at the feet and
wrists and hung by the neck until she began suffocating. She prefers
being tied to a footstool, each of her arms and legs bound separately to
separate legs of the stool while she is in a nylon straitjacket. The
best fun she ever had was with a man who owned a complete supply of
bondage equipment of a certain brand: she lists the items in two
separate paragraphs of considerable length. As much as she enjoys all of
this for its own sake, she also enjoys the thrill of finding the man who
will do all these things to her. She takes to the streets and finds
Puerto Ricans. She explains Puerto Rico's commonwealth status, explains
that the island of Puerto Rico is in the Caribbean, explains that Puerto
Rican males are to be found in large numbers in urban areas of the
United States. She explains that Puerto Rican men have huge cocks and a
peculiar view of maleness called machismo. She found Carlos on a street
corner. He was drinking rum from a bottle. He had a huge bulge in his
pants. She told him in Spanish that she was a witch and wanted him to
fuck her. They took a cab to her house, petted in the traffic. He was
wearing bikini underpants, which she claims is another thing one can
count on with Puerto Ricans. They reached her home, smoked a joint, put
on a disco record. The hair on his body was cinnamon. She is very white,
twenty-two years old, very thin, with big breasts and a big ass, "the
kind that begs to be spanked. " Her pussy smells sweet, has a good grip,
and the hair on her head, under her armpits, and in the pubic area all
matches. Carlos sucked her tits, they kissed and smeared saliva all
over. He whispered in her ear a lot. She could not wait any longer. She
grabbed his cock. It was! She sucked on
it and then he took over. He grabbed her neck, shoved his fingers into
her vagina, then into her ass, shoved his cock down her throat, hit her
in the eye, smacked her a few times. She pushed his cock into her
pussy:

"It was so painful. If felt like a hot
poker was being shoved into my body. " This was because it was so big.
She wanted them both to experience the rapture of bondage simultaneously
but seriously doubted that Carlos had the temperament for this. He
agreed to handcuff her wrists behind her back, so she had to make do
with imagining Carlos "restrained against Gothic pillars" as she was
"trussed up and hogtied for his pleasure. " Then he fucked her in the
ass and spanked her at the same time. Then he took off her handcuffs and
put a noose around her neck that was attached to a dog collar. Then he
ordered her to lick his ass clean, which she then did. Then he fucked
her some more. Then he tied her to a Parsons table and gagged her with a
leather belt. Then he fucked her in the ass. When he stopped she farted
so he punished her for this breach of manners by biting her tits and
ears until they bled. Then he beat her across the face with his cock.
She kept trying to cry out "Fuck me. Fuck.. Fuck!! Fuck!! FUCK ME! " but
the gag prevented her. So he just kept beating her face with his cock,
which she compares to the Chrysler Building. She was certain that he
would piss in her mouth but he did not, which disappointed her. Instead,
he fucked her for a half hour: "\s\uch a sensation one gets only once
in a lifetime, and I was lucky. " She knew the experience of total
submission to a man: "being tied down, beaten to a pulp, and fucked with
a big dick until there was hardly a hole left\... " This was a "mystic"
revelation "which spelled out in neon: 'Woman, you are
*alive*!" She then explains that for Carlos too this was the
supreme experience of life. Finally Carlos came. Carlos collapsed over
her body for nearly an hour. She was still tied to the Parsons table and
gagged. She had to pee. Carlos untied her. She gave him a joint and some
orange juice. They left her apartment together. She kissed him good-bye
at the subway. On her way home she saw a beautiful Dominican man who
asked her if she was the witch. She took him home. She concludes that
having a reputation is a wonderful thing.

Force here is acknowledged. The form the acknowledgment takes is
celebration. Force, rendered invisible or insignificant in other
instances of female degradation, is here the point and purpose
of sex. Force is sex. The woman who wants sex wants force.
Every possible emphasis on force is encouraged through violence against
the woman's body and through concentration on the mechanics and
artifacts of bondage. The conceit is that this is a woman's story told
in a woman's voice, a woman's celebration of the force she seeks out so
that she can submit to it, be hurt by it, and experience her
transcendent femininity. This transcendent femininity is supposed to be
the exclusive province of white women, sheltered, protected, spoiled,
bossy. The white woman actively recruits the Puerto Rican male because
of his huge cock and his "peculiar view" of masculinity called machismo.
The white woman, the totally submissive woman, demands total force,
total pain, total humiliation, at the hands of a male racially
stereotyped as a sexual brute. She is the woman who demands it. The two
poles of her existence as a white woman are underscored: she is boss;
she is total submissive. The violence she requires is the measure of her
need to submit. Her appetite for pain is insatiable. Short of death,
which would not offend her if it were cruel enough, nothing done to her
can harm her sufficiently to stop her from demanding it from the next
(Hispanic) man and the next (Hispanic) man and the next (Hispanic) man,
so great is her need to submit. This is the particular erotic
significance given to white skin as a sexual symbol in the women of
pornography: she is the boss who demands servicing, who demands force
and violence and pain; she is insatiable; she is the unquenchable
submissive whose femininity is fulfilled in the most abject degradation.
The force is recognized as real because she demands it. In this context,
rape or battery cannot exist as violations of female will because they
are viewed as expressions of female will. It is through the celebration
of force---supposedly her celebration of it---that rape becomes just a
better-quality fuck and battery becomes excellent foreplay. The white
woman uses her racial superiority to demand rape, to demand battery, to
demand humiliation, to demand pain. She wills these experiences and
revels in them. The male complies. He is going his own way when she
intervenes and demands. She is the initiator. She sets the terms. It is
this sexualization of the white woman that is used as the standard
sexuality of all women, unless specific racial characteristics are
exploited to indicate particular modulations of sexuality. As many black
feminists have pointed out, "women" almost always means "white women. "
So all women are saddled with the supposed sexual nature of white women,
while women of color have added onto that nature the sexual attributes
imposed as a consequence of color in a society in which color is seen as
deviant from the norm. Conversely and at the same time, sexual
philosophers in white-supremacist societies search so-called primitive
tribes, subcultures of persons of color, and societies in which persons
of color are the majority for endless examples of wife beating and other
sexual violence against women to demonstrate that such violence is
natural (the natural will of women), not culture-bound. The sexuality of
the woman of color is supposedly outside the constraints of
civilization, that is, natural. The sexuality of the white woman is the
norm of civilized sexuality. In both circumstances, the violence. women
experience is postulated as being the will of the women; in both
circumstances, she wants it, they all do. The degree of force (force
perceived as such) used against the white woman establishes the norm of
force acceptable in sex in white-supremacist civilization. The degree of
force, then, is without limit because she wants it to be. Nothing done
to the female can possibly violate her because the white woman demands
violence and pain; her demand gives force its sexual value. The white
woman, the civilized woman, whose transcendent femininity is realized
through submission, requires force. Force to exist as such requires
violence. Violence inevitably means the infliction of pain. The norm of
femininity as it manifests in normal women is masochism. Force
actualizes femininity. Violence is sex. Pain is pleasure for the woman.
The pornographic conceit is that the normal female demands the force,
the violence, the pain. This pornographic conceit is precisely
reiterated in the works of the most distinguished sexual philosophers,
who as purveyors of male supremacy necessarily share the values implicit
in it. This pornographic conceit accounts for the fact that men in
general do not believe that rape or battery are violations of female
will. Film critic Molly Haskell, at the end of a decade of vigorous
feminism in the United
States, expressed the weary anger and astonishment of women who keep
knocking their heads against this particular brick wall:

> If we think talking it all out has brought us \men and women\
> closer together in the last few years, we have only to broach the
> subject of rape. Men seem incapable of understanding what rape means
> to a woman---the sense of total violation, or the mere threat of rape
> as a lifelong shadow over her freedom of movement\....

> The central division is between the sense of rape as an act of
> hostility and aggression, as women see and know and experience it, and
> rape as an erotic act, as fantasized by men. ^39^

Men do not believe that rape or battery are violations of female will
in part because men of influence have consumed pornography in the
private world of men for centuries. Men of sensibility and intelligence
and cultural achievement have always incorporated its values into their
mainstream cultural work in art, religion, law,\* literature,
philosophy, and now psychology, films, and so forth. In many cases,
these otherwise thoughtful men have been educated about women and sex
through pornography, which they see as hidden, forbidden sexual truth.
The most enduring sexual truth in pornography---widely articulated by
men to the utter bewilderment of women throughout the ages---is that
sexual violence is desired by the normal female, needed by her,
suggested or demanded by her. She---perpetually coy or
repressed---denies the truth that pornography reveals. It is either/or.
Either the truth is in the pornography or she tells the truth. But men
are the tellers of truth and men are the creators of and believers in
pornography. She is silenced altogether---she is not a voice in the
cultural dialogue, except as an annoying or exceptional whisper---and
when she speaks, she lies. She hides and denies what pornography reveals
and affirms: that she wants it, they all do. He has the power of naming
and in pornography he uses it to name her slut: a lewd, dissolute,
brazen thing, a whore always soliciting---begging or demanding to be
used for what she is. Women, for centuries not having access to
pornography and now unable to bear looking at the muck on the
supermarket shelves, are astonished. Women do not believe that men
believe what pornography says about women. But they do. From the worst
to the best of them, they do.

\\*The harlot nature of women is a premise of law relating to sexual
violence against women. That is why it is nearly impossible for a woman
to prove that she has been forced.\\


Story of the Eye by Georges Bataille was originally published
in France in 1928. Jean-Paul Sartre, Michel Foucault, Peter Brook, and
Susan Sontag among others have proclaimed it profound. Some call it
"erotic" to distinguish it from the general pornographic sludge. Others,
Sontag foremost among them, use it to argue that pornography of high
quality---gracefully conceived and written---is art. This
book---like The
Image, and the works of Sade--- has the weight of intellectual
adulation behind it.

The story is told by a narrator in the first person. He grew up alone
and was frightened of the sexual. When he was sixteen he met Simone, the
same age. Three days after they met they were alone at her villa. Simone
was wearing a black pinafore. They were both anxious. He wanted her to
be naked under her pinafore. She wore black silk stockings. He wanted to
pick up her pinafore from behind to see her cunt, the word he considers
the most beautiful one for vagina. There was a saucer of milk in a
hallway for the cat. Simone put the saucer on a bench and sat down on
it. He was transfixed. He was erect. He lay down at her feet. She stayed
still. He saw her cunt in the milk. They were both overwhelmed. She
stood up. He saw the milk dripping. She wiped herself with a
handkerchief. He masturbated and writhed on the floor. They had
simultaneous orgasm without touching each other. When Simone's mother
came home and Simone was snuggled in her mother's arm, he lifted her
pinafore from behind and thrust his hand between her legs. He hurried
home to jerk off more. The next day he was so tired from masturbating
that Simone told him not to masturbate without her anymore. They were
intimate and driven. They never talked about it. They were in a car
speeding and they crashed into a very young and very pretty girl on a
bicycle, which nearly severed the girl's head. They parked near the
corpse and reacted to it as they always did to each other: orgasmically.
The narrator recalls that they waited a long time before copulating.
Instead they indulged in unusual acts. He recalls that when Simone asked
him not to masturbate alone, she told him to lie down on the ground,
pulled down his pants, mounted his belly with her back toward his face,
while he put his fingers into her cunt. Then she, still with her back
toward him, put her head between his legs and raised her cunt up, and
asked him to pee up into her cunt. He pointed out that the urine would
get on her face and dress. That was what she wanted, so first he peed
all over her, then he came all over her. They lay together for a long
time. Then they heard a noise. They saw Marcelle, who collapsed and
cried. They tore themselves away from each other to descend on her.
Together they generally maul her, a thunderstorm begins, Simone smears
herself with mud, Simone forces herself between Marcelle's thighs. Then
Simone developed a craving for breaking eggs with her ass. The mother
comes upon Simone performing for the narrator, but pretends she does not
see. Days later, however, Simone, who was hoisted in the rafters of a
garage with the narrator, pissed on her mother, who was walking
underneath. Simone laughs and the narrator uncovers Simone's cunt
completely and jerks off. They run into Marcelle on the street one day.
Marcelle is blond, shy, pious, innocent. Marcelle blushed. Simone begged
her forgiveness and promised that they would never lay a hand on her
again. Marcelle agrees to have tea with them with other friends.
Instead, they have champagne. Marcelle's blushing has completely
enthralled them. Simone and he had a common purpose and nothing would
stop them. There was Marcelle, three other pretty girls and two boys.
The oldest was not yet seventeen. They all got drunk, but were not
sufficiently excited. Simone put on a record and danced the Charleston
by herself. She showed her legs up to her cunt. The other girls did the
same. They had panties on. Marcelle refused to dance. Simone picks up a
tablecloth and bets that she can pee into it in front of all of them. A
boy dared her to do so. Since she immediately did, she won, at which
point she pulled down the pants of the boy who had dared her. She also
took off his shirt. Simone touched the boy, but she was obsessed with
Marcelle, who was begging to leave. Simone fell on the floor, had a
sexual fit, and kept telling the undressed boy to piss on her. Marcelle
blushed. She said she wanted to take off her dress. The narrator tore it
off and fell on her. Marcelle shut herself in a large antique bridal
wardrobe in the room. She wanted to masturbate and to be left in peace.
Marcelle pissed in the wardrobe. Marcelle cried and cried. The wardrobe
was now her prison. Half an hour later, the narrator lets her out. She
was feverish. She screamed violently on seeing him. He was smeared with
blood because during the orgy shards of glass had cut two of the
participants. One of the girls was throwing up. Simone was sleeping
peacefully. Marcelle kept screaming horribly. People began coming.
Marcelle kept screaming. The police were called. The narrator decides it
would be best not to stay with his parents. He steals a gun from them
and says he will kill himself and the police if they send the police to
look for him. He travels near the seashore. He thinks he might kill
himself but then thinks that his life must have some meaning. He slept
in the woods during the day and at night he went to Simone's. They went
to the beach together. He kept taking hold of her cunt. They did not
come that night, but embraced mouth to mouth. He and Simone lived in her
room. Her mother accepted the situation. Marcelle had been put in a
mental institution. The narrator tried to rape Simone in her bed but she
refused to be treated like a housewife. She demands Marcelle. He is
disappointed but agrees with her. They think about Marcelle pissing.
Simone pisses on him. He pisses on her. He smears semen all over her
face. She climaxes. She says that now, with her nose in his ass, he
smells like Marcelle. They want to fuck but Marcelle must be
there:

> Thus it was that our sexual dream kept changing into a nightmare.
> Marcelle's smile, her freshness, her sobs, the sense of shame that
> made her redden and, painfully red, tear off her own clothes and
> surrender lovely blond buttocks to impure hands, impure mouths, beyond
> all the tragic delirium that had made her lock herself in the wardrobe
> to jerk off with such abandon that she could not help pissing---all
> these things warped our desires, so that they endlessly racked us.
> ^40^

The narrator explains that Simone cannot forget that her own obscene
behavior provoked Marcelle's orgasm, howls, writhing, and so she needed
Marcelle's attitude to exaggerate and fully experience her own
brazenness. So Simone's cunt now became, for the narrator, a "profound,
subterranean empire of a Marcelle" who was imprisoned:

> There was only one thing I understood: how utterly the orgasms
> ravaged the girl's face with sobs interrupted by horrible
> shrieks.

> And Simone, for her part, no longer viewed the hot, acrid come that
> she caused to spurt from my cock without seeing it muck up Marcelle's
> mouth and cunt. ^41^

They could only think of Marcelle, especially hanging herself and
dying. They went to the asylum. The wind became violent. A figure hangs
a sheet from the window. It has a wet stain. Simone falls to the ground.
It was Marcelle at the window. The stain was her urine, the result of
jerking off. The narrator entered the asylum. He took off all his
clothes. Someone is following him. A naked woman is in the window frame.
She jumps down. He still has a gun in his hand. He considers chasing the
woman to kill her. He is out of breath. He is excited by the revolver. A
hand grabs his cock. Kisses are planted on his ass. He ejaculates into
the face of his wonderful Simone. He fires the gun blindly. Simone and
he start running. They look up at Marcelle's sheet. One of the bullets
had penetrated her window. Marcelle came to the window. They expected to
see her fall dead from the bullet. Simone had taken off her clothes.
Marcelle disappeared. Marcelle returned. They could see her beautiful
body. She saw them. She called. She blushed. Simone jerks off. Marcelle
does the same. Simone is wearing a black garter belt and black
stockings. Marcelle is wearing a white garter belt and white stockings.
The narrator explains certain, personal symbols: urine is associated
with saltpeter, lightning with an antique ceramic chamber pot that he
once saw. Since having been at the asylum, these images were associated
with cunt and with Marcelle's facial expressions. Then, his imagination
would be saturated by light and blood, because Marcelle could not come
without urinating. But back at the asylum, he and Simone had had to
flee, both naked, bicycling, exhausted, sweating, but they still kept
touching each other, he took off one of her stockings to wipe her body
which smelled like debauchery. They kept bicycling. The leather seat
stuck to Simone's cunt. The bicycle fork was in the crevice of his ass.
It occurred to him that if he and Simone died, it would be cosmic. His
penis was absurdly rigid. Simone masturbated with more and more force on
the leather seat. She was tom from the bicycle by pure joy and her naked
body was hurled. He found her bleeding and unconscious. He threw himself
on top of her and came, his teeth bared, his mouth drooling. Simone came
to, so he revived from the orgasm over what he had thought was her
corpse. He carried her home. Since he had just rescued the person he
loved most and since he would see Marcelle soon, he slept. Simone's
recovery was slow. It was peaceful for him. The mother would come in to
care for Simone and he would step into the bathroom. He would read items
about violence to Simone from the newspapers. She was weak. She insisted
that he throw hard-boiled eggs into the toilet. She would watch the
eggs. He would suck out the insides in varying degrees so that they
would sink to varying depths. Simone would sit on the toilet and watch
the eggs under her cunt. Then Simone would have him flush the toilet. He
would crack fresh eggs on the edge of the bidet and empty them under
her. She would piss on them or swallow them from the bottom of the
bidet. They imagined Marcelle. They wanted to put her in a bathtub full
of fresh eggs. They wanted Marcelle to pee while crushing the eggs.
Simone wanted him to hold Marcelle, who would have on garter belt and
stockings; Simone, in a bathrobe wet with hot water, would get up on a
chair and he would excite her breasts with a revolver that had been
loaded and just fired; Simone would pour a jar of fresh cream on
Marcelle's anus and urinate on her robe or back or head while he would
piss on Marcelle from the other side or on her breasts. Marcelle would
also be free to piss. After such wonderful dreams, Simone would ask the
narrator to lay her down on blankets by the toilet and she would stare
at the eggs. He would lie down next to her. When the toilet was finally
flushed, Simone would be happy. Simone was mesmerized when a halfsucked
egg was suddenly invaded by water. She climaxed. Simone wanted to
urinate but she did not so that she could feel pleasure. Her belly
bloated up and her cunt swelled. The word
reminded her of. The narrator continues
with associations: eggs, eyes, razor, sun, the white of the eye, the
yolk is the eyeball. Simone wants the narrator to promise to shoot eggs
with his rifle when they go outside. He refuses. She continues
associating: each of her buttocks is a peeled hard-boiled egg, urine is
a gunshot, and so on. They decide to send for hot soft-boiled eggs
without the shells. The mother brings them. They treat her like a maid.
Simone sat on the toilet and they each ate an egg. He rubs the other
eggs all over her and slowly drops each into the toilet. Nothing like
this ever happened again,, which will be
revealed later. If eggs came up in the conversation, they blushed. He
fixes the bicycles and rigs up an attachment for Marcelle. They arrive
at the asylum. Marcelle escapes. Marcelle wants to marry the narrator.
He kisses her. Marcelle does not understand where she is or who she is
with or what she is doing. Marcelle asks the narrator to protect her
when the cardinal returns. They were lying in the forest. Simone asked
who the cardinal was. Marcelle answers, the man who locked her in the
wardrobe. Now the narrator understands why Marcelle was so frightened
when he finally let her out of the wardrobe. He had been wearing a red
cap and was covered in blood from deep cuts in a girl he had raped.
Marcelle's dress was pulled up and Simone and the narrator were so
enchanted by the sight that they did not move. Simone urinated and
climaxed and the force of this denuded her which then occasioned the
narrator\'s climax. The narrator gives more symbols: milky way, astral
sperm, heavenly urine, broken egg, broken eye, rooster, cardinal, red.
The narrator discourses on the nature of lewdness: he cares only for the
dirty; decent people have "gelded eyes"; people like sexual pleasure
only if it is insipid; his kind of debauchery soils everything including
the whole universe. More symbols: moon with vaginal blood of mothers and
sisters. He loved Marcelle but he did not mourn her. Her death was his
fault. He sometimes locked himself up for hours to think about her but
he wanted to start all over, for instance, by forcing her head into a
toilet bowl. Marcelle hanged herself when she recognized the wardrobe.
They cut her down and masturbated over the dead body. They fucked each
other for the first time. Simone was still a virgin. The three of them
were all calm. Simone pissed on the corpse. Marcelle belonged to them.
They ran away to Spain. Simone had a rich English sponsor, Sir Edmond.
Simone was indifferent to most things but her orgasms became more
violent. Sir Edmond captured a streetwalker and had her locked in a
pigsty where she was trampled in liquid manure by the pigs. Simone had
the narrator fuck her outside the locked door as Sir Edmond jerked off.
They went to numerous bullfights. They fucked in numerous environments,
generally surrounded by stink and flies and urine. Simone demands the
raw balls of a bull. Sir Edmond provides them. She wants to sit on them
but cannot because of all the other people present. Sir Edmond, Simone,
and the narrator become horribly excited. Simone bit into one of the raw
balls. The bullfighter was killed. As the people screamed in horror,
Simone had an orgasm. The bullfighter's eye was dangling from his head.
The three of them went to Seville because Simone was in a foul mood.
Simone wore a flimsy dress that exposed her. They never stopped having
sex. Sir Edmond would follow and masturbate. They go into a church. Don
Juan is supposedly buried under the church. They laugh. Simone pisses.
The urine makes Simone's dress stick to her body. A woman is confessing
in the church. Simone wants to watch. The woman leaves. Simone goes to
confess. Simone jerks off as she confesses. Simone confesses that she is
jerking off while confessing. Simone exposes herself to the priest.
Simone opens the door to the priest. Simone grabs his cock. The priest
hissed. Simone sucked his cock. Sir Edmond pulled the priest out of the
confessional. They carried him to the vestry. They sat him in a wooden
armchair. Simone slapped him, which gave the priest another erection.
They stripped him and Simone pissed on his clothes. Simone jerked him
off and sucked him while the narrator urinated in his nostrils. Then the
narrator fucked Simone in the ass as she sucked the cock of the priest.
Sir Edmond found the key to the tabernacle. Simone flagellated the cock
of the priest with her teeth and tongue. Sir Edmond found hosts and a
consecrated chalice. Sir Edmond lectures on the meaning of the blood of
Christ, white wine which really means semen. Simone slammed the chalice
against the skull of the priest. Simone sucked the cock of the priest.
Simone hit the priest again on the face with the chalice. Simone
undressed and the narrator fingerfucked her. The priest peed into the
chalice. Sir Edmond then made him drink the urine. Simone jerked him off
and sucked his cock. The priest crashed the chalice against a wall. The
two men lift the priest up, the priest comes on the hosts that Simone
held while jerking him off. They dropped the priest on the floor. They
order him to fuck Simone. The priest refuses. Sir Edmond explains that a
man hanging dies with an erection. They gag and tie the priest, strangle
him as Simone mounts him. The priest comes and dies. The narrator has
never been so in love with Simone and so content. Simone wants the
priest's eye. Sir Edmond cuts it out for her. Simone caressed the eye.
Simone put the eye in her ass. The eye fell out onto the body of the
corpse. Sir Edmond undressed the narrator. The narrator pounced on
Simone. He fucked her hard while Sir Edmond rolled the eye all over
them. Simone tells Sir Edmond to put the eye in her ass. He does. Simone
takes the eye and puts it in her cunt. The narrator pulls her legs
apart: "in hairy vagina, I saw the wan
blue eye of, gazing at me through tears of
urine. "^42^ Simone climaxes and pees. They leave town to find new
adventures with a sailing crew of Negroes on Sir Edmond's new
yacht.

In the world of high-class literary pornography, of which
Story of the Eye is fairly typical, force is imbued with
meaning because it is the means to death. Death is the stunning essence
of sex. The violence of death is the violence of sex and the beauty of
death is the beauty of sex and the meaning of life is only revealed in
the meaning of sex which is death. The intellectual who loves this kind
of pornography is impressed with death. High-class symbols are also
essential to high-class pornography: eggs, eyes, hard-boiled,
soft-boiled, the difference between a half-full and a half-empty egg as
it sinks into a toilet, an eye in the cunt. Ruminations on the stars in
the sky and sudden portentous thunderstorms, abundant in Story
of the Eye, also help to establish a work of pornography as
inordinately meaningful. Religious rebellion---for instance, the torture
and rape of a priest--- also heralds a class act. The priest as the man
in skirts, feminized because he has turned away from masculine sexual
action as a way of life, is easily viewed as a symbol of the repression
caused by religion, whereas it would be more realistic---but less
comfortable--- to see him as a substitute woman. His true sexual nature
is revealed in his erection and he is punished for having denied
it---for his sexual downward mobility as it were. Marcelle is the more
conventional victim, anatomically female, passive, shamed by her own
sexual desire. Her violation and death are in the normal course of
things, in the nature of sex itself. The violation of a priest passes as
a rebellious idea.

Force in high-class pornography is romanticized because it leads to
death. It is romanticized as if it were dance: ritualized movement
intrinsic to sex, leading inevitably to death, which is mysterious and
in its mystery sublime. Bataille has outlined a sequel to
Story of the Eye: Simone ends up in a death camp; she is
beaten to death; "\s\he dies as though making love, but in the purity
(chaste) and the of death; fever and
agony transfigure her. "^43^ The outline was published in 1967, in the
fourth edition of This makes clear
the tally of female deaths: very young girl on bicycle, Marcelle, whore
in the pigsty, priest as feminized male, and later--- much later because
she is so cruel---Simone. The death camp is eroticized in the man of
intellect after Auschwitz. Also, Bataille has published a personal essay
on his own life, in which he describes some probable origins of the
symbols in. The sense of the
author's personal anguish also gives the work credibility among
intellectuals: he writes of his own dread and obsession and pain, the
staples of the male artist as hero. This makes the book by definition
brave in its revelations. It allows other intellectuals to see Bataille
and themselves in his characters as it suits them: especially not as
violators but as sufferers. This, needless to say, is utterly
sentimental, but the sentimentality is well hidden in endless
abstractions---ponderings on death and sex with no regard for the
realities of either. The intellectual claim made for the work is that
Bataille has revealed a sexual secret: the authentic nexus between sex
and death. Sometimes this revelation is posited as the value of
high-class pornography. But in fact, Bataille has obscured more than he
has uncovered. He has obscured the meaning of force in sex. He has
obscured the fact that there is no male conception of sex without force
as the essential dynamic. He has done this by romanticizing death. Force
is inconsequential when the cosmic forces move through man in sex. It is
plodding and pedestrian to demand that one pay attention to it. What
matters is the poetry that is the violence leading to death that is the
ecstasy. The language stylizes the violence and denies its fundamental
meaning to women, who do in fact end up dead because men believe what
Bataille believes and makes pretty: that death is the dirty secret of
sex. In some cases, the death is literal. In some cases, it is the
annihilation of female will. The grand conceptions---death,
angst---cover the grand truth: that force leading to death is what men
most secretly, most deeply, and most truly value in sex. Death is the
idea behind the action.

Simone exists in the male sexual framework: the sadistic whore whose
sexuality is murderous and insatiable; ultimately she is also the
exquisite victim, fulfilled through annihilation, Bataille's logical
though delayed tribute to the femininity suggested by her anatomy and by
the fact that now and then she gets fucked. She is a prototypical figure
in the male imagination, the woman who is sexual because her sexuality
is male in its values, in its violence. She is the male idea of a woman
let loose.

When Simone, Sir Edmond, and the narrator go off on a yacht with a crew
of Negroes, an image that appeared earlier in the text is underlined and
given new significance: Simone's orgasms after Marcelle's death
were

> incomparably more violent than before. These orgasms were as
> different from normal climaxes as, say, the mirth of savage Africans
> from that of Occidentals. In fact, though the savages may sometimes
> laugh as moderately as whites, they also have long-lasting jags, with
> all parts of the body in violent release, and they go whirling
> willy-nilly, flailing their arms about wildly, shaking their bellies,
> necks, and chests, and chortling and gulping horribly. ^44^

This wild laughter is then again paralleled to Simone's violent
orgasms. The escape with the crew of Negroes promises more savage sexual
experiences. The promise is that more force will lead to more death that
will be more exciting because the light/dark symbolism---suggested in an
all-white environment by Simone and Marcelle (Simone dark, Marcelle
blond, Simone dressed in black stockings, Marcelle in white, and so
forth)---will provide the context for conquest. In an all-white context,
Marcelle was the pale, frail submissive who denied her harlot nature,
which provoked Simone to express hers. In an all-white context and also
in a white-supremacist context, the dark one is the dangerous one. But
in the white-supremacist context, the white one will win, the dark one
will be conquered: Simone is white, not black; she is the winner. The
challenge of savage sexuality in a black crew in service to a wealthy
English aristocrat provides a new context for conquest. Force leading to
sex which inevitably means death takes on a new dimension, suggests to
the colonializing sexual mentality wilder and wilder sexual
possibilities. Conquest, the subterranean theme of both rape and
romance, is carried in pornography, at some point of satiation,
inevitably into the racial realm. The death of one's own racial kind is
not quite enough, and so the romanticization of death which obscures the
meaning of force permits the romanticization of racial conquest and
racial murder. Force, once perhaps abhorrent to the intellectual in the
realm of race, now has an entirely sexual significance which permits its
expansion into race without challenging, or even alerting, conscience.
The acceptance of force in the sexual realm allows its extension into
the racial realm because one is dealing with metaphysical sexual truths,
which race does not change and in relation to which justice is both
irrelevant and ridiculous. A conscience calloused with regard to force
in sex is inevitably rendered insensible to racist force as
well.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

> And cruelty is an idea in practice.

Antonin Artaud,

> Woman is made to submit to man and to endure even injustice at his
> hands.

Jean-Jacques Rousseau, Emile

> All the women who copulate to keep peace in the house are the victims
> of rape. All our grandmothers who just "let it happen" were
> essentially force-fucked all their lives.

Suzanne Brogger,

The idea of the woman as sexual provocateur or harlot, so consistently
postulated in pornography as the first principle of sex, is not, it will
be argued, really commonplace or believed. The idea that women do not
like or need sex is stronger. Too many headaches over too many centuries
have damaged the credibility of both the pornographers and like-minded
philosophers of sex. Yes, the idea of the woman as sexual provocateur
may rise like the mythical phoenix in rape cases. It may magically
manifest in incest cases, where the female who wants it is a
prepubescent child. To women, the sudden appearance of this idea when
applied to themselves is always incredible and inexplicable, especially
because most women encounter the power of this idea when it is they who
have been physically abused and then are accused and condemned. Before
the woman is actually assaulted, the idea has set limits on her life:
she is always trying to retain the status of innocent, one who is not
forced because she did not provoke it. But the idea limits her
life, innocence demanding ignorance, in such a way that she cannot
recognize or be conscious of it. Once attacked, she is accused, and the
idea determines the immediate course of her life. Indeed, in rape or
incest cases, as in battery, the so-called victim is distinguished from
other females by her provocativeness, which accounts for her individual
victimization, which is not victimization because she provoked it. There
are always those billions of other women who were not raped or beaten at
that particular time by that particular man.
were passed by, which is the evidence that convicts her. Something in
her caused the assault---her sexuality, in fact---and now she must
convince strangers not only that it was against her will but also that
she did not like it: an indignity beyond imagining and in the male
system nearly always impossible. She cannot comprehend what she is up
against when she claims that she did not want it. She is up against the
whole world of real male belief about her real nature, expressed most
purely in pornography.

But still, there is another idea, closer to the surface and in that
sense more superficial, that women are inhibited or have a low sex drive
or do not want or need sex. Perhaps this is a recognition, however
perverse, that no one could possibly like and want what men do to women.
This idea, also articulated as a universal truth, appears to contradict
the idea that women are by nature whores who beg for it, want it, demand
it. But in fact, it is the perfect complement. The whore provokes
because she wants to be forced (sex intrinsically defined as conquest).
How does one have sex with the real woman who so often expresses
reluctance, aversion, boredom, refusal, disdain, or a desire to go back
to school instead, especially if she is one's wife, the woman over whom
one has legal conjugal rights? One forces her. The system is foolproof.
The woman who does want it wants force. She expresses this desire for
force by resisting which provokes force which is what she wants. The
woman who does not want it must be forced. Once the woman who does not
want it has been forced, she is indistinguishable from the woman who
resisted because she did want it. Male supremacy is dizzying in its
unrelenting circularity.

\




Kinsey is the sexual philosopher who claimed to quantify and thus
accurately describe actual sexual behavior. He and
his followers conclude that women have a low sex drive and are
defined in their personalities, behaviors, and values by sexual
inhibitions. Kinsey's sexual ideology, accepted without significant
modification by those who continued his work, used the idea that women
have a low sex drive to justify force against the woman who does not
want it except in the cases where force is justified because she does
want it but does not have the decency to admit it thereby causing tragic
problems for the male who forced her because he was not inhibited and
did what was natural.

Kinsey counted and classified sexual acts, a technique he described as
"taxonomic, in the sense in which modern biologists employ the term\....
The transfer from insect to human material is not illogical, for it has
been a transfer of a method that may be applied to the study of any
variable population, in any field. "^45^ Kinsey had spent a good part of
his life as a scientist collecting and classifying gall wasps, called by
male scientists "killer wasps. " He took the methods he had applied in
describing the gall wasp and applied them to human sexuality. Kinsey's
first absolute claim was that his method was scientific and objective,
uncolored by social prejudices or moral judgments: "That much is
expected of the student measuring the lengths of insect wings, recording
chemical changes that occur in a test tube, or observing the colors of
the stars. It is not too much to expect similar objectivity of the
student of human behavior. "^46^ Kinsey's material on sexual acts was
collected through interviews. Challenged on his ability to recognize
absolute truth in verbal descriptions of sexual acts, the objective
scientist countered: "As well ask a horse trader how he knows when to
close a bargain. "^47^\*

------------------------------------------------------------------------

\* Kinsey's sources were, in fact, much more unreliable than anyone
could deduce from reading either of his volumes on human sexuality. In
his biography, Dr. Kinsey and the Institute for Sex Research (New York:
Harper And Row, Publishers, 1972), p. 122, Wardell B. Pomeroy, a
disciple and coresearcher with Kinsey, unselfconsciously tells this
story: "We had heard through Dr. Dickinson of a man who had kept an
accurate record of a lifetime's sexual behavior. When we got the record
after a long drive to take his history, it astounded even us, who had
heard everything. This man had had homosexual relations with 600
preadolescent males, heterosexual relations with 200 preadolescent
females, intercourse with countless adults of both sexes, with animals
of many species, and besides had employed elaborate techniques of
masturbation. He had set down a family tree going back to his
grandparents, and of thirty-three family members he had had sexual
contacts with seventeen. His grandmother introduced him to heterosexual
intercourse, and his first homosexual experience was with his father. If
that sounds like Tobacco Road or God\'s Little Acre, I will add that he
was a college graduate who held a responsible government job. We had
traveled from Indiana to the Southwest to get this single extraordinary
history, and felt that it had been worth every mile. "At the time we saw
him, this man was sixty-three years old, quiet, soft-spoken,
self-effacing---a rather unobtrusive fellow. It took us seventeen hours
to get his history, *which was the basis for a fair part of Chapter Five
in the Male volume, concerning child sexuality. Because of these
elaborate records, we were able to get data on the behavior of many
children, as well as of our subject.*" \Emphasis mine\

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The two volumes written by Kinsey and his associates (Sexual
Behavior in the Human Male Sexual Behavior in the
Human Female) and the one volume written by his disciples
based on his data (Sex Offenders: An Analysis of
Types) all classify sexual acts of white persons. Kinsey was
particularly criticized because the volume on the human female dealt
with white, mostly urban, and well-educated women. Actually it deals
mostly with insects, animals, and men. According to Arno Karlen,
Kinsey

> pointed out that this made less difference than it would in a male
> sample, for he had enough lower-level female subjects to show that
> education and parent's occupation were minor influences for females.
> The various levels had produced very different patterns of aggression
> and control in males, but girls of all
> classes got pretty much the same kind and amount of training in
> restraint. ^48^

This is strongly reminiscent of Freud's attitude toward what he called
"servant girls "Fortunately for our
therapy, we have previously learned so much from other cases that we can
tell these persons their story without having to wait for their
contribution. They are willing to confirm what we tell them, but one can
learn nothing from them. "^49^ Scientists tend to be more rigorous and
interested in collecting information on insects than on women and Kinsey
was no exception. His curiosity about sexual acts committed by the human
female never matched his curiosity about the gall wasp. His main
preoccupation, among humans, was with class strata among males. He found
distinctly different patterns of sexual interaction in what he called
"lower-level" and "upper-level" males. Kinsey's data confirm that these
men had mostly female partners. Therefore, the behaviors of the women of
the various social strata must have differed. This too is confirmed by
the data---the data on males. Kinsey's own attitudes toward the female
could not even stand the test of his own data.

Kinsey characterized sexual response as a physiological phenomenon in
both males and females in this way: "The closest parallel to the picture
of sexual response is found in the known physiology of anger. "^50^ He
claimed that physiological responses in male and female were the same,
but that psychological responses were entirely different. He also
claimed that female attitudes toward sex (the psychological) have a
biological basis, at which point Noah's ark issues forth. He also
claimed that while no one knows whether female sexuality is determined
by genes, passed from generation to generation (apparently he meant
through learning), or by a combination of nature and nurture, one must
look to the behavior of other mammals to find what human sexual behavior
should be---though he claimed that his method did not allow the
intrusion of a Kinsey strongly believed that
human sexual patterns should mimic animal patterns, which were natural,
but he never recognized that this constituted a point of view. As an
objective scientist, he could say all of the above: his authority
forbade notice of his simple self-contradiction and confusion.

In, Kinsey
asserts that male orgasm would occur, at the least, on a daily basis
were it not for social restrictions. Under what he calls "optimal
conditions, "^51^ it would occur more frequently than once a day during
adolescence and early adult life. The heterosexual environment,
courtship rites, women's provocative clothing, and the depictions of
women in films, advertisements, fiction, and so forth, are constantly
arousing: "For most males, whether single or married, there are
ever-present erotic stimuli, and sexual response is regular and high.
"^52^ The lower-level male wants and gets sexual intercourse. The
upper-level male, denied what he really wants (intercourse), must fall
back on substitutes, which accounts for the attention the upper-level
male pays (relatively speaking, among males) to what women might call
lovemaking---kissing, cunnilingus, fondling, and so on:

> The very fact that upper level males fail to get what they want in
> socio-sexual relations \this is deduced by Kinsey because they have
> lower rates of premarital and extramarital intercourse\ would provide
> a psychologic explanation of their high degree of erotic
> responsiveness to stimuli which *fall short of actual
> coitus*. The fact that the lower level male comes nearer
> having as much coitus as he wants would make him less susceptible to
> any stimulus except actual coitus. ^53^ \Italics mine\

Kinsey then characterizes the coital behavior of the lower-level male
as sexual freedom. The criteria Kinsey uses to determine sexual freedom
are quantity of sexual interactions that are coital and degree of
promiscuity (number of partners). It is a continuing theme in Kinsey
that "average frequencies of sexual outlet for the human male are
distinctly below those which are normal among some other anthropoids and
which would probably be normal in the human animal if there were no
restrictions upon his sexual activity. "^54^ Kinsey's formulation of
authentic male sexuality---his speculation, distinct from his stated
goal of objectively describing, counting, and classifying actual sexual
acts, but not acknowledged as opinion or conjecture---is
unequivocal:

> There seems to be no question but that the human male would be
> promiscuous in his choice of sexual partners throughout the whole of
> his life if there were no social restrictions. This is the history of
> unrestrained human males everywhere. ^55^

Kinsey considers women responsible for the unnatural social
restrictions on men. He condemns social workers, women on parole boards,
mothers, schoolteachers, for controlling "moral codes, schedules for sex
education, campaigns for law enforcement, and programs for combating
what is called juvenile delinquency. It is obviously impossible, " he
asserts, "for a majority of these women to understand the problem that
the boy faces in being constantly aroused and regularly involved with
his normal biologic reactions. "^56^

Kinsey especially disdained the attitudes of upper-level females. He
was most offended by upper-level women in social work who did not
understand (condone and support) the male coital imperative. He
maintained that the inhibitions of the upper-level female were extreme.
The proof was that so many of these women had objected to intercourse
when first married or remained apathetic throughout marriage. Some even
objected to new techniques tried out on them by their husbands and
"charge their husbands with being lewd, lascivious, lacking in
consideration, and guilty of sex perversion in general. There are
numerous divorces which turn on the wife's refusal to accept some item
in coital technique which may in actuality be commonplace in human
\male\ behavior. "^57^ To Kinsey, this data did not suggest anything
about male sexuality as such; only that women were perpetually messing
men up, standing in the way of male sexual release. Kinsey, who did not,
in his exhaustive, objective research, uncover marital rape or wife
battery, did find "several instances of wives who have murdered their
husbands because they insisted on mouth-genital contacts. "^5^\*
"Insisted" might perhaps be considered a euphemism. He also found, to
his disgust, that divorces had been granted because of "the coital
frequencies which the husband had demanded. "^59^ Even "demanded" might
perhaps be considered a euphemism. He saw, in the instances of divorces
granted because the woman objected to the husband's sexual use of her,
collusion between women and the law, the two great social forces for
sexual restriction of the male. Denial of sexual access by women to men
is nowhere viewed by Kinsey as a right of women. He consistently sees
refusal as sexual inhibition, moralism, or evidence of a low sex drive
in the female. He is contemptuous of the Freudian formulation of sexual
inhibition, though he maintains that the female is sexually inhibited.
To Kinsey, inhibition means refusal on any level for any reason. He
particularly undertook to shatter Freud's concept of sublimation by
pointing out that the sexual histories of male artists did not confirm
that they were sexually inactive, and sexual sublimation---or inhibition
or repression---could not be proven by looking to women because the
concept does not take into account "the high incidence of relatively
unresponsive females who never had any appreciable amount of sexual
energy to be diverted. "^40^ According to Kinsey, psychotherapy is
wasted on persons with a low sex drive, and most women are sexually
apathetic: "But such inactivity is no more sublimation \or repression
or inhibition; Kinsey used the words interchangeably\ of sex drive than
blindness or deafness or other perceptive defects are sublimation of
those capacities. "^41^ Despite the low sex drive of the female, her
resultant moralism, her sexual inhibition here used to mean refusal of
sexual access, "we do not find evidence\... that the individual, rid of
her inhibitions, would not be capable of response. "^42^ All she has to
do is to say yes. Mute submission would also pass as "response" in
Kinsey's system because

> \i\t cannot be emphasized too often that orgasm cannot be taken as
> the sole criterion for determining the degree of satisfaction which a
> female may derive from sexual activity. Considerable pleasure may be
> found in sexual arousal which does not proceed to the point of orgasm,
> and in the social aspects of a sexual relationship. Whether or not she
> herself reaches orgasm, many a female finds satisfaction in knowing
> that her husband or other sexual partner has enjoyed the contact, and
> in realizing that she has contributed to the male's pleasure.
> ^4^'

At the same time, predictably, "\i\t is inconceivable that males who
were not reaching orgasm would continue their marital coitus for any
length of time. "^44^ 

The function of the female in the conventional sexual relationship, as
described by Kinsey, in which the woman participates not for her sexual
benefit but for that of the male and gets a social reward for her
compliance is stated clearly by Kinsey: under these circumstances, it is
"impossible to draw a line between the most obvious sort of
commercialized prostitution and the relationships of every husband and
wife. "^65^ The basic sameness of wife and whore (Kinsey's version of
"all women are whores") is the line Kinsey takes in defending
prostitution as an institution that must be accepted because the male
needs unrestricted sexual outlet, which the wife does not provide
because she has a low sex drive and is inhibited and would provide were
she not inhibited despite her low sex drive. The purpose of wife and
whore is the same. The goal is male sexual expression---mostly in coitus
if the male is not frustrated by female noncompliance. The use of the
female, whatever her status, by the male for his own genital
satisfaction is the substance and near totality of natural human
sexuality as described by Kinsey. The so-called low sex drive of the
female justifies the use of her without reference to her satisfaction
and without cognizance of her sexual integrity, which simply cannot
exist in Kinsey's male-supremacist value system. Any refusal on the part
of the female to comply with male sexual demands is evidence of
incapacity or inhibition. The sexually natural female would never say no
precisely because her sexual nature is apathetic. Strong sexual aversion
on her part---for instance, aversion to having sex to which she is
indifferent because there is no meaning or pleasure in it for her---is
by definition inhibition. Since wife and prostitute have the same
function, the function is clearly delineated in the analogy: to serve
the male in sex. Rape, needless to say, does not have an authentic
existence in Kinsey's system, except as a repressive social construct
with which women haunt and punish and restrict the male. Anything---law
or personal protestation or resistance---that keeps the male from using
the female as he wishes is female moralism or sexual repression or
social restriction that ignores or violates male sexual nature, which is
taking and using at will. Kinsey's philosophy at base is that there is
no valid reason for the male not to: not to have coital access to the
female at will. He has a great sense of the tragic when needless (all)
social restrictions impinge on male sexual nature: "Sexual activities in
themselves rarely do physical damage, but disagreements over the
significance of sexual behavior may result in personality conflicts, a
loss of social standing, imprisonment, disgrace, and the loss of life
itself. "\" It is the male who is the victim here: who has personality
conflicts, loses social standing, is imprisoned, disgraced, and
sometimes killed for raping. The sense of Kinsey's view is that rape, to
the extent that it does exist (mostly illusory), would not exist if
females would comply, which they would do were they not twisted. It is
the female who refuses and then accuses, destroying the natural man who
just wants to function in harmony with his authentic sexuality.

In Kinsey's system, charges of rape are almost always false, occasioned
by female hysteria, not by male assault. Since he cannot imagine a
female sexual will that contradicts the male and at the same time is not
warped, he cannot comprehend the meaning, for instance, of child
molestation to child or woman---only that the hysteria of women descends
once again to punish the male:

> Many small girls reflect the public hysteria over the prospect of
> "being touched" by a strange person and
> many a child, who has no idea at all of the mechanics of intercourse,
> interprets affection and simple caressing from anyone except her own
> parents, as attempts at rape. In consequence, not a few older men
> serve time in penal institutions for attempting to engage in a sexual
> act which at their age would not interest most of them, and of which
> many of them are undoubtedly incapable. ^67^

Kinsey had no interest in exploring or documenting child abuse because
no sexual act desired by the male if properly gratified could be
abusive. He could not begin to comprehend the varieties of sexual abuse
directed against female children because he had no notion of meaningful
consent for any female of any age. The male was always the victim of
female refusal or antagonism. The refusal or antagonism was never
justified.

In addition, Kinsey saw rape as a female stratagem to hide female
participation in sex:

> In both the baboon and the rhesus monkey, females soliciting new
> sexual partners have been known to utilize a remarkably human
> procedure to escape the anger of their established mates.

> When the mates discover them in coitus with other males, or seem
> about to discover them, the females may cease their sexual activities
> and attack the new male partners. A high proportion of the human
> "rape" cases which we have had the opportunity to examine involve
> something of the same motifs. ^68^

When not screaming rape to propitiate the angry baboon, the female may
scream rape by way of explanation to her parents. In Sex
Offenders, Kinsey's disciples remember his deep insight into
this origin of rape:

> As Dr. Kinsey often said, the difference between a "good time" and a
> "rape" may hinge on whether the girl's
> parents were awake when she finally arrived home. ^69^

In the main, Kinsey held that it was the social valuation of coitus
that turned it into rape---especially the woman's attitude toward an act
that was the same whether called coitus or rape; meaning not that coitus
as practiced is a form of rape, but that rape is a misrepresentation of
coitus. Harm to the female had no significance for Kinsey:

> The disturbances which may sometimes follow coitus rarely depend on
> the nature of the activity itself, or upon its physical outcome. An
> occasional unwanted pregnancy, a rare instance of venereal disease, or
> a very rare instance of physical damage are about the only undesirable
> physical after-effects. ^70^

Harm, like rape, is mostly a figment of the female imagination. Who
would compare the inconvenience of unwanted pregnancy (especially at the
time of contraband birth control and illegal abortion, when Kinsey
wrote) or venereal disease (commonly undiagnosed in the female and thus
disabling, when Kinsey wrote) or the maimed and battered bodies of raped
or abused women (undiscovered by Kinsey, despite his objective methods
and thousands of interviews) to the tragic situation of the male who is
disturbed or imprisoned or even killed merely for using his natural
sexual capacity? Harm to the female can have an authentic meaning only
when the bodily integrity of the female is a premise in the sexual value
system. Otherwise, she exists to be used and harm to her in the process
of using her is always incidental, usually her own fault, and no cause
for mourning or rage or even reevaluation. Once a woman is dead, it is
easier to grant that harm was done to her, even that she really was
forced; but short of death, harm, like force, is hard to prove and is
almost never considered significant.

In, which purports to count and
classify the acts of convicted sex offenders, these values are carried
forth. The sex offender is distinguished from the normal man who commits
a forcible sexual act---like kissing---because he has been convicted:
"Once there is a conviction the matter cannot be trivial even though the
act may have been. "^71^ is the great
and terrible story of men who suffer imprisonment because they violated
meaningless taboos---like all other normal men, except that they were
caught. Its great themes are the falsity and hysteria of women and the
cruelty of the law. The story is told almost entirely from the point of
view of the sex offender himself, except that his voice is given
authority by the objective scientists who present his case, his plight,
his dilemma. Because the use of force in rape cases where the man has
actually been convicted is by definition pronounced, there is,
unavoidably, some recognition of force as a reality in the category
called "heterosexual aggressor vs. adults, " which roughly translates
into adult men raping adult women:

> The heterosexual aggressors vs. adults are well aware of public
> skepticism concerning rape, and make use of it in offering their own
> versions of their offenses. Perhaps more than any other group they
> give seemingly plausible accounts of their actions to prove their
> innocence, and while we are interviewing them it is often quite easy
> to be persuaded of the validity of their stories. Later, upon
> examining official records, we may discover that the allegedly willing
> female had to have five stitches taken in her lip. ^72^

This liberality---the credence given to the five stitches---is the
exception rather than the rule. In most instances, according to the
scientists, that lip was just looking for trouble. Using sophistry and
cunning, the scientists dismiss force as a reality in virtually every
kind of crime.

The first method of dismissal is implicit in the methodology itself.
The normal male, according to commits
sexual acts against the will of the female as a matter of course. To be
distinguished as an offender, he must be convicted. It is the
conviction, not the offense, that makes his act significant. Someone
convicted of burglary who intended to rape is included in the study;
someone who actually raped but was not convicted is excluded. In itself,
this is unfortunate, "but this is the price we must pay, fortunately
very infrequently, in obtaining a workable definition of sex offense.
"^73^ The premise is that the unconvicted rapist is an oddity.
Importance is given not to the incidence of actual rape but to
"obtaining a workable definition of sex offense. "

The sophistry involved in describing or determining the use of force in
a sexual act committed by a male convicted of a sex offense is clearest
in the attempts to categorize acts against children and minors.
"Children" are here defined as female children under the age of twelve,
not the daughters of the men convicted. "Minors" are females from twelve
to fifteen, not the daughters of the men convicted. The "heterosexual
offender" did not use force; the "heterosexual aggressor" did.

In describing sex acts committed against children, the scientists were
at pains to establish two categories, one in which force was used and
one in which it was not:

> Force ranges from unmitigated violence to, let us say, holding a
> child by the wrist; threat runs the gamut from specific verbal threat
> or brandishing a weapon to a subtle implication. In any relationship
> between a child and an adult there is always in the background an
> element of duress; the inevitable disparity in strength and social
> status is an omnipresent factor. A man, even though a stranger, is in
> an authoritarian superior position. While it was manifestly impossible
> to cope with these vaguer (but nonetheless effective) forms of force
> and threat, we were able to exclude from heterosexual offenders vs.
> children anyone who told us of using force or threat or whose official
> record mentioned its use. ^74^

Given the excellence of this description of male force, both brutal and
subtle (though it omits the direct power of male over female), it is
remarkable that the scientists did indeed isolate a category of male
offenders against female children under the age of twelve in which the
use of force was not involved. The information on which they based the
existence of this extraordinary category was supplied by the offenders
themselves or by official records. In these cases, children were not
represented by their own counsel, and standards for taking and recording
testimony from children varied greatly. In sexual offenses against
children, quoted above, the first issue is not the kind or degree of
force used, but the fact that force is implicit for the reasons
articulated in the description of force with respect to children. In any
event, the scientists did not feel obligated to determine from
information supplied by the victims whether or not force in any of the
senses that it properly pertains had been used. The invisibility of the
victim is built into the data by virtue of its sources. No consideration
is given to delineating circumstances that would guarantee that force
had not been used. The commitment of the scientists here, their sexual
imperative as it were, is to create a category in which females under
twelve years of age satisfy the male without the use of force on his
part. The issue is not whether the satisfaction is coital; it is whether
it is sexual in any sense, thus establishing a viable sexual possibility
for the adult male in regard to the female child. The category
itself---which defies both common sense and the clear description of
what constitutes force from male adult to female child---provides a
basis for belief that the use of a female child under twelve by an adult
male can, under circumstances known only to the authors of Sex
Offenders

The philosophy that permits the invisibility of the victim and insists
on the accuracy of the category and data arrived at by the objective
scientist is more fully explicated in the information on heterosexual
offenders versus minors. The category as defined means that force was
not used in committing the sexual act. The use of force or its absence
is held to be easy to determine because the girl aged twelve to fifteen
is seen to have the sexual characteristics and awareness of a
well-informed adult woman. These girls "are sufficiently developed
physically and sufficiently aware of social attitudes for a man to have
to use considerable force or definite threat if the girl objects to
sexual contact. "^75^ The girl is considered knowledgeable of any male's
sexual intent. She also "knows that in rejecting a sexual advance
society is on her side. "^76^ Unless formidable force was used against
her, she is seen to have consented. Basically, if the girl is short of
bruised and maimed, force was not used. All of the data on harm done to
her, remember, are either filtered through the criminal justice system
or come from the offender. To the scientists, this does not indicate
prejudice to her because society is on her side; the only prejudice is
to the male. Proof of the girl's essential complicity and compliance is
inferred from the source of the report to the police: "Who reported the
sexual behavior to the authorities? The girl herself rarely did so
directly. Usually the situation was discovered by friends or relatives
who thereupon reported it. The suspicious mother and the garrulous girl
friend are common sources of the offender's downfall. "^77^ The tragic
figure is the male. He has a "downfall. " The females responsible for
the "downfall" are interfering, prudish mothers or yacking
girlfriends---eternal troublemakers who babble irresponsibly to the
police. There is no indication that the objective scientists considered
the girl, upset and confused, unable to explain an assault on her,
asking for help, or cracking under the stress. Because she is viewed by
the objective scientists as an adult woman, even though socially she is
a child and even though all females are characteristically kept ignorant
of sex and male genital goals, she has not been misused because misuse
is implicitly impossible when a sexually viable female is used by a male
exercising natural sexuality. The presumption is that the girl aged
twelve to fifteen fully and knowledgeably consented to the sexual act
after which her mother or another troublesome female intruded, causing
the "downfall" of a blameless male.

Confronting the high incidence of pair and multiple sexual attacks on
girls aged twelve to fifteen, the scientists still have a category
called "heterosexual offenders, " meaning that no force was involved
meaning that the male was convicted for having sex with a consenting
female---or even for just being nearby:

> At first one wonders why females aged twelve to fifteen should be
> particularly subject to such polyandrous attention, but a simple
> explanation exists: when society learns that a young girl has had some
> sort of sexual relationship with an adult male, not only that male,
> but any other adult male who was within a radius of one hundred feet
> is apt to be convicted. If there were copartners in the offense, there
> was usually one, less often two, and only rarely more. The traditional
> "line-up" or "gang-bang" is essentially absent in the offenders vs.
> minors, but there does seem to have been a considerable amount of
> double-dating and of pairs of males hunting for girls. ^78^

Convicted offenders against girls aged twelve to fifteen are judged by
the objective scientists to be, on the whole, a very healthy group with
excellent parental relationships: but then, they were not accused of
molesting their parents. Scientists, of course, are experts on health,
and the behavior, for instance, of adult males hunting for girls aged
twelve to fifteen is no less healthy than adult males similarly hunting
for adult women. If sex is the hunt and sex is health, then the hunt is
health. The problem is not that males abuse a female, but that
society---according to Kinsey controlled by the sexually apathetic or
inhibited female---collects the males in a hundred-foot radius when a
female aged twelve to fifteen is sexually used. Two or more adult males
hunting a girl aged twelve to fifteen does not, for the scientists,
constitute the use of force. What, then, does constitute the use of
force against a girl aged twelve to fifteen? The scientists have a
category, "heterosexual aggressors vs. minors, " in which the use of
force is recognized as such even by the rather dense authors of
Sex Offenders. The plight of the poor male is still the
dramatic issue:

> The male who realizes too late that what he interpreted
> as encouragement was nothing of the sort is in real danger
> if he attempts, by physical force, to detain a frightened girl in
> order to calm her and make his apologies. Assault with intent to rape
> is a charge that requires very little in the way of physical contact,
> and judges and juries are apt to be cynical toward the man who
> disclaims any intention to rape. Men, knowing themselves, are prone to
> assume the worst about another man charged with a sex offense.
> ^79^

The authority of the scientist, which is the authority of the male,
permits this astonishing somersault. Suddenly, the male, recognizing his
own desire to rape, will attribute an intention to rape to other males,
virtually without evidence. The male, convicted for using force (an
astonishment in and of itself), might well have been attempting to
comfort a hysterical female whom he innocently misunderstood---probable
because the provocative behavior of the female is so misleading. The
projection of the male judge or juror (a necessary construct, since it
is hard to blame the female directly when she is not allowed on juries
nor is she on the bench; women were systematically excluded from serving
on juries until recently, women are still systematically excluded from
the judiciary) is used to posit the essential blamelessness of the man
whose use of force was in fact so gross that not only was he convicted
of a sex offense but even the authors of Sex
Offenders had to create a category for him in which the use of
force established the parameters of the category.

Needless to say, if one has managed to obscure the meaning of force
when used by adult men against females under the age of twelve and
females aged twelve to fifteen, it is unlikely that the use of force in
sex against adult women will be a compelling issue.

In the category called "heterosexual offenders vs. adults, " the use of
force is excluded by definition. This is a remarkable category because
the scientists basically conclude that the men in this category were
convicted for having consensual coitus with females who were adult---by
their definition, over the age of fifteen. This conclusion is in part
held to be self-evident because three-quarters of the females attacked
were friends of the offenders and the sexual act at issue occurred in a
residence.

According to the scientists, in the category "heterosexual offenders
vs. adults, " only 16 out of 183 females resisted the commission of the
sex act, but even in these cases "her resistance and his persistence did
not exceed the bounds of the customary male vs. female contest. There
was no threat and no violence. Included are a few cases where female
consent was completely absent, but force or duress were absent also.
"^80^ The situations in which consent was absent but force or duress
were not used are cases in which the men use "surprise or stealth. "^81^
The example given is the instance of a man who when he was drunk
surprised a girl by hugging her. The authors
point out that the girl thought she was being
grabbed. "Hugging" is the neutral term used by the authors in describing
the act; "grabbing, " as the female point of view, is put in quotes. Or,
in another example, a man "could not resist touching females' legs even
in inappropriate situations. "^82^ The essential information in these
two examples, from the authors' perspective, is that "there was nothing
especially antisocial in the behavior per se, but the circumstances of
the situation (particularly the fact that the men were not known to the
females) constituted grounds for punitive action. "^83^ The presumption
is that access to the female body is a male right, and that even in the
absence of consent the presumption of a right to access is not
antisocial. Surprise and stealth do not constitute force. There are also
cases where, according to the scientists, consent was given, then
withdrawn. One case cited as an example of consent given, then
withdrawn, is that of a twenty-year-old man who had on other occasions
had coitus with his seventeen-year-old girlfriend
(sic). One night he was drunk, she resisted him, he hit her,
she called the police, and he was arrested and convicted of rape.
Fortunately, the court "recognized some of the essentials of the
situation"^84^ and sentenced the man to ninety days and payment of court
costs. Apparently, to the objective scientists, consent once given is
eternally given. Battery is not an issue of force. Previous coitus
negates the validity of any charge of rape, since consent is inferred
from previous sexual contact.

In 91 percent of the cases in the category "heterosexual offenders vs.
adults, " the sexual act was premeditated by the male. Premeditation
also does not indicate force because, of course, in the normal male
"interest, hope, and premeditation are inextricably fused when he is
confronted with a socially suitable female\... "^85^ Two or more males
aligned against a single female also is not necessarily forcible sex:
these are "polyandrous situations. "^86^ 

In creating the category "heterosexual offenders vs adults, " meaning a
category in which men were convicted for having consensual relations,
usually coital, with adult females, the criterion was that the use of
force not be, that is, outside the
bounds of what is socially acceptable:

> Our society expects the male to be the aggressor in heterosexual
> relationships, and a certain amount of physical force and duress is
> consequently acceptable and perhaps even socially necessary.
> Girls are frequently subjected to rather
> intense and effective duress which takes many forms: threats not to
> date them again, threats to impair their popularity through adverse
> comments, even threats to make them walk home---all these are not only
> common but are accepted as a part of social living. The same is true
> with physical force, but here a delicacy of judgment is necessary.
> ^87^

The delicacy of judgment shown by the scientists is truly overwhelming
in its delicacy: "Concerning force, we would retain the case \in the
offender's category in which, by definition, no force was used\ where a
male touched, or briefly held, or pulled an unwilling female, but we
would exclude cases where she was struck or physically overpowered.
"^88^ The acknowledged unwillingness of the female is not relevant
because it is commonplace for a female to be unwilling and at the same
time touched held, or pulled despite or because of her
unwillingness.

In the hope that at least when the female is struck or physically
overpowered, the use of force is clearly delineated and left unjustified
by the objective scientists, one might turn to the category called
"heterosexual aggressors vs. adults, " meaning that by definition in
this category force was used. There all hope is shattered by a return to
first principles. In the category "heterosexual aggressors vs. adults, "
where force was undoubtedly and absolutely used, one finds that

> \t\he phenomenon of force or threat in sexual relations between
> adults is beclouded by various things. In the first place, there may
> be the ambivalence of the female who is sexually aroused but who for
> moral or other reasons does not wish to have coitus. She is struggling
> not only against the male but against herself, and in retrospect it is
> exceedingly easy for her to convince herself that she yielded to force
> rather than to persuasion. This delusion is facilitated by the
> socially approved pattern for feminine behavior, according to which
> the woman is supposed to put up at least token resistance, murmuring,
> "No, no" or "We mustn't! " Any reasonably experienced male has learned
> to disregard such minor protestations, and the naive male who obeys
> his partner's injunction to cease and desist is often puzzled when she
> seems inexplicably irritated by his compliance. ^89^

Not only did she probably want it all along---being unwilling only for
moral reasons, which do not count, or because she is inhibited, which
does not count---but an accusation against the male---where force was
clearly used---indicates her struggle with herself. The presumption is
that the woman will refuse and that the man will, as a matter of course,
use force, and that her resistance and her unwillingness are meaningless
except insofar as they indicate moralistic values without which she
would not object or a hidden, internal struggle because she really wants
to do what she resists doing.

Also, the use of force against the adult female, even where the use of
force is acknowledged by definition of the category, is "beclouded" by
the inherent, never-dormant masochism of women:

> \... there is a certain masochistic streak in many women: they
> occasionally desire to be overpowered and treated a little roughly. It
> is, after all, very ego-satisfying for a female to feel she is so
> sexually attractive that the male cannot maintain social restraints
> and reverts to "caveman" tactics. Indeed, some women complain that
> their partners are too gentle: "Why do you always ask me, why don't
> you just take me sometimes? "^90^

In a study specifically of force used against adult females by males,
the objective scientists introduce the female put off by gentleness, the
female who wants to be "treated a little roughly, " the female who
cannot be satisfied without the use of force. Since "\a\ standard
gambit in feminine flirtation is to irritate the male and provoke him
into physical contact\..., "^91^ it is hard to blame the male even for
using gross force against the female---hurting her, hitting her,
physically overpowering her: nonobjective persons not scientists
sometimes call it "rape. " So the scientists do not blame him or even
hold him responsible for his own behavior. The masochistic female with
her low sex drive or inhibitions or morals who pretends to resist or is
actually but unjustifiably unwilling is in fact the one responsible for
the harm done to her, which is not really harm, since she is used in an
appropriate way because she is female.

The destiny of the woman who does not want it---moralistic or inhibited
or with a low sex drive---is the familiar female destiny because
underneath is the masochist who does want it, with force. The destiny of
the woman who does not want it---a superficial characterization of her,
since underneath she does want it or would if she were not moralistic or
inhibited---is precisely the same as the destiny of the harlot who
provokes in order to be forced. The female is never entitled not to want
sex. Force used against her when she refuses is always warranted because
she is never either justified or serious in not wanting sex. No
authentic idea of bodily integrity is ever hers to claim or to have.
Force does not violate her or victimize her because force is nature's
way of giving her what she really wants. Force is nature's victory over
the constraints of civilization. Force is intrinsic to male sexuality
and force used against her does not victimize her; it actualizes her.
The objective scientists and the pornographers agree: she wants it hard,
she wants it rough, she provokes it because she likes it; and even the
sexual apathy posited by Kinsey simply establishes another reason to
disregard her will because an assertion of will on her part---by
definition, refusal---is a misrepresentation of her own sexual nature,
which is fulfilled when she is sexually used by the male to satisfy him,
especially in coitus.



6

Pornography

> Consider also our spirits that break a little each time we see
> ourselves in chains or full labial display for the conquering male
> viewer, bruised or on our knees, screaming a real or pretended pain to
> delight the sadist, pretending to enjoy what we don't enjoy, to be
> blind to the images of our sisters that really haunt us---humiliated
> often enough ourselves by the truly obscene idea that sex and the
> domination of women must be combined.

Gloria Steinem, "Exotica and Pornography"

> Somehow every indignity the female suffers ultimately comes to be
> symbolized in a sexuality that is held to be her responsibility, her
> shame. Even the self-denigration required of the prostitute is an
> emotion urged upon all women, but rarely with as much success: not as
> frankly, not as openly, not as efficiently. It can be summarized in
> one four-letter word. And the word is not,
> it's Our selfcontempt originates in this: in
> knowing we are cunt. This is what we are supposed to be about---our
> essence, our offense.

Kate Millett,

> I can never have my fill of killing whores.

Euripides' Orestes, in

The word, derived from the ancient
Greek,
means "writing about whores." means "whore, "
specifically and exclusively the lowest class of whore, which in ancient
Greece was the brothel slut available to all male citizens.

The was the cheapest (in the literal
sense), least regarded, least protected of all women, including slaves.
She was, simply and clearly and absolutely, a sexual slave.
Graphos

The word does not mean "writing about
sex" or "depictions of the erotic" or "depictions of sexual acts" or
"depictions of nude bodies" or "sexual representations" or any other
such euphemism. It means the graphic depiction of women as vile whores.
In ancient Greece, not all prostitutes were considered vile: only
the

Contemporary pornography strictly and literally conforms to the word's
root meaning: the graphic depiction of vile whores, or, in our language,
sluts, cows (as in: sexual cattle, sexual chattel), cunts. The word has
not changed its meaning and the genre is not misnamed. The only change
in the meaning of the word is with respect to its second part,
graphos: now there are cameras---there is still photography,
film, video. The methods of graphic depiction have increased in number
and in kind: the content is the same; the meaning is the same; the
purpose is the same; the status of the women depicted is the same; the
sexuality of the women depicted is the same; the value of the women
depicted is the same. With the technologically advanced methods of
graphic depiction, real women are required for the depiction as such to
exist.

The word does not have any other
meaning than the one cited here, the graphic depiction of the lowest
whores. Whores exist to serve men sexually. Whores exist only within a
framework of male sexual domination. Indeed, outside that framework the
notion of whores would be absurd and the usage of women as whores would
be impossible. The word is incomprehensible
unless one is immersed in the lexicon of male domination. Men have
created the group, the type, the concept, the epithet, the insult, the
industry, the trade, the commodity, the reality of woman as whore. Woman
as whore exists within the objective and real system of male sexual
domination. The pornography itself is objective and real and central to
the male sexual system. The valuation of women's sexuality in
pornography is objective and real because women are so regarded and so
valued. The force depicted in pornography is objective and real because
force is so used against women. The debasing of women depicted in
pornography and intrinsic to it is objective and real in that women are
so debased. The uses of women depicted in pornography are objective and
real because women are so used. The women used in pornography are used
in pornography. The definition of women articulated systematically and
consistently in pornography is objective and real in that real women
exist within and must live with constant reference to the boundaries of
this definition. The fact that pornography is widely believed to be
"sexual representations" or "depictions of sex" emphasizes only that the
valuation of women as low whores is widespread and that the sexuality of
women is perceived as low and whorish in and of itself. The fact that
pornography is widely believed to be "depictions of the erotic" means
only that the debasing of women is held to be the real pleasure of sex.
As Kate Millett wrote, women\'s sexuality is reduced to the one
essential: "cunt\... our essence, our offense. "^1^ The idea that
pornography is "dirty" originates in the conviction that the sexuality
of women is dirty and is actually portrayed in pornography; that women's
bodies (especially women's genitals) are dirty and lewd in themselves.
Pornography does not, as some claim, refute the idea that female
sexuality is dirty: instead, pornography embodies and exploits this
idea; pornography sells and promotes it.

In the United States, the pornography industry is larger than the
record and film industries combined. In a time of widespread economic
impoverishment, it is growing: more and more male consumers are eager to
spend more and more money on pornography---on depictions of women as
vile whores. Pornography is now carried by cable television; it is now
being marketed for home use in video machines. The technology itself
demands the creation of more and more to
meet the market opened up by the technology. Real women are tied up,
stretched, hanged, fucked, gang-banged, whipped, beaten, and begging for
more. In the photographs and films, real women are used as
porneia
porneia
porneia as the technology widens the market for the visual
consumption of women being brutalized and loving it. One picture is
worth a thousand words. The number of pictures required to meet the
demands of the marketplace determines the number of
porneia required to meet the demands of graphic depiction.
The numbers grow as the technology and its accessibility grow. The
technology by its very nature encourages more and more passive
acquiescence to the graphic depictions. Passivity makes the already
credulous consumer more credulous. He comes to the pornography a
believer; he goes away from it a missionary. The technology itself
legitimizes the uses of women conveyed by it.

In the male system, women are sex; sex is the whore. The whore
is, the lowest whore, the whore who belongs
to male citizens: the slut, the cunt. Buying her
is buying pornography. Having her is having pornography. Seeing her is
seeing pornography. Seeing her sex, especially her genitals, is seeing
pornography. Seeing her in sex is seeing the whore in sex. Using her is
using pornography. Wanting her means wanting pornography. Being her
means being pornography.



7

Whores

> The best houses do not exhibit the women in cages.

The Nightless City or the History of the Yoshiwara Yukwaku,
1899 report on a red-light district in Japan

Male sexual domination is a material system with an ideology and a
metaphysics. The sexual colonialization of women's bodies is a material
reality: men control the sexual and reproductive uses of women's bodies.
The institutions of control include law, marriage, prostitution,
pornography, health care, the economy, organized religion, and
systematized physical aggression against women (for instance, in rape
and battery). Male domination of the female body is the basic material
reality of women's lives; and all struggle for dignity and
self-determination is rooted in the struggle for actual control of one's
own body, especially control over physical access to one's own body. The
ideology of male sexual domination posits that men are superior to women
by virtue of their penises; that physical possession of the female is a
natural right of the male; that sex is, in fact, conquest and possession
of the female, especially but not exclusively phallic conquest and
phallic possession; that the use of the female body for sexual or
reproductive purposes is a natural right of men; that the sexual will of
men properly and naturally defines the parameters of a woman's sexual
being, which is her whole identity. The metaphysics of male sexual
domination is that women are whores. This basic truth transcends all
lesser truths in the male system. One does not violate something by
using it for what it is: neither rape nor prostitution is an abuse of
the female because in both the female is fulfilling her natural
function; that is why rape is absurd and incomprehensible as an abusive
phenomenon in the male system, and so is prostitution, which is held to
be voluntary even when the prostitute is hit, threatened, drugged, or
locked in. The woman's effort to stay innocent, her effort to prove
innocence, her effort to prove in any instance of sexual use that she
was used against her will, is always and unequivocably an effort to
prove that she is not a whore. The presumption that she is a whore is a
metaphysical presumption: a presumption that underlies the system of
reality in which she lives. A whore cannot be raped, only used. A whore
by nature cannot be forced to whore---only revealed through circumstance
to be the whore she is. The point is her nature, which is a whore's
nature. The word can be construed to mean that
she is a cunt with enough gross intelligence to manipulate, barter, or
sell. The cunt wants it; the whore knows enough to use it.
Cunt
adds the dimension of character---greedy, manipulative, not nice. The
word reveals her sensual nature (cunt) and her
natural character.

"No prostitute of anything resembling intelligence," writes Mencken,
"is under the slightest duress.. "What is a prostitute? " asks William
Acton in his classic work on prostitution. "She is a woman who gives for
money that which she ought to give only for love\..."^2^ Jane Addams,
who worked against the so-called white slave trade, noted that "\t\he
one impression which the trial \of procurers\ left upon our minds was
that all the men concerned in the prosecution felt a keen sense of
outrage against the method employed to secure the girl \kidnapping\,
but took for granted that the life she was about to lead was in the
established order of things, if she had chosen it voluntarily."^3^ Only
the maternal can mitigate the whorish, an opposition more conceptual
than real, based on the assumption that the maternal or older woman is
no longer desired. Freud writes Jung that a son approaching adulthood
naturally loses his incestuous desires for the mother "with her sagging
belly and varicose veins. "^4^ Rene Guyon, who argued for male-defined
sexual liberation, writes that "\w\oman ages much sooner. Much earlier
in life she loses her freshness, her charm, and begins to look withered
or over-ripe. She ceases to be an object of desire. "^5^ The mother is
not the whore only when men have stopped desiring her.

Guyon, in whose name societies for sexual freedom exist today, held
that women were defined exclusively by their sexuality, which was
essentially, and intrinsically the sexuality of the prostitute. "Women's
sexual parasitism, " writes Guyon, "is innate. She has a congenital
tendency to rely on man for support, availing herself of her sexual
arts, offering in return for maintenance (and more, if she can get it)
the partial or complete possession of her person. "^6^ This propensity
for exchanging her body for material goods is her sexuality, her
purpose, her passion, and consequently "\s\ale or contract, monogamy
or harem---these words mean little to her in comparison with the goal.
"^7^ For this reason, Guyon contends that even the so-called white slave
trade---the organized abduction of lone or young or destitute women for
the purposes of prostitution--- cannot be construed as forcible
prostitution:

> How hypocritical it is to speak of the White
> \sic\ Slave Trade only as a means for recruiting the
> ranks of prostitution. The White Slave
> Trade is universal, being carried on with the consent of the "slaves,
> " since every woman has a specific sexual value. She must sell herself
> to the highest bidder, even though she cheat as to the quality of the
> goods. ^8^

Like most male advocates of sexual freedom (the unrestrained expression
of male sexuality), Guyon theoretically and repeatedly deplores the use
of force; he simply never recognizes its existence in the sexual use of
women.

Typically, every charge by women that force is used to violate
women---in rape, battery, or prostitution---is dismissed by positing a
female nature that is essentially fulfilled by the act of violation,
which in turn transforms violation into merely using a thing for what it
is and blames the thing if it is not womanly enough to enjoy what is
done to it.

Sometimes "consent" is construed to exist. More often, the woman is
perceived to have an active desire to be used by the male on his terms.
Great Britain's Wolfenden Report, renowned for
its recommendation that legal persecution of consenting male
homosexuals cease, was also a report on female prostitution. The
Wolfenden Report stressed that "there are women who, even when there is
no economic need to do so, choose this form of livelihood. "^9^ The
Wolfenden Report recommended increasing legal penalties against
prostitutes and argued for more stringent enforcement of laws aimed at
prostitutes. Male sexual privilege was affirmed both in the vindication
of consensual male homosexuality and in the advocacy of greater
persecution of female prostitutes. At the same time, women's degraded
status was affirmed. The whore has a nature that chooses prostitution.
She should be punished for her nature, which determines her choice and
which exists independent of any social or economic necessity. The male
homosexual also has a nature, for which he should not be
punished.

This desire of the woman to prostitute herself is often portrayed as
greed for money or pleasure or both. The natural woman is a whore, but
the professional prostitute is a greedy whore: greedy for sensation,
pleasure, money, men. Novelist Alberto Moravia, like many leftist
writers seemingly obsessed with the prostituted woman, writes in an
assumed first-person-female voice to convey the woman's pleasure in
prostitution:

> The feeling I experienced at that moment bewildered me and, no matter
> how or when I have received money from men since, I have never again
> experienced it so clearly and so intensely. It was a feeling of
> complicity and sensual conspiracy\... It was a feeling of inevitable
> subjection which showed me in a flash an aspect of my own nature I had
> ignored until then. I knew, of course, that I ought to refuse the
> money, but at the same time I wanted to accept. And not so much from
> greed, as from a new kind of pleasure which this offering had afforded
> me. ^10^

The pleasure of the prostitute is the pleasure of any woman used in
sex---but heightened. The specific---the professional whore--- exists in
the context of the general---women who are whores by nature. There is
additional pleasure in being bought because money fixes her status as
one who is for sex, not just woman but essence of woman or
double-woman. The professional prostitute is distinguished from other
women not in kind but by degree. "There are certainly no women
absolutely devoid of the prostitute instinct to covet being sexually
excited by any stranger, "\" writes Weininger, emphasizing both pleasure
and vanity. "If a woman hasn't got a tiny streak of a harlot in her, "
writes D. H. Lawrence, "she's a dry stick as a rule. "^12^ The tininess
of Lawrence's "streak" should not be misunderstood: "really, most wives
sold themselves, in the past, and plenty of harlots gave themselves,
when they felt like it, for nothing. "^13^ The "tiny streak" is her
sexual nature: without a streak of whore, "she's a dry stick as a rule.
"

There is a right-wing ideology and a left-wing ideology. The right-wing
ideology claims that the division of mother and whore is
phenomenologically real. The virgin is the potential mother. The
left-wing ideology claims that sexual freedom is in the unrestrained use
of women, the use of women as a collective natural resource, not
privatized, not owned by one man but instead used by many. The
metaphysics is the same on the Left and on the Right: the sexuality of
the woman actualized is the sexuality of the whore; desire on her part
is the slut's lust; once sexually available, it does not matter how she
is used, why, by whom, by how many, or how often. Her sexual will can
exist only as a will to be used. Whatever happens to her, it is all the
same. If she loathes it, it is not wrong, she is.

Within this system, the only choice for the woman has been to embrace
herself as whore, as sexual wanton or sexual commodity within phallic
boundaries, or to disavow desire, disavow her body. The most cynical use
of women has been on the Left---cynical because the word
freedom is used to capture the loyalties of women who want,
more than anything, to be free and who are then valued and used as
left-wing whores: collectivized cunts. The most cynical use of women has
been on the Right---cynical because the word is
used to capture the loyalties of women who want, more than anything, to
be good and who are then valued and used as right-wing whores: wives,
the whores who breed. As Kate Millett writes: "\... the great mass of
women throughout history have been confined to the cultural level of
animal life in providing the male with sexual outlet and exercising the
animal functions of reproduction and care of the young. "^14^

Men of the Right and men of the Left have an undying allegiance to
prostitution as such, regardless of their theoretical relationship to
marriage. The Left sees the prostitute as the free, public woman of sex,
exciting because she flaunts it, because of her brazen availability. The
Right sees in the prostitute the power of the bad woman of sex, the
male's use of her being his dirty little secret. The old pornography
industry was a right-wing industry: secret money, secret sin, secret
sex, secret promiscuity, secret buying and selling of women, secret
profit, secret pleasure not only from sex but also from the buying and
selling. The new pornography industry is a left-wing industry: promoted
especially by the boys of the sixties as simple pleasure, lusty fun,
public sex, the whore brought out of the bourgeois
(sic) home into the streets for the democratic consumption of
all men; her freedom, her free sexuality, is as his whore---and she
likes it. It is her political will as well as her sexual will; it is
liberation. The dirty little secret of the left-wing pornography
industry is not sex but commerce.

The new pornography industry is held, by leftist males, to be
inherently radical. Sex is claimed by the Left as a leftist phenomenon;
the trade in women is most of sex. The politics of liberation are
claimed as indigenous to the Left by the Left; central to the politics
of liberation is the mass-marketing of material that depicts women being
used as whores. The pimps of pornography are hailed by leftists as
saviors and savants. Larry Flynt has been proclaimed a savior of the
counterculture, a working-class hero, and even, in a full-page
advertisement in signed by
distinguished leftist literati, an "American Dissident" persecuted as
Soviet dissidents are. Hugh Hefner is viewed as a pioneer of sexual
freedom who showed, in the words of columnist Max Lerner, "how the
legislating of sexuality could be fought, how the absurd antiplay and
anti-pleasure ethic could be turned into a stylish hedonism and a
lifeway which includes play and playfulness along with work.
"^15^ Lerner also credits Hefner with being a precursor of the women's
movement.

On the Left, the sexually liberated woman is the woman of pornography.
Free male sexuality wants, has a right to, produces, and consumes
pornography because pornography is pleasure. Leftist sensibility
promotes and protects pornography because pornography is freedom. The
pornography glut is bread and roses for the masses. Freedom is the
mass-marketing of woman as whore. Free sexuality for the woman is in
being massively consumed, denied an individual nature, denied any sexual
sensibility other than that which serves the male. Capitalism is not
wicked or cruel when the commodity is the whore; profit is not wicked or
cruel when the alienated worker is a female piece of meat; corporate
bloodsucking is not wicked or cruel when the corporations in question,
organized crime syndicates, sell cunt; racism is not wicked or cruel
when the black cunt or yellow cunt or red cunt or Hispanic cunt or
Jewish cunt has her legs splayed for any man's pleasure; poverty is not
wicked or cruel when it is the poverty of dispossessed women who have
only themselves to sell; violence by the powerful against the powerless
is not wicked or cruel when it is called sex; slavery is not wicked or
cruel when it is sexual slavery; torture is not wicked or cruel when the
tormented are women, whores, cunts. The new pornography is left-wing;
and the new pornography is a vast graveyard where the Left has gone to
die. The Left cannot have its whores and its politics too.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

> But the example of Bluebeard should give us pause. For years he has
> been, for one reason or another, killing off his wives. Now, finding
> his life disgusting, devoid of sense, he searches his experience for
> pattern, sees that he has regularly murdered his wives, and asserts
> that next time he will do it on purpose.

John Gardner,

In the introduction to, a
book, the reader is warned that this story "was tempered by the fire of
experience, molded in the cauldron of intense, adult desire\... " Those
who are shy or those who want to see the world through rose-colored
glasses are advised not to read the book. Watergate has shaken public
confidence in the president and elected officials. Black
Fashion Model will scrutinize "the possibilities for tragedy
when public power becomes a tool for private use. " Another major theme
in the story is "the simple unalterable fact of \the main character's\
color---she is a Negress, a young, beautiful black woman. " The abuse of
power and the fact of prejudice are in the center of her life. Her name
is Kelly Morris. She moves like a bird or snake. When she was five, she
won a dance contest in the ghetto. She started studying dance when she
was eight. Kelly's mother wanted her to be a professional dancer but she
had ideas of her own since she was "one of the most physically charming
black women ever to leave the streets of the ghetto. " Her body is long,
her breasts are big. Her features show "a perfect, savage beauty. " She
has dark, thick lips, a wide and slightly squashed nose. She is
beautiful and innocent. Her skin is "dark mellow cocoa" and deep brown.
Kelly walks down the street in high heels and her tightest skirt. Men
talk about how they want a piece of her, but how she will be famous one
day. Kelly tires of dance. When she was seventeen, she allowed someone
to take photographs of her. The savage beauty of her face became
important in front of the camera. Men respected her for her innocence
but the camera made Kelly "into a wanton, lusty
woman!\' Kelly became one of the most famous models in the
country and the most famous black model. She remained innocent, a savage
beauty, a black diamond. Robert Grey watches Kelly posing. Robert Grey
imagines her on her knees between his white thighs. Robert Grey imagines
her touching his cock. Robert Grey imagines her pink tongue sucking his
cock. Robert Grey imagines her two hot red nipples. Robert Grey imagines
her two black naked breasts and his pink hardening cock. Robert Grey
imagines her saying: "I like a big stiff cock like that, Mr. Robert
Grey. I really do.. Kelly stops posing. Kelly has a weakness for men
like Robert Grey who look so helpless. Kelly thinks of her
love, Doug, who is white. Robert Grey tells Kelly that Doug has been
arrested on a morals charge. Robert Grey watches her breasts shimmer.
Doug did something to a little girl. Robert Grey wonders what it would
be like to be a photographer and take pictures of naked girls all day
long. Robert Grey asks the photographer if he ever got the chance
to---ah, ah---Eric, the photographer, blushes. Kelly returns wearing a
fur coat and a bikini. Kelly thinks Robert Grey is a policeman. She
follows him to his car to go to Doug in jail. Robert Grey abducts Kelly.
Robert Grey pushes Kelly into a run-down house. A white woman is in the
room. She is holding wet, glossy photographs in her hands. She calls
Kelly a bitch. Kelly demands an explanation. The white girl winks at
Robert Grey. The white girl tells Kelly she will explain. She shows
Kelly pictures of Doug with a child, then another child, then another
child. Kelly is sick. Robert Grey closes the blinds and double-locks the
door. Robert Grey calls Kelly "little black girl. " Her black breasts
shimmer. The white woman is going to take photographs of Kelly. Kelly's
breasts are exposed. The white female fingers are on her big black
breasts. She gets upset. She struggles free. Robert Grey hits her. He
hits her again. She cries and feels "pain and humiliating
submissiveness. " She falls into a heap of "half-naked black flesh, "
her thighs undulate. Robert Grey undoes his pants. Robert Grey says: we
know you want it. Angela, the white girl, is naked too. Angela mimics
black slang. Kelly says that she always tried to be nice to white
people. Angela tells her that this has nothing to do with race. Angela
wants to use the photographs she is going to take of Kelly to make a
career for herself, but she gets pleasure too from having Kelly there
naked. Robert Grey's prick is getting even harder. Robert Grey takes off
Kelly's bikini bottom. He sees the young black girl's black hips. He
wants to get his mouth around her black nipples. His hand touches her
black breast. She squirms like a black snake. She is like an animal in a
zoo. Angela takes photographs. Robert Grey's fingers are on her black
ankles and his soft white lips are on her thick black mouth. His cock
rubs against her black thigh. Angela tells him to get Kelly in the cunt.
Robert Grey fingerfucks her between her black loins. She screams. Robert
Grey lets her go and watches her anus, which is in the middle of her
black buttocks. He calls her "my little brown butterfly. " He grabs her
and pulls her humiliatingly downward. Kelly tells them that what they
are doing is not right. The white girl says: "you'd think this was a
convention for the promotion of black-white relations the way she talks.
" The white girl wants Kelly tied up. The white man ties up "the young
pretty Negress. " She is tied spread-eagle. "Her naked black flesh
shimmered\... " Angela kisses her and touches her all over. Robert Grey
takes photographs. A chill goes up Kelly's "small, black spine. " Angela
kisses the black girl's dark flesh. She arrives at "the Negress's black
nipple. " Angela sucks the black girl's vagina. Kelly moans: do it, do
it. Angela's hand slides down the black girl's belly and her dark hip.
Angela's hand holds her black breast. Angela takes her tongue away from
"Kelly's black cuntal lips" and calls Kelly her little black princess.
Robert Grey gets excited. Kelly is "beginning to go out of her mind with
the powerful affects of cunt-licking lust! "
Angela continues to kiss the environs of Kelly's cunt as Kelly wonders
how she could have been a fashion model for a national magazine only a
few hours ago and now she is in the middle of a nightmare with an
ambitious lesbian photographer. Robert Grey now wants his. Angela tells
him to give our little black friend a rest. Robert Grey demands that
Angela suck him. Kelly looks on, despite herself. Angela sucks his cock.
Angela wonders if our little black bitch can suck cock as well as she
can. Angela keeps sucking. Kelly is disgusted to have to watch a white
couple performing oral sex while she is tied like an animal. But an
inner voice with masochistic urges is telling her that she loves being
forced. Angela keeps sucking. Robert Grey begins to play with her vagina
with his fingers. Robert Grey can see the black girl with her black
thighs. Angela keeps sucking. Angela keeps sucking. Robert Grey looks at
Angela's vicious face. Angela sucks "with wanton frenzy. " Kelly is
disgusted. Kelly feels an erotic thrill. Kelly keeps watching. Angela
keeps sucking. Angela's cheeks bloat. Angela has become a wild animal in
heat, a bitch. Angela keeps sucking. Robert Grey jams his fingers into
her cunt. Angela sucks harder. The cum pours out of Robert
Grey's prick. Kelly tries to turn away but it is too late. Angela keeps
sucking. Robert Grey rams his cock deep into her throat. Robert Grey
says that he should have saved all that for our little black girl. Kelly
tries not to think. Robert Grey decides to fuck the black girl. He licks
her black breasts and her black lips. Robert Grey gloats that she is the
wealthiest, most famous black fashion girl in the world. She struggles
as he violates her black flesh. He climbs between her legs. He has never
really looked at the vagina of a black girl before. It is just like his
wife's cunt except that his wife is an old hag. He sucks her. She has
chills in her black loins. His penis touches her young black leg. She
prays. His lips clamp down on her clitoris. She experiences erotic
excitement and moral frustration. She prays. Robert Grey sucks. He looks
at her cunt. Her skin and hair are deeply black. Her pubic hair is black
fleece. He likes the deep crimson of "the inner cuntal area. " He sucks.
Robert Grey extracts his tongue to say that "times like this I wish I
was a black man. " He chomps on his lips. His lips and tongue are wanton
and lewd. He sucks. She begs him to stop. She is hot. Robert Grey tells
her to "grin and bear it like a good little nigger girl. " Kelly is
hurt. She is being defiled physically and her self-respect is also being
defiled. She is being made to enjoy it. She cries. He keeps calling her
"little nigger girl. " He starts putting his fingers in her cunt. He
calls her a dumb bitch. She is feeling the hot passions of arousal.
Robert Grey is hurting her with his fingers. Kelly prays. Kelly thinks
she will be torn. Kelly thinks she will faint. Robert Grey is sadistic
and blushing. He makes her smell his fingers. She licks his fingers. She
begs him to stop. He asks her what she would rather he do. He asks if he
should ram her pussy with his fist or use a big rhino dildo or get the
Great Dane that fucks women to come fuck her. She asks where Doug is.
Robert Grey has a plan. Kelly looks up. She sees her smooth black belly.
Robert Grey fingerfucks her. He keeps withdrawing. He spreads the fluid
from her cunt on his cock with his fingers. He tells her it excites her.
His monstrous white shaft is between her black thighs. His fingers pinch
her clitoris. He puts his finger in her. Robert Grey's "blood-filled
cock would soon be ramming into her body.
" Robert Grey does not want
to hurt her by forcing his cock in too fast. He wants her to like it
too. But Kelly is so excited she can't wait. When his cock is buried in
her belly she feels as though she is being stretched apart. She loves
it. Robert Grey keeps fucking her. Kelly tries to resist wanting it but
she can't. Robert Grey is twice as excited because she is black and he
is white! Robert Grey thrusts harder. She is hopelessly impaled. Angela
comes from the darkroom with new photos. She laughs as she sees Kelly's
"writhing body welcoming the forceful thrusts of Robert Grey's driving
cock. The young black girl's hot little gash seemed to gape in greedy
desire. " Angela gets excited. Kelly feels ashamed and excited. Kelly
starts screaming: Fuck me, fuck me, fuck me. Robert Grey sadistically
stops. Robert Grey sadistically begins again. He keeps fucking her until
she finally goes limp. "Her body was beaten and bruised and satiated
from the ravishment, but she slowly but surely remembered who she was
and who the man was she was with. " The camera is clicking. Angela shows
her the photographs of her being fucked by Robert Grey. Kelly asks for
Doug. They call Bart, Kelly's former boyfriend. Bart is going to be the
third person. Bart Kurtis stands above her. He undresses. He is a
policeman with a detective's. 38. He has had Doug arrested. He wants
revenge on Kelly. They untie her. Her breasts hang like wild black
fruits. Angela sucks Bart. He wants Kelly to suck him. She is
lust-wracked. He makes her suck. Her black lips suck. His prick is too
big for any natural orifice. His cock keeps sticking at the bottom of
her throat. She feels lust. She considers herself "the worst little
nigger girl in the entire city. " Bart lunges viciously in her throat
but she is sucking with a wild abandon. Her pain is horrible but her
lust is overwhelming. She pulls away and manages to stop Bart from
coming in her mouth. The white lavalike cum erupts. He tries to get it
on her black cheek. She wonders how it is that a black man's cum and a
white man's cum are the same color. Robert Grey gets her on top of him.
Bart's long, thick cock is getting ripe again. It is too big to fit in
her cunt. Angela puts Robert Grey's cock in Kelly's cunt. Bart says:
"Okay now, you little black whore, what about some brown-eye\... just to
let you feel how good it is to be home again, eh? I bet you'd really
like to have my cock up your tail, hey? " She screams. Bart has a huge,
meaty erection. Bart pushes and pushes and pushes in. She realizes with
terror that Bart's cock is not even nearly in her yet. He keeps going in
farther and farther. It is like a crucifixion, "the nail pounding into
her\... defiling her asshole. " Then she starts to get excited and like
it. She screams, fuck me, fuck me, fuck me, hurt me, fuck my ass my
lover. Robert Grey fucks harder. Angela makes Kelly eat her cunt while
the two men are fucking Kelly. Bart cums. Kelly cums and cums and cums.
Her cumming makes the two men hard again. The four continue their lusty,
wild abandonment. Kelly returns to work the next day. She tries to keep
the secret of her "molestation and the horrible agony of her ultimate
defilement and humiliation. " A national newspaper prints one of the
lascivious photos and Kelly is ruined forever. The once most famous
black fashion model retires to anonymity with Doug, the white lover she
tried to protect.

The relationship of all this to Watergate is not entirely
clear.

At the heart of the story, however, is indeed "the simple unalterable
fact of her color. "

All the sex in is the standard
stuff of pornography: rape, bondage, humiliation, pain, fucking,
assfucking, fingerfucking, cocksucking, cuntsucking, kidnapping,
hitting, the sexual cruelty of one woman toward another, pair sex, gang
sex.

All the values are the standard values of pornography: the excitement
of humiliation, the joy of pain, the pleasure of abuse, the magnificence
of cock, the woman who resists only to discover that she loves it and
wants more.

The valuation of the woman is the standard valuation ("a wanton,
lusty except that her main sexual part is
her skin, its color. Her skin with its color is her sex with its nature.
She is punished in sex by sex and she is punished as a consequence of
sex: she loses her status. All this punishment is deserved, owing to her
sex, which is her skin. The genital shame of any woman is transferred to
the black woman's skin. The shame of sex is the shame of her skin. The
stigma of sex is the stigma of her skin. The use of her sex is the use
of her skin. The violence against her sex is violence against her skin.
The excitement of torturing her sex is the excitement of torturing her
skin. The hatred of her sex is the hatred of her skin. Her sex is
stretched over her like a glove and when he touches her skin he puts on
that glove. She models her skin, her sex. Her sex is as close, as
available, as her skin. Her sex is as dark as her skin. The black model
need not model naked to be sex; any display of her skin is sex. Her sex
is right on the surface---her essence, her offense.

Bart, the black male policeman with a gun, punishes her for leaving
him, leaving home, leaving by moving up and out. His race is first made
clear in a description of the size of his cock. Later the text reveals
that he is a black man; but the reader, having encountered the size of
his cock ("His prick is too big for any natural orifice"), is presumed
to know already. He is the boss. The white folks are under his orders
and doing what he wants. He is on top; he is the meanest; he fucks the
black woman in the ass to hurt her the worst. These are all reasons to
fear him, especially to fear his sex. He avenges his masculinity and his
race on her---by using his huge cock. She ends up calling him her lover
and begging him to hurt her: with each other, race is neutralized---they
are just male and female after all.

Kelly is a good girl Only in front of the
camera is she wanton, lewd, lusty---a woman! Her sexual nature is in
what the camera captures---her skin. Once actually used---revealed in
sex to be what she is in skin---she loses everything. The camera
captures her skin in sexual action, her skin actualized, being used for
what it is. The huge cock reveals the black man. The black female's skin
reveals her: her skin is cunt; it has that sexual value in and of
itself. Her face is savage beauty, savage cunt. She has no part that is
not cunt. One wants her; one wants her skin. One has her; one has her
skin. One rapes her; one rapes her skin. One humiliates her; one
humiliates her skin. As long as her skin shows, her cunt shows. This is
the specific sexual value of the black woman in pornography in the
United States, a race-bound society fanatically committed to the sexual
devaluing of black skin perceived as a sex organ and a sexual nature. No
woman of any other race bears this specific burden in this country. In
no other woman is skin sex, cunt in and of itself---her essence, her
offense. This meaning of the black woman\'s skin is revealed in the
historical usage of her, even as it developed from the historical usage
of her. This valuation of the black woman is real, especially vivid in
urban areas where she is used as a street whore extravagantly and
without conscience. Poverty forces her; but it is the sexual valuation
of her skin that predetermines her poverty and permits the simple,
righteous use of her as a whore.

How, then, does one fight racism and jerk off to it at the same time?
The Left cannot have its whores and its politics too. The imperial
United States cannot maintain its racist system without its black
whores, its bottom, the carnal underclass. The sexualization of race
within a racist system is a prime purpose and consequence of
pornography. In using the black woman, pornography depicts the whore by
depicting her skin; in using the pornography, men spit on her sex and
her skin. Here the relationship of sex and death could not be clearer:
this sexual use of the black woman is the death of freedom, the death of
justice, the death of equality.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

> Gena Corea: Are you saying that some doctors are now feeling that in
> order to preserve the birth canal, they should do cesarean
> sections?

> Dr. Herbert Ratner: There are some doctors who have taken
> that position---that this is an improvement on nature. I think that,
> deep down, this is the way doctors are really thinking, although they
> don't articulate it. They somehow think they are preserving the birth
> canal, not only claiming that it protects against later pathology like
> cystocele and prolapse, which has never really been demonstrated---but
> they also think, though they probably don't articulate it, they really
> think it's a contribution to lovemaking\.... Deep down, the American
> physician thinks he's doing a woman a favor in preserving her vagina
> for sexual activities. He can't sew back the hymen
> *\laughs\* so he can't take it back to a real virginal
> state, but if he could do that, he'd probably do it.

> Gena Corea: Are they doing her a favor or her husband a favor, do you
> think?

> Dr. Herbert Ratner: I think they're doing this in good part for the
> husband but behind it is that if the wife can function better for the
> husband, she's happier too. They're doing it for both.

Unpublished interview by Gena Corea, September 20, 1979

The magazine is called It is subtitled "Big
Bellied Mamas. " The model on the cover is white and great with child.
She is fingering her huge belly. Her fingernails are painted purple. She
is naked except for a garter belt that hangs unfastened, framing her
huge belly. Inside, this model is called Anna. There are twenty-three
pages of photographs of Anna, some in color, some black and white. In
most of the photographs, Anna is displaying her huge belly as if it
were---in the visual vocabulary of pornography---her breasts or ass or
cunt. In the rest of the photographs, Anna is fingering other parts of
her body, especially her genitals, or she is displaying her genitals. In
many of the photographs Anna has on pieces of underwear---garter belt,
bra, stockings, robe. In every case, the positioning of the underwear on
and around her body suggests bondage. In two photographs Anna has a
stethoscope: in one, it is on her belly, her legs spread, her underwear
suggesting bondage; in the other it is approaching her vagina, her legs
spread, her underwear suggesting bondage. In three photographs, Anna is
shown being sprayed with a shower of water. The source of the water is
not clear; the photographs suggest "water sports, " urine. In one
photograph, there is the belly, in between her legs, her vaginal opening
above her belly, her ass at the top of the frame. In other words, the
model is on her stomach, with her legs spread, her vagina on display,
shot from behind so that only her belly, vaginal opening, ass, and
thighs are shown. Her garter belt, which must be around her waist, is
shown as if it were a rope tied around her belly. In one photograph Anna
stands, belly in profile, looking at several large dildoes. The
accompanying text explains that while most pregnancies cause no trouble,
there are some exceptions. Anna has had a lot of trouble with endrocrine
gland disorders. Diseases of the thyroid are listed. Anna started
getting awful pains in her back and stomach. This was the pituitary
gland "out of order, " the "master gland" that produces "about six known
hormones. " Anna told her doctor but he only nodded his head and took
her temperature, which she thought was unprofessional. In her fourth
month she felt the baby move. The doctor explained that the embryo was
now a fetus and that it was "stretching itself in its bag of water. "
Anna, being inquisitive, wanted to investigate. Could she X-ray the
fetus? No. Anna had to look at pictures in medical books. Anna, like
other women going through pregnancy, developed a philosophy. Before she
had been fatalistic. Now she decided that she did have control over her
life. Anna used to be morbid but now she is not. She is not concerned
with failing anymore because she has succeeded in being pregnant. Anna
"commands a new kind of attention now. She can tell by looking in a
man's eyes exactly what he is thinking. Her motherhood has awakened deep
maternal instincts. He would never have had these same emotions if her
stomach were flat. " Soon Anna will give birth. She has been warned by
other women. She could have metabolic problems causing toxemia. "And
then there is the struggle for the balance of power between the estrin
and progestin hormones. " This struggle for the balance of power
"irritates" the uterus and causes labor. Although Anna is usually
concerned with warnings, she is determined to listen to advice but to
maintain calm in the face of "these dire premonitions. " Anna's outlook
is completely positive. She gets unexpected heartbeats at unexpected
times and she has difficulty catching her breath. For several weeks she
was worried because a close friend had a hemorrhage and almost died from
internal bleeding: "From her doctor she discovered that there were two
kinds of hemorrhage: antepartum, meaning the kind that comes before the
baby is born and postpartum, which comes afterwards. " A ruptured uterus
is also a grim possibility. Anna cannot stop thinking about this. But
since Anna has been meditating, she is good at taking naps. Because the
enlarged uterus displaces the rest of the abdomen, there can be frequent
urination. Anna does not want to have to get up in the middle of the
night and go all the way to the bathroom. She has wanted "a portable
receptacle" on wheels. But she hasn't found a store that sells one. Anna
is very curious about men's reactions to her pregnancy. She approaches
strangers and asks them. The answers vary but most of the men were
intrigued by her shape and size. Anna so far hasn't had morning
sickness. She is having trouble judging time. "All of this is part of
being pregnant, of course. " Anna's story is followed by twenty-two
pages of photographs of Abbey, a white woman with big breasts
distinguished by particularly large, dark aureoles around her nipples.
Abbey's belly, big but not so big as Anna's, is the center of attention,
unless she is masturbating or her legs are spread to show her genitals.
The photographs are in color and in black and white. Abbey could not
believe she was pregnant. She had been swallowing fertility pills like
mad. Abbey ovulated fourteen days before her menstrual period. Abbey
could not see this miracle directly but her instincts told her it was
happening: "In her mind she was right there watching this particle of
herself begin an incredible cycle. " The life of the ovum is explained.
The male ejaculate ("approximately one teaspoonful of fluid") is
explained. Abbey remembers the ejaculation and looks forward to it each
time. The "male sperm" are "eellike with arrow-shaped heads and they
know exactly what they are and what is expected of them. " Their journey
is described. Abbey is dizzy just thinking "that she is the container
for all that running about. " The sperm mostly die but one doesn't. It
finds a bed. Once Abbey was told that she had a small tumor in her
uterus that meant she couldn't conceive. But the "obstacle dissolved
away" and "there was no blockage in the junction to her Fallopian tubes.
" Abbey could not believe she was pregnant. "And then Boom! " Abbey had
taken the air insufflation test to see whether her Fallopian tubes were
clear. The tubes were clear but still she had "to submit to postcoital
scrutiny. " The examination was to see whether there were secretions in
the vagina that were destroying the sperm--- Abbey feared this was the
case---or whether there were not enough sperm. During the tests Abbey
could not have intercourse. Smears would show whether the sperm was
viable or not when in touch "with the vaginal contents. " Abbey worried.
She had "strange erotic dreams. " She dreamed that her limbs were
separated from her body. Once she knew she was pregnant she became
strong. All the trials of the past were erased. She could not dress with
her former style but she knew a designer who made maternity clothes that
would accentuate her femininity. She had to adjust to a new schedule.
She couldn't get up early and take a walk. Moving around wasn't so
simple. Abbey had to adjust to a new response to her body. Before she
had had a stunning body and had gotten attention wherever she went. She
wouldn't wear a bra because she wanted her breasts to have freedom.
"And, of course, her sleek, long legs were accustomed to stretching out
and allowing her full buns all the liberty they desired. " Sometimes the
wind would raise her skirt and her silk panties would show: "It didn't
take much imagination to visualize her perky pussy enclosed within that
tiny strip of fabric. " Now all that "street fun" is gone. But Abbey
will someday be "strutting her stuff' again. Abbey has no regrets. Being
pregnant is so exciting that "\s\ince changes are occurring so rapidly
inside of her now she hardly has time to talk about it to anyone. "
Before she was always on the telephone chatting with old lovers. Now she
hasn't the time. Pregnancy has stopped her informal communication:
"Abbey is limited by her condition\... even dialing can become a chore
when a girl is carrying around all that added weight. " Abbey still has
an active mind, however. She can imagine herself doing all the things
she used to be able to do when she was lighter. Abbey has pointers for
women who are afraid of pregnancy. Abbey has even written these down
"because she wants to pass them on to all future mothers. " Abbey must
spread her joy. Anyone who looks at her expression will conclude that
"\t\his girl loves being pregnant! " Because her metabolism has
changed, she has changed her eating habits. She eats pickles and ice
cream and still gets the necessary twenty-five hundred calories a day,
which is what counts.

The pornography of pregnancy---the graphic depiction of mothers as
whores---completes the picture. The maternal does not exclude the
whorish; rather, the maternal is included in the whorish as long as the
male wants to use the woman. The malevolence of the woman's body is
stressed: its danger to sperm and especially its danger to the woman
herself. Her glands, metabolism, hormones, tubes, ovaries, "the vaginal
contents"---all are potentially or actually malevolent. It is as if she
is swollen and bound to explode from inside.

The sperm are male. The vagina will destroy them. Pregnancy is the
triumph of the phallus over the death-dealing vagina.

The women display themselves, display their sex, display their bellies.
The huge belly is fetishized but the whore behind it stays the same: the
cunt showing herself.

The pregnancy is seen as a condition of both bondage and humiliation:
her difficulty in moving is dwelled on with transparent delight and so
is bladder irritation.

The men who discuss sex say that there are two conflicting sides: those
who believe only in reproductive sex versus those who believe in sex for
pleasure not connected to reproduction. But there are not two sides:
there is a continuum of phallic control. In the male system,
reproductive and nonreproductive sex are both phallic sex, use of the
whore for male pleasure. The woman great with child is the woman whose
sex is ready to burst, who has taken so much of the male into her that
now he is growing there.

The pornography of pregnancy, as of now, is right-wing pornography:
kept secret, a hidden trade in the sluts who get knocked up. The
emphasis on pregnancy is, in terms of sexual values, distinctly
right-wing. This pornography is kept hidden to hide the truth it tells.
Women are not cleansed or purified or made good by pregnancy. Pregnancy
is confirmation that the woman has been fucked: it is confirmation that
she is a cunt. In the male sexual system, the pregnant woman is a
particular sexual object: she shows her sexuality through her pregnancy.
The display marks her as a whore. Her belly is her sex. Her belly is
proof that she has been used. Her belly is his phallic triumph. One does
not abort his victory. The right wing must have its proof, its triumph;
she, a woman of sex, must be marked. The pregnant woman is the
sexual obsession of the right-wing male sexual mentality: that
obsession kept secret but acted on in public policy that forbids
abortion. The pregnancy is punishment for her participation in sex. She
will get sick, her body will go wrong in a thousand different ways, she
will die. The sexual excitement is in her possible death---her body that
tried to kill the sperm being killed by it. Even in pregnancy, the
possibility of her death is the excitement of sex. And now, the doctors
have added more sex---to birth itself. means
sheath. They cut directly into the uterus with a knife---a surgical
fuck. She is tied down---literally cuffed and tied, immobilized by
bondage, the bondage of birth, her legs spread; they pour drugs into her
to induce labor; their bondage and their drugs cause intense and
unbearable pain; she cannot have natural labor; she is drugged and
sliced into, surgically fucked. The epidemic of cesarean sections in
this country is a sexual, not a medical, phenomenon. The doctors save
the vagina---the birth canal of old---for the husband; they fuck the
uterus directly, with a knife. Modern childbirth---surgical
childbirth---comes from the metaphysics of male sexual domination: she
is a whore, there to be used, the uterus of the whore entered directly
by the new rapist, the surgeon, the vagina saved to serve the
husband.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In the system of male sexual domination explicated in pornography,
there is no way out, no redemption: not through desire, not through
reproduction.

The woman's sex is appropriated, her body is possessed, she is used and
she is despised: the pornography does it and the pornography proves
it.

The power of men in pornography is imperial power, the power of the
sovereigns who are cruel and arrogant, who keep taking and conquering
for the pleasure of power and the power of pleasure.

Women are the land, as Marcuse wrote. He did not write the rest: men
are the army; penises and their symbolic representations are the
weapons; terror is the means; violence is the so-called sex.

And inside this system, women are, in our
real live bodies the graphic depictions of whores, used as whores are
used, valued as whores are valued.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We that we are free when the pornography
no longer exists. As long as it does exist, we must understand that we
are the women in it: used by the same power, subject to the same
valuation, as the vile whores who beg for more.

The boys are betting on our compliance, our ignorance, our fear. We
have always refused to face the worst that men have done to us. The boys
count on it. The boys are betting that we cannot face the horror of
their sexual system and survive. The boys are betting that their
depictions of us as whores will beat us down and stop our hearts. The
boys are betting that their penises and fists and knives and fucks and
rapes will turn us into what they say we are---the compliant women of
sex, the voracious cunts of pornography, the masochistic sluts who
resist because we really want more. The boys are betting. The boys are
wrong.



Acknowledgments

The difficulties involved in writing and publishing this book were
enormous. The pornography that I had to study became a central part of
my life and caused me great personal anguish. I had a very hard time
making a living while writing this book, partly because magazines and
newspapers, with few exceptions, refused to publish my work. Book
publishers did not want to publish this book. The completion of this
book is for me a triumph of survival as a writer. Many people helped me
and I will never forget them. It is both fair and true to say that I
would have gone under without them.

John Stoltenberg and Elaine Markson: I can never express what I owe
them.

During the time I wrote this book all of these people helped me
substantially: Kathleen Barry, Raymond Bongiovanni, Gena Corea, John
Corwin, Sheryl Dare, Margaret Desmond, Wendi Dragonfire, Joanne Edgar,
Sandra Elkin, Ellen Frankfort, Leah Fritz, Robert Gurland, Susan Hester,
Lin Hill, Shere Hite, Patricia Hynes, Karla Jay, Eleanor Johnson, Judah
Kataloni, Barbara Levy, Catharine MacKinnon, Donna Mages, Julie Melrose,
Robin Morgan, Bert Pogrebin, Letty Cottin Pogrebin, Janice Raymond,
Adrienne Rich, Florence Rush, Anne Simon, Gloria Steinem, Margaret
Stoltenberg, Vincent Stoltenberg, Geri Thoma, Laurie Woods and her
colleagues at the National Center on Women and Family Law.

Women's groups all over the country also helped me---their activism was
a constant support. I thank Women Against Pornography, Women Against
Violence in Pornography and Media, Women Against Violence Against Women,
Women Against Pornography, People Against Pornography, Feminists Against
Pornography,

Women Against Sexist Violence in Pornography and Media, and all the
feminist activists with whom I have had the honor to march, to plan, to
picket, to talk, and to do other things. And I thank those who have
organized and sponsored lectures, conferences, and seminars on issues of
violence against women in which I have participated.

I owe very special thanks to Gena Corea for her contribution to my
understanding of the pornography of pregnancy.

I also thank the hundreds of women, perhaps over a thousand, who have
told me their experiences of rape and battery over these last years.
They are written into every page of this book and they were with me in
memory as I wrote. I am particularly grateful to the women who told me
about the use of pornography by their husbands, fathers, sons, brothers,
and lovers, and about the use of pornography in acts of sexual abuse
that these women experienced. I thank the feminist workers in the areas
of rape and battery who have shared their knowledge and experience with
me. I thank, always and forever, the feminist writers who have written
on violence against women. I thank the many readers of my work who
communicated encouragement to me during the course of writing this book.
I thank the many individuals who have read this book or parts of it in
manuscript and in proof.

I also thank Linda Marchiano, who in the last months of my writing this
book has been an inspiration and an example.

And finally I thank Sam Mitnick, who had the courage to publish this
book, and the people at Perigee.

Andrea Dworkin\
New York City



Notes

**Introduction**

1. William Lloyd Garrison, Preface, Narrative of the Life of Frederick
Douglass An American Slave Written by Himself Frederick Douglass, ed.
Benjamin Quarles (Cambridge, Mass.: The Belknap Press of Harvard
University Press, I960), p. 5.\

2. Public Hearings on Ordinances to Add Pornography as Discrimination
Against Women, Minneapolis City Council, Government Operations
Committee, December 12 and 13, 1983, in transcript available from
Organizing Against Pornography, 734 East Lake Street, Minneapolis, Mn.
55407, p. 16.

3.Name withheld, manuscript.

4. Sarah Wynter, pseudonym, manuscript, June 19, 1985.

5. Name withheld, manuscript; also testimony before the Subcommittee on
Juvenile Justice of the Committee on the Judiciary, United States
Senate, September 12, 1984.

6. See Public Hearings, Minneapolis, pp. 38-39.

7. See Public Hearings, Minneapolis, pp. 39-41.

8. See Public Hearings, Minneapolis, pp. 39-41.

9 See Public Hearings, Minneapolis, pp. 42-46.

10. See Public Hearings, Minneapolis, pp. 65-66.

11. See Public Hearings, Minneapolis, pp. 66-67.

12. Direct quotations are from the Statement of Jayne Stamen, issued by
Women Against Pornography, February 14, 1988.

13. Terrence Des Pres, The Survivor: An Anatomy of Life in the Death
Camps (New York : PocketBooks , 1977), p.39.

14. Toby Summer, pseudonym, \"Women , Lesbian and Prostitution: A
Workingclass Dyke Speaks Out Against Buying Women for Sex.\" Lesbian
Ethics. vol.2, no.3 Summer 1987. p. 37.

15. Roger Manvell and Heinrich Fraenkel, Himmler (New York: (i. P.
Putnam's Sons, 1965), p. 105.

16. Des Pres, The Survivor, p. 68.

17. George Steiner, Language and Silence (New York: Atheneum, 1977),
pp. 65-66.

18. Elizabeth Barrett Browning, Letters of Elizabeth Barrett Browning
in Mary Daly, Gyn/Ecology: The Metaethics of Radical Feminism (Boston:
Beaton Press, 1978), p 153.

**Preface**

1.  Christabel Pankhurst, "The Government and White Slavery, " pamphlet
reprinted from April 18, April 25,
1913, p. 11.

**Chapter 1: Power**

1.     Mary Daly, (Boston:
Beacon Press, 1974), p. 8.

2.     Daly,

3.     Phyllis Chester and Emily Jane Goodman, Women, Money
and Power (New York: William Morrow & Co., 1976), p.
31.

4.     Virginia Woolf, (New
York: Harcourt, Brace & World, 1957), p. 36.

5.     Arthur Rimbaud, "A Season in Hell, " in A Season in
Hell and The Drunken Boat, trans. Louise Varese, bilingual ed.
(Norfolk, Conn.: New Directions Books, 1961), p. 3.

6.     Jil Clark, "Circulating Information, " interview with Allen
Young, May 12, 1979, p.
9.

**Chapter**

1.     Virginia Woolf, The Pargiters: The Novel-Essay Portion
of THE YEARS, ed. Mitchell A. Leaska (New York: New York
Public Library & Readex Books, 1977), p. 164.

2.     Bruno Bettelheim, The Uses of Enchantment: The Meaning
and Importance of Fairy Tales (New York: Alfred A. Knopf,
1976), p.

3.     John Stoltenberg, "Eroticism and Violence in the Father-Son
Relationship, " in, ed. Jon
Snodgrass (Albion, Calif.: Times Change Press, 1977), p. 106.

4.     Norman O. Brown, (New York:
Random House, 1966), p. 180.

5.     Brown,

6.     Paul H. Gebhard, John H. Gagnon, Wardell B. Pomeroy, and
Cornelia V. Christenson, Sex Offenders: An Analysis of
Types (New York: Harper & Row, Publishers, and Paul B. Hoeber,
1965), p. 6.

7.     R. D. Laing, (New York:
Pantheon Books, 1976), p. 65.

8.     Martin Luther, cited by Margaret Sanger, Margaret
Sanger: An Autobiography (New York: Dover Publications, 1971),
p. 210.

9.     Norman Mailer, (Boston:
Little, Brown & Co., 1971), p. 126.

10.     Havelock Ellis, Studies in the Psychology of
Sex, vol. 2, pt. 2 (New York: Random House, 1937), p.
194.

11.     T. E. Lawrence, in a letter to Charlotte Shaw, March 26, 1924,
British Museum, Department of Western Manuscripts, Additional
Manuscripts, cited by John E. Mack, A Prince of Our Disorder:
The Life of T. E. Lawrence (Boston: Little, Brown & Co.,
1976), pp. 419-20.

12.     Giacomo Casanova,, vol.
11, trans. Willard R. Trask (New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1971),
p. 15.

13.     Laing,

14.     D. H. Lawrence, Literature
and Censorship, ed. Harry T. Moore (New York: Twayne
Publishers, 1953), p. 49.

15.     Ellis, vol. 2, pt. 3, p.
21.

16.     Georges-Michel Sarotte, Like a
Brother, trans. Richard
Miller (Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1977), p.
165.

17.     Jeffrey Klein, "Born Again Porn," Mother
Jones

18.     Virginia Woolf, (New
York: Harcourt, Brace & World, 1957), p. 29.

**Chapter**
**(1740-1814)**

1.     Albert Camus,, trans. Anthony
Bower (New York: Random House, Vintage Books, 1954), p. 35.

2.     Camus,

3.     Cited by Ronald Hay man, De Sade: A Critical
Biography (New York: Thomas Y. Crowell Co., 1978), p.
81.

4.     Georges Bataille, (New
York: Ballantine Books, 1969), p. 163.

5.     Donald Thomas, (Boston:
Little, Brown & Co., 1976), p. 103.

6.     Thomas,

7.     Ibid., p. 7.

8.     Simone de Beauvoir, "Must We Burn Sade? " trans. Annette
Michelson, in The 120 Days of Sodom and Other
Writings, Donatien-Alphonse-Fran\$ois de Sade, trans. Austryn
Wain-house and Richard Seaver (New York: Grove Press, 1967),
p.

9.     Richard Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse, Foreword,
Justine; Philosophy in the Bedroom; Eugenie de Franval, and Other
Writings, Donatien-Alphonse-Fransois de Sade, trans. Richard
Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse (New York: Grove Press, 1966), p.
ix.

10.     Norman Gear, The Divine Demon: A Portrait of the
Marquis de Sade (London: Frederick Muller, 1963), p.
135.

11.     Jean Paulhan, "The Marquis de Sade and His Accomplice, "
in Justine; Philosophy in the Bedroom; Eugenie de
Franval p.
7.

12.     Hobart Ryland, Introduction, Adelaide of
Brunswick, Donatien-Alphonse-Francois de Sade, trans. Hobart
Ryland (Washington, D. C.: Scarecrow Press, 1954), p. 6.

13.     Geoffrey Gorer, The Life and Ideas of the Marquis de
Sade

14.     Thomas,

15.     Ibid.

16.     Ibid., p. 66.

17.     Hayman,

18.     Angela Carter, The Sadeian Woman and the Ideology of
Pornography

19.     Carter,

20.     Hayman,

21.     Roland Barthes,
trans. Richard Miller (New York: Hill & Wang, 1976), p. 8.

22.     Gear,

23.     Thomas,

24.     Hayman,

25.     Edmund Wilson, "The Vogue of the Marquis de Sade, " in
The Bit Between My Teeth: A Literary Chronicle of 1950-1965
(New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux, 1965), p. 162.

26.     Gorer,

27.     Ibid., p. 23.

28.     Wilson, "The Vogue of the Marquis de Sade, " p. 163.

29.     Camus,

30.     Apollinaire, Preface to the 1949 edition of
Juliette (Pauvert), cited by Austryn Wainhouse, Foreword
to Donatien-Alphonse-Francois de Sade,
trans. Austryn Wainhouse (New York: Grove Press, 1976), p. ix.

31.     Donatien-Alphonse-Francois de Sade, Selected
Letters, ed. Margaret Crosland, trans. W. J. Strachan (New
York: October House, 1966), p. 65.

32.     Sade,

33.     Ibid., p. 74.

34.     Ibid., p. 70.

35.     Ibid., pp. 78-79.

36.     George Steiner, (New
York: Atheneum Publishers, 1977), p. 69.

37.     Ibid.

38.     Barthes, p.
143.

39.     Apollinaire, cited by Wainhouse, Foreword to
Juliette,

40.     Sade,

41.     John T. Noonan, Jr., "An Almost Absolute Value in History, "
in ed. John T. Noonan, Jr.
(Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1970), p. 37.

42.     Linda Bird Francke, The Ambivalence of
Abortion

43.     Gorer,

44.     Sade,
in Justine; Philosophy in the Bedroom; Eugenie de Franval,
and Other Writings,

45.     Sade, "The 120 Days of Sodom, " 120 Days of
Sodom,

46.     Sade, p.
267.

47.     Sade, "Yet Another Effort, Frenchmen, If You Would Become
Republicans, " in p.
319.

48.     Peter Weiss, The Persecution and Assassination of
Jean-Paul Marat As Performed by the Inmates of the Asylum of Charenton
Under the Direction of the Marquis de Sade, trans. Geoffrey
Skelton (New York: Atheneum Publishers, 1967), p. 92.

49.     Christopher Lasch,
(New York: Warner Books, 1979), p. 132.

50.     Lasch,

51.     Gerald and Caroline Greene, S-M: The Last
Taboo

52.     De Beauvoir, "Must We Burn Sade? " p. 20.

53.     Camus,

54.     Sade, "Oxtiern, " in p.
701.

55.     Sade,

56.     Richard Gilman, Decadence: The Strange Life of an
Epithet (New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux, 1980), p.
81.

**Chapter**

1.     Sylvia Pankhurst,
(London: Virago\* 1978), p. 95.

2.     Ernest Becker, (New
York: Free Press, 1976), p. 158.

3.     Ernest Becker,
(London: Collier-Macmillan, 1964), p. 19.

4.     Becker, p.
19.

5.     Christopher Lasch,
(New York: Warner Books, 1979), p. 81.

6.     Margaret S. Mahler, Fred Pine, and Anni Bergman, The
Psychological Birth of the Human Infant (New York: Basic
Books, 1975), p. 109.

7.     Mahler, Pine, and Bergman, Psychological
Birth

8.     Becker, pp.
32-33.

9.     Bruno Bettelheim, The Uses of Enchantment: The Meaning
and Importance of Fairy Tales (New York: Alfred A. Knopf,
1976), p. 134.

10.     Havelock Ellis, Studies in the Psychology of
Sex, vol. 2, pt. 3 (New York: Random House, 1937), p.
539.

11.     Ferdinand Lundberg and Marynia F. Farnham, Modern
Woman: The Lost Sex (New York: Harper & Brothers, Publishers,
1947), p. 275.

12.     Becker, p.
52.

13.     Hannah Tillich,
(Briarcliff Manor, N. Y.: Stein & Day, 1974), p. 176.

14.     Theophile Gautier,
(New York: Ives Washburn, 1929), p. 200.

15.     Gautier p.
194.

16.     Anthony Storr,
(Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1964), pp. 44-45.

17.     Anthony M. Ludovici, (London:
Constable & Co., 1926), p. 25.

18.     Otto Weininger, (New
York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1975), p; 299.

19.     Weininger,, p.
92.

20.     Leopold von Sacher-Masoch, diary, April 15, 1872, cited by
James Cleugh, The First Masochist: A Biography of Leopold von
Sacher-Masoch (1836-1895) (London: Anthony Blond, 1967), p.
96.

21.     Roland Barthes,,
trans. Richard Howard (New York: Hill & Wang, 1979), p. 31.

22.     H. L. Mencken, (Garden
City, N. Y.: Garden City Publishing Co., 1922), pp. 135-36.

23.     James Lewton Brain, The Last Taboo: Sex and the Fear
of Death (Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday, Anchor Press, 1979),
p. 55.

24.     Brain,

25.     Norman Mailer, (Boston:
Little, Brown & Co., 1971), pp. 117-18; also in his Genius and
Lust: A Journey Through the Major Writings of Henry Miller
(New York: Grove Press, 1976), p. 94.

26.     Thomas Hardy, (London:
Macmillan London, 1978), p. 34.

27.     Mary Welsh Hemingway, (New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1976), p. 170.

28.     Robert J. Stoller, Sexual Excitement: Dynamics of
Erotic Life

29.     Jean-Paul Sartre,
trans. George J. Becker (New York: Schocken Books, 1970), pp.
10-11.

30.     John Keats, "Ode on a Grecian U\*n, " in John Keats
and Percy Bysshe Shelley: Complete Poetical Works (New York:
Modern Library, n. d. ), p. 185.

31.     George Sand,, ed. and trans. Dan
Hofstadter (New York: Harper & Row, Publishers, 1979), p. 25.

32.     Herbert Marcuse,
(Boston: Beacon Press, 1969), pp. 26-27.

33.     Edgar Allan Poe, "The Philosophy of Composition, " in
Literary Criticism of Edgar Allan Poe, ed. Robert L. Hough
(Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 1965), p. 26.

34.     Georges Bataille, (New
York: Ballantine Books, 1969), p. 140.

35.     Edmond and Jules de Goncourt, The Woman of the
Eighteenth Century, trans. Jacques Le Clercq and Ralph Roeder
(New York: Minton, Balch & Co., 1927), pp. 10-11.

36.     Charles Baudelaire,
(Paris, 1963), p. 1272, cited by Alex de Jonge, Baudelaire:
Prince of Clouds (New York: Paddington Press, 1976), p.
5.

37.     Flaubert, in a letter to Louise Colet, June 1853,
Correspondance, vol. 3, p. 216, cited by Enid
Starkie, (London:
Weidenfeld & Nicolson, 1967), p. 74.

38.     Gustave Flaubert,
trans. Robert Baldick (Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1974), p.
419.

39.     Flaubert, p.
419.

40.     Havelock Ellis, (Westport,
Conn.: Greenwood Press, Publishers, 1977), p. 42.

41.     Becker,

42.     Richard Freiherr von Krafft-Ebing, Psychopathia
Sexualis, trans. Harry E. Wedeck(New York: G. P. Putnam's
Sons, 1965), pp. 244-45.

43.     C. A. Tripp, (New
York: New American Library, 1976), p. 19.

44.     Tripp,

45.     Ibid., p. 17.

46.     Ibid.

47.     Maurice North,
(London: Odyssey Press, 1970), p. 61.

48.     Krafft-Ebing, p.
246.

49.     Becker,

50.     Sigmund Freud, "Fetishism, " in The Future of
Illusion; Civilization and Its Discontents; and Other Works,
eds. and trans. James Strachey and Anna Freud, The Standard
Edition of the Complete Psychological Works of Sigmund Freud,
vol. 21 (London: Hogarth Press and Institute of Psycho-Analysis, 1968),
pp. 152-53.

51.     Storr, pp.
55-56.

52.     Ibid., p. 54.

53.     Ibid., p. 56.

54.     Alfred C. Kinsey, Wardell B. Pomeroy, Clyde E. Martin, and Paul
H. Gebhard,
(Philadelphia: W. B. Saunders Co., 1953), pp. 678-79.

55.     Charles Winick, "A Neuter and Desexualized Society? "
in eds. Lester A.
Kirkendall and Robert N. Whitehurst (New York: Donald W. Brown, 1971),
p. 99.

56.     Lars Ullerstam,
trans. Anselm Hollo (London: Calder & Boyars, 1967), p. 103.

57.     Tillich,

58.     Ibid., p. 14.

59.     Herbert Marcuse, (Boston: Beacon
Press, 1968), p. 242.

60.     Adrienne Rich, "Twenty-one Love Poems, " I, The Dream
of a Common Language (New York: W. W. Norton & Co., 1978),
p.

**Chapter**

1.     Havelock Ellis, Studies in the Psychology of
Sex, vol. 1, pt. 2 (New York: Random House, 1936), p.
128.

2.     Robert Briffault, The Mothers: The Matriarchal Theory
of Social Origins (New York: Macmillan Co., 1931), p.
48.

3.     Kate Millett, (New York:
Avon Books, 1971), p. 209.

4.     Bruno Bettelheim, (Glencoe,
Ill.: Free Press, 1954), pp. 64-65.

5.     Robert J. Stoller, Sexual Excitement: Dynamics of
Erotic Life

6.     A. Merriam-Webster, Webster\'s Third New International
Dictionary of the English Language Unabridged, ed. Philip
Babcock Gove (Springfield, Mass.: G. & C. Merriam Co., 1976), p.
1034.

7.     Elizabeth Jane way, Between Myth and Morning: Women
Awakening (New York: William Morrow & Co., 1974), pp.
197-98.

8.     Suzanne Br0gger,,
trans. Thomas Teal (New York: Delacorte Press, Seymour Lawrence, 1976),
p. 113.

9.     Alex Mallow and Leon Chabot, Laser Safety
Handbook (New York: Van Nostrand Reinhold Co., 1978), p.
4.

10.     H. G. Wells,
in The Invisible Man; The War of the Worlds; A Dream of
Armageddon

11.     Richard B. Nehrich, Jr., Glenn I. Voran, and Norman F.
Dessel,What They
Are and How They Work (New York: Sterling Publishing Co.,
1967), p. 101.

12.     Ronald Brown, Lasers: Tools of Modem
Technology (Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1968), p.
26.

13.     O. S. Heavens, (New York: Charles
Scribner's Sons, 1971), p. 140.

14.     P. A. Cirincione, "Biological Effects of Lasers: Safety
Recommendations, " in Laser Technology and
ApplicationsL. Marshall (New York:
McGraw-Hill Book Co., 1968), p.
251.

15.     Heavens,

16.     Nehrich, Voran, and Dessel,
p. 94.

17.     Mallow and Chabot,
p. 26.

18.     John F. Ready, Effects of High-Power Laser
Radiation

19.     Pennethorne Hughes,
(Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1971), p. 183.

20.     Jean-Paul Sartre,
trans. George J. Becker (New York: Schocken Books, 1970), pp.
48-49.

21.     Susan Brownmiller, Against Our Will: Men, Women and
Rape

22.     George Steiner, (New
York: Atheneum Publishers, 1977), p. 76.

23.     Ellis,
vol. 1, pt. 2, pp. 68-69.

24.     Ibid., pp. 32-33.

25.     Ibid., p. 89.

26.     Theodor Reik, (New York:
Farrar, Straus & Co., 1957), p. 341.

27.     Reik, pp.
346-47.

28.     Stoller,

29.     Georges Bataille, (New
York: Ballantine Books, 1969), p. 126.

30.     C. A. Tripp, (New
York: New American Library, 1976), p. 56.

31.     Tripp,

32.     Ibid.

33.     R. H. Tawney, (London: Unwin
Books, 1964), p. 105.

34.     Mary Wollstonecraft, A Vindication of the Rights of
Woman

35.     A. Schawlow, cited by Nehrich, Voran, and Dessel,
Atomic Light,

36.     Tripp,

37.     Ibid., p. 110.

38.     Stoller,

39.     Molly Haskell, "Rape in the Movies: Update on an Ancient War,
" October 8, 1979, p.
45.

40.     Georges Bataille, trans.
Joachim Neugroschel (New York: Urizen Books, 1977), pp.
24---25.

41.     Bataille,

42.     Ibid., p. 98.

43.     Ibid., p. 120.

44.     Ibid., p. 63.

45.     Alfred C. Kinsey, Wardell B. Pomeroy, and Clyde E.
Martin,
(Philadelphia: W. B. Saunders Co., 1948), p. 9.

46.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Male

47.     Ibid., p. 43.

48.     Arno Karlen,
(New York: W. W. Norton & Co., 1971), p. 443.

49.     Sigmund Freud, The Freudljung Letters: The
Correspondence Between Sigmund Freud and C. G
Jung, ed. William McGuire, trans. Ralph Manheim and R. F. C.
Hull (Princeton, N. J.: Princeton University Press, 1974), p.
64.

50.     Alfred C. Kinsey, Wardell B. Pomeroy, Clyde E. Martin, and Paul
H. Gebhard,
(Philadelphia: W. B. Saunders Co., 1953), p. 705.

51.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Male

52.     Ibid., p. 217.

53.     Ibid., p. 363.

54.     Ibid., p. 468.

55.     Ibid., p. 589.

56.     Ibid., p. 223.

57.     Ibid., p. 545.

58.     Ibid., p. 578.

59.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Female

60.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Male

61.     Ibid., p. 209.

62.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Female

63.     Ibid., p. 371.

64.     Ibid.

65.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Male

66.     Ibid., pp. 385-86.

67.     Ibid., p. 238.

68.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Female

69.     Paul H. Gebhard, John H. Gagnon, Wardell B. Pomeroy, and
Cornelia V. Christenson, Sex Offenders: An Analysis of
Types (New York: Harper & Row, Publishers, and Paul B. Hoeber,
1965), p. 178.

70.     Kinsey et al., Sexual Behavior in the Human
Female

71.     Gebhard et al.,, p.
6.

72.     Ibid., p. 178.

73.     Ibid., p. 9.

74.     Ibid., p. 54.

75.     Ibid., pp. 84-85.

76.     Ibid., p. 85.

77.     Ibid., p. 101.

85.     Ibid., p. 128.

86.     Ibid., p. 129.

87.     Ibid., pp. 108-9.

88.     Ibid., p. 109.

89.     Ibid., p. 177.

90.     Ibid.

91.     Ibid., p. 178.

**Chapter 6: Pornography**

1.  Kate Millett, (New
York: Avon Books, 1973), p. 95.

**Chapter**

1.     H. L. Mencken, (Garden
City, N. Y.: Garden City Publishing Co., 1922), p. 187.

2.     William Acton, (New York:
Frederick A. Praeger, Publishers, 1969), p. 118.

3.     Jane Addams, A New Conscience and an Ancient
Evil

4.     Sigmund Freud, The Freudljung Letters: The
Correspondence Between Sigmund Freud and C. G. Jung, ed.
William McGuire, trans. Ralph Manheim and R. F. C. Hull (Princeton, N.
J.: Princeton University Press, 1974), p. 503.

5.     Rene Guyon, trans. Eden and
Cedar Paul (New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1958), p. 239.

6.     Guyon,

7.     Ibid., p. 200.

8.     Ibid., p. 204.

9.     John Wolfenden, Report of the Committee on Homosexual
Offences and Prostitution (London: Her Majesty's Stationery
Office, 1957), p. 80.

10.     Alberto Moravia, trans.
Lydia Holland (New York: Manor Books, 1974), p. 88.

11.     Otto Weininger,
York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1975), p. 219.

12.     D. H. Lawrence, Sex, Literature and
Censorship, ed. Harry T. Moore (New York: Twayne Publishers,
1953), p. 69.

13.     Lawrence,
p. 69.

14.     Kate Millett, (New York:
Avon Books, 1971), p. 119.

15.     Max Lemer, "Playboy: An American Revolution of Morality,
"



Bibliography

**Works of Pornography Analyzed in This Book**

Anderson, Greg. I United States:
Continental Classics, 1970.

"Barbered Pole. ", December 1978, pp.
7-11.

Bataille, Georges.. Translated by
Joachim Neu-groschel. New York: Urizen Books, 1977.

"Beaver Hunters. ",. December 1978, p.
18.

Guber, Dr. Fritz. "The Art of Dominating Women. " He
& She,

"Last Tango in Tijuana. ", December 1978,
pp. 73-84.

"Les Girls. "

Miller, Jessie. New York: Bee-Line
Books, 1972.

Mom

"Playboy's Roving Eye. ", July 1979, pp.
246-47.

Sade, Marquis de, works of (see full Bibliography).

Wilson, John. California:
Publisher's Consultants, 1978.

*In addition to the works listed above, I have read or looked at
thousands of pieces of pornography: photographs, books, magazines, and
films.*

**Books**

Abbott, Sidney, and Barbara Love, Sappho Was a Right-On
Woman. New York: Stein & Day,
1973.

Acton, William. New York: Frederick
A. Praeger, Publishers, 1969.

Addams, Jane.
New York: Macmillan Co., 1914.

Alcott, Louisa May. Behind a Mask: The Unknown Thrillers of
Louisa May Alcott. Edited by Madeleine Stern. New York: Bantam
Books, 1978.

Alcott, William A. The Young Woman\'s Guide to
Excellence.

Alexander, Shana.. New York:
Viking Press, 1979.

American Medical Association Committee on Human Sexuality.
Human Sexuality. Chicago: American Medical Association,
1973.

Andelin, Aubrey P. Santa
Barbara, Calif.: Pacific Press, 1972.

Andre le Chaplain.
Translated by John Jay Parry. New York: Columbia University Press,
1941.

Apuleius. Translated by Robert
Graves. New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux, 1979.

Ardrey, Robert. New
York: Bantam Books, 1973.

Arendt, Hannah. New York: Harcourt,
Brace & World, 1968.

-. Eichmann in Jerusalem: A Report on the Banality of
Evil.ed. New York: Penguin Books,
1977.

-. New York: Harcourt, Brace
& World, 

-. New York: Viking Press,
1976.

Aries, Philippe.
Translated by Patricia M. Ranum. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins Press,
1977.

Armstrong, Louise. New York:
Hawthorn Books, 1978.

Artaud, Antonin. Vol. 1.
Translated by Victor Corti. London: Calder & Boyars, 1968.

-. Vol. 2. Translated by Victor
Corti. London: Calder & Boyars,
1971.

Ashley, Elizabeth. New York: M. Evans
& Co., 1978.

Astell, Mary. New
York: Source Book Press, 1970.

Atkins, Thomas R., ed.
Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1975.

Atkinson, Ti-Grace. New York: Links
Books, 1974.

Atwood, Margaret. New York: Avon
Books, 1978.

Bacall, Lauren. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1978.

Bainbridge, John. New York: Holt, Rinehart
& Winston 

Baldwin, James, and Nikki Giovanni.
Philadelphia: J. B. Lippincott Co., 1973.

Balsdon, J. P. V. D. Roman Women: Their History and
Habits.

Balzac, Honors de.
Translated by Rayner Heppenstall. New York: Penguin Books,
1977.

-. Translated by Herbert J. Hunt.
New York: Penguin Books,
1979.

Banks, Lynn Reid. Path to the Silent Country: Charlotte
Bronte\'s Years of Fame. New York: Delacorte Press,
1978.

Barbach, Lonnie Garfield. For Yourself: The Fulfillment of
Female Sexuality. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor
Press, 

Barker-Benfield, G. J. The Horrors of the Half-Known
Life.

Barr, Jennifer. Within a Dark Wood: The Personal Story of a
Rape Victim. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co.,
1979.

Barreno, Maria Isabel; Maria Teresa Horta; and Maria Velho Da
Costa.
Translated by Helen R. Lane. New York: Bantam Books, 1975.

Barrett, William. Garden
City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1978.

Barry, Kathleen. Englewood
Cliffs, N. J.: Prentice-Hall, 1979.

Bart, Benjamin F. Syracuse, N. Y.:
Syracuse University Press, 1967.

Barthes, Roland. Translated
by Richard Howard. New York: Hill & Wang, 1979.

-. Translated by Richard Howard.
New York: Hill & Wang,
1977.

-. Translated by Richard
Miller. New York: Hill & Wang,
1976.

Bataille, Georges. Translated by
Harry Mathews. New York: Urizen Books, 1978.

-. New York: Ballantine
Books, 1969.

-. Translated by Joachim
Neugroschel. New York: Urizen Books,
1977.

Baudelaire, Charles.
Translated by Arthur Symons. New York: Albert & Charles Boni,
1927.

Baum, Charlotte; Paula Hyman; and Sonya Michel. The Jewish
Woman in America.

Becker, Ernest.
London: Collier-Macmillan, 1964.     

-. New York: Free Press,
1976.

Bednarik, Karl. Translated by
Helen Sebba. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1970.

Beer, Patricia. I Married
Him.

Bell, Alan P., and Martin S. Weinberg.
Homosexualities.

Bell, Arthur. Kings Don\'t Mean a Thing: The John Knight
Murder Case,

Bell, Clive. New York: Harcourt,
Brace & Co., 1928.

Benet, Mary Kathleen. New York:
Macmillan Publishing Co., 1977.

Bennett, H. S.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1955.

Berg, A. Scott. New
York: E. P. Dutton & Co., 1978.

Bernanos, Georges. New York:
Roy Publishers, 1950.

Berrigan, Daniel. New York:
Seabury Press, 1977.

Bettelheim, Bruno. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1979.

-. Glencoe, Ill.: Free Press,
1954.

-. The Uses of Enchantment: The Meaning and Importance of
Fairy . New York: Alfred A. Knopf,
1976. 

Beyle, Marie-Henri \Stendhal\. Translated
by Gilbert and Suzanne Sale. Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books,
1975.

Blanchot, Maurice. "Sade. " In Justine; Philosophy in the
Bedroom; Eugenie de Franval and Other
Writings, Donatien-Alphonse-Fran-£ois de Sade. Translated by
Richard Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse, pp. 36-72. New York: Grove Press,
1966.

Blease, W. Lyon.
London: Constable & Co., 1910.

Bleuel, Hans Peter.
Edited by Heinrich Fraenkel. Translated by J. Maxwell Brownjohn.
Philadelphia: B. Lippincott Co., 1973.

Block, I wan.
Translated by James Bruce. Newark, N. J.: Julian Press, 1931.

Bode, Janet. Fighting Back: How to Cope with the
Medical and Legal
Consequences of Rape. New York: Macmillan Publishing Co.,
1978.

Borges, Jorge Luis. Translated by
Norman Thomas di Giovanni. New York: E. P. Dutton & Co., 1977.

Boserup, Ester. Woman\'s Role in Economic
Development.

Bosworth, Patricia. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1978.

Bousfield, Paul. 5b: New York: E.
P. Dutton & Co., 1925.

Brady, Katherine. Father\'s Days: A True Story of
Incest.

Brain, James Lewton. The Last Taboo: Sex and the Fear of
Death. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press,
1979.

Brando, Anna Kashfi, and E. P. Stein. Brando for
Breakfast.

Brandt, Paul \Hans Licht\. Sexual Life in Ancient
Greece. Translated by J. H. Freese. New York: Barnes & Noble,
1963.

Breslin, Catherine. New
York: E. P. Dutton & Co., 1976.

Briffault, Robert. The Mothers: The Matriarchal Theory of
Social Origins.

Br0gger, Suzanne. Translated
by Thomas Teal. New York: Delacorte Press, Seymour Lawrence,
1976.

Bronte, Anne.
Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1979.

Brown, E. K., and Leon Edel. Willa Cather: A Critical
Biography

Brown, Norman O. New York: Random
House, 1966.

Brown, Ronald.
Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1968.

Brownmiller, Susan.
Women and Rape.

Bryant, Anita.. Old Tappan, N. J.:
Fleming H. Revell Co., 1971.

-. Old Tappan, N. J.:
Fleming H. Revell Co.,
1977.

-. Bless This House. Old Tappan, N. J.: Fleming H. Revell
Co., 

-. Old Tappan, N.
J.: Fleming H. Revell Co.,
1970.

Bugliosi, Vincent, and Ken Hurwitz. Till Death Us Do
Part.York: W. VV. Norton & Co.,
1978.

Burkhart, Kathryn.. Garden City, N.
Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1973.

Burne, Glenn S. Remy de Gourmont: His Ideas and Influence in
England and America. Carbondale, Ill.: Southern Illinois
University Press, 1963.

Burney, Fanny. New York: W. W. Norton
& Co., 1965.

Butters, John H..
London: Peter Peregrinus, 1971.

Camus, Albert. Edited
by Philip Thody. Translated by Ellen Conroy Kennedy. New York: Random
House, Vintage Books, 1970.

-. Translated by Anthony Bower. New
York: Random House, Vintage Books,
1954.

Carden, Maren Lockwood.
New York: Russell Sage Foundation, 1974.

Carpenter, Edward. New York:
Mitchell Kenncrley, 1911.

Carter, A. E. Boston: Twayne
Publishers, 1977.

Carter, Angela. The Sadeian Woman and the Ideology of
Pornography

Casanova, Giacomo. Vols. 11 and
12. Translated by Willard R. Trask. New York: Harcourt Brace
Jovanovich,

Cassady, Carolyn. Heart Beat: My Life with Jack and
Neal.

Castaneda, Carlos. New
York: Simon & Schuster, 1977.

Catullus, C. Valerius.
Translated by Barriss Mills. West Lafayette, Ind.: Purdue University
Press,

-. Translated by Walter K. Kelly. London:
Henry G.

Cetynski, Karol \Ka-Tzetnik 135633\.
Translated by Moshe M. Kohn. London: Anthony Blond, 1961.

Chakotin, Serge. The Rape of the Masses: The Psychology of
Totalitarian Political Propaganda. Translated by E. W. Dickes.
New York: Alliance Book Corp., 1940.

Charnas, Suzy McKee.
New York: Ballantine Books, 1977.

Chase-Riboud, Barbara. New York:
Viking Press,

Chesler, Phyllis. New York: Simon
& Schustec, 1978.

-. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday
& Co.,

-, and Emily Jane Goodman. Money
and Power.York: William Morrow & Co.,
1976.

Chicago, Judy. Garden City, N.
Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1979.

-. Through the Flower: My Struggle as a Woman
Artist.ity, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor
Books, 1977.

Children\'s Rights: Toward the Liberation of the Child. New
York: Praegcr Publishers, 1971.

Chodorow, Nancy.
Berkeley: University of California Press, 1978.

Christenson, Cornelia V.
Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1971.

Cleaver, Eldridge. Waco, Tex.: Word
Books, 1978.

Clemens, Samuel \Mark Twain\.
Edited by Bernard de Voto. New York: Perennial Library Press,
1974.

Cleugh, James. The First Masochist: A Biography of Leopold
von Sacher-Masoch (1836-1895). London: Anthony Blond,
1967.

-.. London: Andrew
Melrose,

Clifford, Deborah Pickman. Mine Eyes Have Seen the Glory: A
Biography ofJulia Ward Howe. Boston: Little, Brown & Co.,
1979.

Cline, Victor B., ed.
Provo, Utah: Brigham Young University Press, 1974.

Closs, August. Medusa\'s Mirror: Studies in German
Literature

Clurman, Harold.. New York: Macmillan
Publishing Co.,

Cole, William Graham.
New York: Association Press, 1959.

Coles, Robert. Chicanos,
Indians.

-, and Jane Hallowell Coles. New
York:Delacorte Press, Seymour Lawrence,
1978.

Colette. Translated by
Antonia White. New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux, 1978.

-. Translated by Helen
Beauclerk. NewYork: Farrar, Straus & Giroux,
1978.

Condorcet, Marie Jean Antoine. Condorcet: Selected
Writings. Edited by Keith Michael Baker. Indianapolis:
Bobbs-Merrill Co., 1976.

Connell, Noreen, and Cassandra Wilson, eds. Rape: The First
Sourcebooks for Women. New York: New American Library,
1974.

Cooke, Joanne; Charlotte Bunch-Weeks; and Robin Morgan, eds.
The New Women: An Anthology of Women\'s Liberation.
Greenwich, Conn.: Fawcett Publications, 1971.

Cooper, David. New York:
Random House, Vintage Books, 1971.

Cooper, Elizabeth. New
York: Century Company, n. d.

Cordelier, Jeanne. ^u^The Life": Memoirs of a French
Hooker. Translated by Harry Mathews. New York: Viking Press,
1978.

Costa, Mariarosa Dalla, and Selma James. The Power of Women
and the Subversion of the Community. Bristol, England: The
Falling Wall Press, 1973.

Cott, Nancy F. The Bonds of Womanhood: "Women\'s
Sphere
1780-1835. New Haven: Yale University Press, 1977. Crawford,
Christina. New York: William Morrow
& Co., 1978.

Daly, Mary. Beyond God the Father: Toward a Philosophy of
Women\'s Liberation.

-.
Boston:Beacon Press,
1979.

Davidson, Sara. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday & Co., 1977.

Davies, Marion. The Times We Had: Life with William Randolph
Hearst. Edited by Pamela Pfau and Kenneth S. Marx. New York:
Ballantine Books, 1977.

Davis, Elizabeth Gould. Baltimore:
Penguin Books,

Dawidowicz, Lucy S. The War Against the Jews
1933-1945.

Day, Beth.
London:
Collins,

De Beauvoir, Simone. Translated
by Patrick O'Brian. New York: Warner Paperback Library, 1973.

-. "Must We Burn Sade? " Translated by Annette Michelson.

In
Donatien-Alphonse-FranCois de Sade. Translated by Austryn Wainhouse and
Richard Seaver, pp. 3-64. New York: Grove Press, 1967.

-. Translated by H. M. Parshley.
New York:Bantam Books,
1970.

De Becker, J. E. or
the History of the Yoshiwara Yukwaku. Rutland, Vt.: Charles E.
Tuttle Co., 1971.

DeCrow, Karen. Sexist Justice: How Legal Sexism Affects
You.

Decter, Midge.
New York: Coward, McCann & Geoghegan, 1975.

-. New
York:Coward, McCann & Geoghegan,
1971.

-. The New Chastity and Other Arguments Against
Women\'s  New York: Berkley Medallion
Books, 1973.

Defoe, Daniel.
Cleveland: World Publishing Co., 1946.

Deforges, Regine. Translated by
Savine d'Estr£e. New York: Viking Press, 1979.

De Francis, Vincent. Protecting the Child Victim of Sex
Crimes.

De Jesus, Carolina Maria. Child of the Dark: The Diary of
Carolina Maria de Jesus. Translated by David St. Clair. New
York: New American Library, 1962.

De Jonge, Alex. New
York: Paddington Press, 1976.

De Koven, Anna. New
York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1941.

Delaney, Janice; Mary Jane Lupton; and Emily Toth. The Curse:
A Cultural History of Menstruation. New York: E. P. Dutton
& Co., 1976.

Delbo, Charlotte.
Translated by John Githens. New York: Grove Press, 1968.

Deming, Barbara. New York: Grossman
Publishers,

-. New York: Grossman
Publishers, 1971.

-. Running Away from Myself: A Dream Portrait of America
Drawn  New York: Grossman
Publishers, 1969.

-. New York:
Grossman Publishers,
1974.

Dennett, R. E.
London: Frank Cass & Co., 1968.

Densmore, Emmet. Sex Equality: A Solution of the Woman
Problem.

De Riencourt, Amaury. New
York: David McKay Co., 1974.

Des Pres, Terrence. The Survivor: An Anatomy of Life in the
Death Camps.

Dickinson, Robert Latou, and Lura Beam. A Thousand Marriages:
A Medical Study of Sex Adjustment. Westport, Conn.: Greenwood
Press, 1970.

Didion, Joan.. New York: Pocket
Books, 1980.

Diner, Helen. Mothers and Amazons: The First Feminine History
of Culture. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor
Press, 

Dinnerstein, Dorothy.
New York: Harper & Row, Publishers, 1976.

Dix, Tennille. The Black Baron: The Strange Life of Gilles de
Rais

Dodgson, Charles Lutwidge \Lewis Carroll\. Alice\'s
Adventures in Wonderland/Through the Looking-GlasslThe Hunting of the
Snark

Dostoevsky, Fydor.
Translated by Constance Garnett. New York: Macmillan Co.,
1950.

Dostoievsky, Fedor Mikhailovich. The Diary of a
Writer. Translated by Boris Brasol. New York: George
Braziller, 1954.

Douglas, Ann..
New York: Avon Books, 1978.

Douglass, Frederick. Frederick Douglass on Women\'s
Rights. Edited by Philip S. Foner. Westport, Conn.: Greenwood
Press, 1976.

Dover, K. J. Cambridge:
Harvard University Press, 1978.

Dreifus, Claudia. Woman\'s Fate: Raps from a Feminist
Consciousness New York:
Bantam Books, 1973.

Duffy, Maureen. The Passionate Shepherdess: Apbra Behn
1640-1689.

Dufournier, Denise. Ravensbriick: The Women\'s Camp of
Death. Translated by F. W. McPherson. London: George Allen
& Unwin, 1948.

Dworkin, Andrea. Our Blood: Prophecies and Discourses on
Sexual Politics. New York: Harper & Row, Publishers,
1976.

-. New York: E. P. Dutton & Co.,
1974. 

Edel, Leon. New York:
Avon Books,

-. The Master:
1901-1916.Books,
1978.

Edwards, Anne. New York: Pocket
Books, 1978.

Ehrenreich, Barbara, and Deirdre English. Complaints and
Disorders: The Sexual Politics of Sickness. Old Westbury, N.
Y.: Feminist Press, 1973.

-. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday
& Co., Anchor Press,
1978.

\--.. Old Westbury,
N. Y.:Feminist Press,
1973.

Ehrlich, Paul R. New York:
Ballantine Books, 1978.

Elliott, Grace Loucks. Understanding the Adolescent
Girl.

Elliott, Neil. New York:
Weybright & Talley, 1970.

Ellis, Havelock. My Life. Boston: Houghton Mifflin Co., 1939.

On Life and Sex. London: Wm. Heinemann, 1948.

-. Sex and Marriage. Westport, Conn.: Greenwood Press, Publishers,
1977.

-. Studies in the Psychology of Sex. Vol. 1. New York: Random House,
1936.

-. Studies in the Psychology of Sex. Vol. 2. New York: Random House,
1937.

Ellul, Jacques. Propaganda: The Formation of Men\'s
Attitudes. Translated by Konrad Kellen and Jean Lerner. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1965.

Emecheta, Buchi. New York: George
Braziller, 

-

Emerson, Gloria. New York:
Random House,

Ephron, Nora. Scribble, Scribble: Notes on the
Media.

Epstein, Cynthia Fuchs. Berkeley:
University of California Press, 1973.

Epstein, Helen. New
York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1979.

Evans, Hilary. New
York: Taplinger Publishing Co., 1979.

Exner, Judith. New York: Grove Press,
1977.

Fabre, Jean Henri.
Translated by Alexander Teixeira de Mattos and Bernard Miall. New York:
Century Co., 1918.

Fallaci, Oriana. Translated
by John Shepley. New York: Liveright, 1976.

-.Letter to a Child Never Born. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday Co.,
Anchor Press, 1978.

Farley, Lin. Sexual Shakedown: The Sexual Harassment of Women
on the Job.

Fasteau, Marc Feigen. New York:
McGraw-Hill Book Co., 1974.

Fedder, Ruth. New York:
McGraw-Hill Book Co., 1939.

F6nelon, Fania, and Marcelle Routier. Playing for
Time. Translated by Judith Landry. New York: Berkley Books,
1979.

Ferguson, John.
Ithaca, N. Y.: Cornell University Press, 1975.

Ferm, Robert L. Jonathan Edwards the Younger:
1745-1801. Grand Rapids, Mich.: Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing
Co., 1976.

Figes, Eva. Greenwich,
Conn.: Fawcett Publications, 1971.

Finnegan, Frances.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1979.

Firestone, Shulamith. New
York: Bantam Books, 1972.

Fisher, Elizabeth. Garden City,
N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1979.

Flaceliere, Robert.
Translated by Douglas Garman. Chicago: Aldine Publishing Co.,
1964.

Flanner, Janet. New
York: Popular Library, 1972.

Flaubert, Gustave. Translated by J. M.
Cohen. London: George Weidenfeld & Nicolson, 1950.

-. Translated by A. J. Krailscheimer. New
York:Penguin Books,
1977.

-. Translated by Robert
Baldick. Harmondsworth, England: Penguin Books,
1974.

-.. Translated by
Lafcadio Hearn. New York: Alice Harriman Co.,
1910.

Flexner, Eleanor. New York:
Atheneum Publishers, 1973.

-. Baltimore: Penguin Books,
1973.

Fontaine, Joan. New York: William
Morrow & Co.,

Forest, Eva. New York:
Random House, Moon Books, 1975.

Foster, Jeannette.
Baltimore: Diana Press, 1975.

Foucault, Michel. Discipline and Punish: The Birth of the
Prison. Translated by Alan Sheridan. New York: Random House,
Vintage Books, 1979.

-.. Translated by Robert
Hurley. NewYork: Pantheon Books,
1978.

Fowles, John. New York: Dell
Publishing Co., 1979.

Fowlie, Wallace. Climate of Violence: The French Literary
Tradition from Baudelaire to the Present. New York: Macmillan
Co., 1967..

Francke, Linda Bird.
New York: Random House, 1978.

Frank, Anne. New York:
Pocket Books,

Frankfort, Ellen. New York:
Bantam Books, 1973.

-. The Village Voice. New York:
WilliamMorrow & Co.,
1976.

-, and Frances Kissling. Rosie: The Investigation of a
Wrongful 

Frankl, George. The Failure of the Sexual
Revolution.

Freeman, Lucy. New York: E. P.
Dutton & Co., Hawthorn Books, 1980.

Freire, Paulo.
Translated by Myra Bergman Ramos. New York: Seabury Press,
1973.

French Institute of Public Opinion. Patterns of Sex and Love:
A Study of the French Woman and Her Morals. Translated by
Lowell Bair. New York: Crown Publishers, 1961.

Freud, Sigmund. Edited by
Philip Rieff. New York: Collier Books, 1963.

-. The Freud/Jung Letters: The Correspondence Between
Sigmund

Freud and C. G. Jung. Edited by William McGuire. Translated
by Ralph Manheim and R. F. C. Hull. Princeton, N. J.: Princeton
University Press, 1974.

-. The Standard Edition of the Complete Psychological Works
of  Edited and translated by James
Strachey and Anna Freud. Vols. 4, 5, 6, 9, 10, 13, 17, 19, 21, 23.
London: Hogarth Press and Institute of Psycho-Analysis,
1953-1968.

-. Edited
by James Strachey. New York: Basic Books, Publishers,
1962.

Friday, Nancy. New York:
Delacorte
Press, 

Friedan, Betty. It Changed My Life: Writings on the Women\'s
Movement.

Fritz, Leah. Dreamers and Dealers: An Intimate Appraisal of
the Women\'s Movement.

-. Rifton, N. Y.: Win Books,
1975.

Fryer, Judith. The Faces of Eve: Women in the Nineteenth
Century American Novel. New York: Oxford University Press,
1976.

Fuchs, Estelle.
Love and Sex
Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1977.

Fuller, Margaret.
New York: W. W. Norton & Co., 1971.

Furer-Haimendorf, Christoph von. Morals and Merit: A Study of
Values and Social Controls in South Asian Society. London:
Weiden-feld & Nicolson, 1967.

Gage, Matilda Joslyn. Church and
State.

Galbraith, John Kenneth.
Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1979.

Gamio, Manuel. The Life Story of the Mexican
Immigrant.

-.
Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1930.

Gardiner, Harold C. Catholic Viewpoint on
Censorship.

Gardner, John. New
York: Random House, Vintage Books, 1978.

-. New York: Basic Books,
1978.

Garson, Barbara. All the Livelong Day: The Meaning and
Demeaning of Routine Work. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday
& Co., 1975.

Gatt£gno, Jean. Lewis Carroll: Fragments of a
Looking-Glass. Translated by Rosemary Sheed. New York: Thomas
Y. Crowell Co., 1974.

Gautier, Theophile. New
York: Ives Washburn, 1929.

Gavron, Hannah. The Captive Wife: Conflicts of Housebound
Mothers

Gay, Peter. Jews and Other
Germans: Masters and Victims in Modernist Culture. New York:
Oxford University Press, 1978.

Gear, Norman. The Divine Demon: A Portrait of the Marquis de
Sade

Gebhard, Paul H., John H. Gagnon, Wardell B. Pomeroy, and Cornelia V.
Christenson.
New York: Harper & Row, Publishers, and Paul B. Hoeber, 1965.

Geismar, Maxwell..
Boston: Houghton Mifflin Co., 1963.

Gennep, Arnold van.
Translated by Monika B. Vizedom and Gabrielle L. Caffee. Chicago:
University of Chicago Press, 1972.

Gerassi, John. New York:
Macmillan Co., 1966. Gerson, Menachem.
Family and
Socialization in the Kibbutz. Lexington, Mass.: Lexington
Books, 1978.

Gibson, Gifford Guy, and Mary Jo Risher. By Her Own
Admission.

Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1977.

Gibson, Jessie E. New York:
Macmillan Co.. 1927. Gide, Andre. New York:
Farrar, Straus and Co., 1950. Giffin, Frederick C., ed. Woman
as Revolutionary. New York: New American Library,
1973.

Gilder, George. New York:
Quadrangle, 1973. Gilman, Charlotte Perkins.
New York: Pantheon
Books,

-. Urbana:
University of Illinois Press,
1972.

-. The Living of Charlotte Perkins Gilman: An
Autobiography. New York: Harper & Row, Publishers,
1975.

-. New York: Harper & Row,
Publishers, 1966.

Gilman, Richard. Decadence: The Strange Life of an
Epithet

Ginder, Richard.. Englewood
Cliffs, N. J.: Prentice-Hall, 1975.

Girard, Ren6. Translated
by Patrick Gregory. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins Press, 1979.

Gissing, George.. New York: W. W.
Norton & Co., 1977.

Gittelson, Natalie. New York: Farrar,
Straus
& Giroux,

Glasgow, Maude.. Boston.
Christopher Publishing House, 1949.

Glazer, Nathan. Affirmative Discrimination: Ethnic Inequality
and Public Policy.

Goebbels, Joseph. Final Entries 1945: The Diaries of Joseph
Goebbels. Edited by Hugh Trevor-Roper. Translated by Richard
Barry. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1978.

Goering, Emmy. London: David
Bruce & Watson, 1972.

Goethe, Johann Wolfgang von.
Translated by R. J. Hollingdale. New York: Penguin Books,
1978.

-. Translated by
Bayard Quincy Morgan. New York: Frederick Ungar Publishing
Co., 1957.

Goffman, Erving. New York:
Harper & Row, Publishers, 1972.

Goldberg, Steven..
New York: William Morrow & Co., 1973.

Goldman, Emma. Red Emma Speaks: Selected Writings and
Speeches. Edited by Alix Kates Shulman. New York: Random
House, Vintage Books, 1972.

-. The Traffic in Women and Other Essays on
Feminism.York: Times Change Press,
1970.

Goldstein, Jeffrey H. Aggression and Crimes of
Violence.

Goldstein, Michael J.; Harold S. Kant; and John J. Hartman.
Pornography and Sexual Deviance. Berkeley: University of
California Press, 1974.

Gombrowicz, Witold. Translated by Eric
Mosbacher. Translated by Alastair
Hamilton. Translated by Eric Mosbacher. New
York: Grove Press, 1978.

Goncourt, Edmond and Jules de. The Woman of the Eighteenth
Century. Translated by Jacques Le Clercq and Ralph Roeder. New
York: Minton, Balch & Co., 1927.

Gordimer, Nadine. New
York: Viking Press, 1966.

Gorer, Geoffrey. The Life and Ideas of the Marquis de
Sade.

Gorky, Maxim. Translated by Ronald
Wilks. Har-mondsworth, England: Penguin Books, 1978.

Gosse, Edmund. The Life of Algernon Charles
Swinburne.

Gould, Lois.
New York: Random House, 1978.

Gourmont, Remy de. Decadence and Other Essays on the Culture
of Ideas. Translated by William Aspenwall Bradley. London:
Grant Richards, 1942.

-. Translated by Lewis
Galantiere. NewYork: Boni & Liveright,
1927.

-. Translated by Isaac
Goldberg.Boston: John W. Luce & Co.,
1920.

Grass, Gunter. New York: Fawcett
Crest, 1979.

Gray, Madeline. New York: Richard
Marek Publishers, 1978.

Green, Martin. The von Richthofen Sisters: The Triumphant and
the Tragic Modes of Love. New York: Basic Books,
1974.

Greene, Gerald and Caroline.
New York: Grove Press, 1974.

Gribble, Francis.
New York: James Pott & Co., 1907.

Grier, Barbara. Reno, Nev.: Naiad Press,
1976.

-, and Colctta Reid, eds. The Lavender Herring: Lesbian
Essays  Baltimore: Diana Press,
1976.

-. Lesbian Lives: Biographies of Women from The
Ladder. Baltimore: Diana Press,
1976.

Griffin, Susan.
New York: Harper & Row, Publishers, 1979.

-. New
York:Harper & Row, Publishers,
1978.

Grimke, Sarah M. Letters on the Equality of the Sexes and the
Condition of Woman. New York: Source Book Press,
1970.

Grosskurth, Phyllis. New York:
Alfred A.
Knopf,

-. The Woeful Victorian: A Biography of John Addington
Symonds.New York: Holt, Rinehart & Winston,
1964.

Grossman, Leonid. Translated by Mary
Mackler. Indianapolis: Bobbs-Merrill Co., 1975.

Group for the Advancement of Psychiatry. The Right to
Abortion: A Psychiatric View. New York: Charles Scribner's
Sons, 1970. Guyon, Ren£. Translated
by Eden and Cedar Paul.New York: Alfred A. Knopf,
1958.

Hagen, Richard. Garden City,
N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1979.

Hale, Beatrice Forbes-Robertson. What\'s Wrong with Our
Girls?New York: Frederick A. Stokes Co.,
1923.

Hammer, Signe.
Mothers and Daughters. New York: Quadrangle, The New York
Times Co., 1975.

-, ed. New York: Harper
& Row,Publishers,
1975.

Hardwick, Elizabeth. Seduction and Betrayal: Women and
LiteratureNew York: Random House,
1974.

Hardy, Thomas. New York: New
American Library, 1961.

-. London: Macmillan London,
1978.

Harris, Frank. London: Constable
& Co., 1938. Harris, Janet. The Prime of Ms. America: The
American Woman at 40.New York: New American Library,
1976.

Harris, Marvin. Cannibals and Kings: The Origins of
Cultures.York: Random House, Vintage Books,
1977.

-.
and Witches: The Riddles of Culture.York:
Random House, Vintage Books,
1978.

-. Cultural Materialism: The Struggle for a Science of
Culture.New York: Random House,
1979.

Hartman, Mary, and Lois W. Banner, eds. Clio\'s Consciousness
Raised.

Hawthorne, Nathaniel. New
York: W. W.Norton & Co.,
1958.

Hayman, Ronald. New
York: Thomas Y. Crowell Co., 1978.

Hayward, Brooke. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1977. Heavens, O. S. New York:
Charles Scribner's Sons, 1971. Heiber, Helmut.
Goebbels. Translated by John K. Dickinson. New York: Hawthorn
Books, 1972.

Heilbrun, Carolyn G. Toward a Recognition of
Androgyny.

Heller, Joseph. New York: Simon
& Schuster,

Hemingway, Mary Welsh. New York: Alfred
A. Knopf, 1976.

Hemmings, F. W. J.
New York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 1977.

Hennessey, Caroline. The Strategy of Sexual
Struggle.

Hennig, Margaret, and Anne Jardim. The Managerial
Woman.

Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1977. Henry,
Joan. London: White Lion
Publishers,

Hericourt, Jenny P. D'. A Woman\'s Philosophy of Woman; or
Woman Affranchised. New York: Carleton, Publisher,
1864.

Hernton, Calvin C. New
York: Grove Press, 1978.

Herold, J. Christopher. Mistress to an Age: A Life of Madame
de Stael.New York: Harmony Books,
1979.

Herr, Michael. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf, 1977. Hersh, Blanche Glassman. The Slavery of
Sex.

Heymann, C. David. Ezra Pound: The Last
RowerNew York:
Viking Press, 1976.

Higham, Charles. New York: Pocket Books,
1979. Hinton, William. Fanshen: A Documentary of Revolution in
a Chinese Village. New York: Random House, Vintage Books,
1966.

Hirschfeld, Magnus. New York:
Emerson Books,

Hite, Shere. New York: Macmillan
Publishing Co.,

-. New York:
WarnerPaperback Library,
1974.

Hitler, Adolf. Translated by Ralph
Manheim. Boston: Houghton Mifflin Co., 1962.

Hocquenghem, Guy. Translated by
Daniella Dangoor. London: Allison & Busby, 1978.

Hodann, Max. Translated by
Stella Browne. London: Wm. Heinemann, 1937.

Holbrook, David, ed.
Open Court, Ill.: Library Press, 1973.

Hollander, Anne. New York:
Avon Books,

Holleran, Andrew. New York:
Bantam Books, 1979.

Horn, Pamela. Kineton,
England: Roundwood Press, 1974.

Horos, Carol V. New Canaan, Conn.: Tobey
Publishing Co.,

Howard, Jane. New York: Simon & Schuster,
1978. Howard, Maureen. New York:
Penguin Books, 1980. Howe, Louise Kapp. Pink Collar
Workers.Putnam's Sons,
1977.

Hughes, Pennethome. Harmondsworth,
England: Penguin Books, 1971.

Hunt, Morton M. New
York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1959.

Huysmans, J. K. Translated by
Robert Baldick. New York: Penguin Books, 1979.

-. Translated by Keene Wallace. New York:
DoverPublications,
1972.

Hyde, H. Montgomery. New
York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux, 1965.

Hyslop, Lois Boe, ed. Baudelaire as a Love Poet and Other
Essays. University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press,
1969. 

Inglis, Ruth. New York: St.
Martin's Press, 1978. Iovetz-Tereshchenko, N. M.
Friendship---Love in Adolescence. London: George Allen
& Unwin, 1936.

Irving, John. New
York: Pocket
Books,

Ivinskaya, Olga. Translated by
Max Hayward.Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co.,
1978.

Janeway, Elizabeth. Between Myth and Morning: Women
AwakeningNew York: William Morrow & Co.,
1974.

Jay, Karla, and Allen Young, eds.
New York: Links Books, 1975.

-. New York: Summit Books,
1979.

-, eds. Out of the Closets: Voices of Gay
Liberation.Douglas,
1972.

Jenness, Linda, ed. New
York: Pathfinder Press, 1972.

Jerome, Judson, Families of Eden: Communes and the New
AnarchismNew York: Seabury Press,
1974.

Johnston, Jill. New York: Links
Books, 1974.

-. New York:
Simon & Schuster,
1973.

Jones, Ann.. New York: Holt,
Rinehart, & Winston, 1980.

Jones, Ernest.
Abridged. Edited by Lionel Trilling and Steven Marcus. New York: Basic
Books, 1961.

Kalstone, David. New York:
Oxford University Press, 1977.

Kanter, Rosabeth Moss. Commitment and Community: Communes and
Utopias in Sociological Perspective. Cambridge: Harvard
University Press, 1973.

Kardiner, Abram. Indianapolis:
Bobbs-Merrill Co., 1954.

Karlen, Arno. New
York: W. W.Norton & Co.,
1971.

Karst, Georg M. Translated
by Emil Lengyel. New York: Albert Unger, 1942.

Kaye, Harvey E. Male Survival: Masculinity Without
Myth.

Keats, John. "Ode on a Grecian Urn. " In John Keats and Percy
Bysshe Shelley: Complete Poetical Works. New York: Modern
Library, n. d. Kemble, Frances Ann t. Journal of a Residence
on a Georgian Plantation in 1838-1839. New York: New American
Library, 1975.

Kempe, Ruth S., and C. Henry Kempe..
Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1978.

Kendall, Elaine. The Upper Hand: The Truth about American
Men.

Kern, Stephen. Anatomy and Destiny: A Cultural History of the
Human Body.

Kessler, Suzanne J., and Wendy McKenna. New
York: John Wiley & Sons, 1978.

Key, Ellen.. Translated by Arthur
G. Chater.New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons,
1911.

Keyes, Evelyn.
Secaucus, N. J.: Lyle Stuart, 1977.

Kindleberger, Charles P. New York:
Basic Books, 1970.

King, Richard. Chapel Hill:
University of North Carolina Press, 1972.

Kinsey, Alfred C.; Wardell B. Pomeroy; and Clyde E. Martin.
Sexual Behavior in the Human Male. Philadelphia: W. B.
Saunders Co., 1948.

-, and Paul H. Gebhard. Sexual Behavior in the Human
Female. Philadelphia: W. B. Saunders Co.,
1953.

Kirkendall, Lester A., and Robert N. Whitehurst, eds. The New
Sexual Revolution. New York: Donald W. Brown, 1971.
Kirkpatrick, Clifford. Nazi Germany: Its Women and Family
Life. Indianapolis: Bobbs-Merrill Co.,
1938.

Klein, Carole. New York: Warner Books,
1980.

Klein, Melanie. New York: Basic
Books, 1963. Klossowski, Pierre. "Nature as Destructive Principle. "
Translated by Joseph H. McMahon. In The 120 Days of Sodom and
Other Writings. Donatien-Alphonse-Francois de Sade. Translated
by Austryn Wainhouse and Richard Seaver, pp. 65-86. New York: Grove
Press, 1967.

Kneeland, George J. Commercialized Prostitution in New York
City.New York: Century Co.,
1913.

Kocourek, Albert, and John H. Wigmore, eds. Evolution of Law:
Select Readings on the Origin and Development of Legal
Institutions. Primitive and Ancient Legal
Institutions.

Koestler, Arthur. The Trail of the Dinosaur and Other
Essays.

Kolbenschlag, Madonna. Kiss Sleeping Beauty
Good-Bye.

Kollontai, Alexandra. The Autobiography of a Sexually
Emancipated Communist Woman. Translated by Salvator Attanasio.
New York: Herder & Herder, 1971.

Komarovsky, Mirra. Dilemmas of Masculinity: A Study of
College  New York: W. W. Norton & Co.,
1976.

Kopay, David, and Perry Deane Young. The David Kopay
Story.

Korngold, Ralph..
New York: Modern Age Books, 1941.

Kraditor, Aileen. The Ideas of the Woman Suffrage Movement
1890-1929. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Books,
1971.

-, ed. Up from the Pedestal: Selected Writings in the History
of . Chicago: Quadrangle Books,
1968.

Krafft-Ebing, Richard Freiherr von. Psychopathia
Sexualis. Translated by Harry E. Wedeck. New York: G. P.
Putnam's Sons, 1965.

Kramer, Jane. New York: Harper
& Row Publishers, 1977.

Kramer, Larry. New York: Warner Books,
1979.

Kreps, Juanita. Sex in the Marketplace: American Women at
Work.

-. Women and the American Economy: A Look to the
1980sEnglewood Cliffs, N. J.: Prentice-Hall,
1976.

Kronenberger, Louis. Boston: Little,
Brown & Co.,

Kronhausen, Phyllis and Eberhard..
New York: Grove Press, 1969.

-. New York:
BallantineBooks,
1960.

Laclos, Pierre-Ambroise-Frangois Choderlos de. Les Liaisons
Dan Translated by P. W. K.
Stone. New York: Penguin Books, 1979.

Laing, R. D. New York: Pantheon
Books, 1976.

-. New
York:

Pantheon Books, 1969.

-. New York: Penguin Books,
1978.

Landes, Ruth. New York:
Macmillan Co., 1947.

Lane, Margaret. "Great
Experiment. " Totowa, N. J.: Rowman & Littlefield,
1972.

Lang, Andrew. New York:
Ams Press, 1970.

Langer, Lawrence L.. Boston:
Beacon Press,

Lasch, Christopher. New
York: Warner Books, 1979.

Laubscher, B. J. F. Sex, Custom and Psychopathology: A Study
of South  New\* York: Robert
M. McBride & Co., 1938.

Lautreamont, Le Comte de. Translated by
Alexis Lykiard. New York: Thomas Y. Crowell Co., 1973.

Lawrence, D. H. Literature and
Censorship.Moore. New York:
Twayne Publishers, 1953.

Lawrence, Frieda.
London: Wm. Heinemann, 1935.

Lawrence, T. E.
Edited by David Garnett. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday, Doran & Co.,
1939.

-.

-. New York: Penguin
Books, 1962.

Layish, Aharon. Women and Islamic Law in a Non-Muslim
State.

Lazarre, Jane. New York:
McGraw-Hill Book Co., 1976.

Leakey, Richard E., and Roger Lewin. People of the
Lake. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press,
1978.

Lebowitz, Fran. New York:
Fawcett Crest,

Lee, Vera. The Reign of Women in Eighteenth-Century
France.Cambridge, Mass.: Schenkman Publishing Co.,
1975.

Lefkowitz, Mary R., and Maureen B. Fant, eds. Women in Greece
and Rome.

Le Gallienne, Eva. New York:
Viking Press, 1953.

Lely, Gilbert. Translated by
Alec Brown.London: Elek Books,
1961.

Lennig, Walter. Translated by
Sarah Twohig.New York: Herder & Herder,
1971.

Lerner, Gerda, ed.
New York: Random House, Vintage Books, 1973.

Lerner, Max. Ideas are Weapons: The History and Uses of
Ideas.

Lessing, Doris. New York:
Random House, Vintage Books, 1975.

Levi-Strauss, Claude. Translated by
Rodney Needham.Boston: Beacon Press,
1963.

L6vy, Bernard-Henri.
New York: Harper & Row, Publishers, 1979.

Levy, Howard S.
Taipei: Chinese Association for Folklore, 1975.

Lewis, Oscar.. New York:
Random House, Vintage Books, 1963.

-. New York: Basic Books,
1975.

Leyland, Winston, ed. San
Francisco: Gay Sunshine Press, 1978.

Lichtenstein, Grace. New York: Dial
Press, 1977.

Lind, Earl. New
York: Amo Press, 1975.

-. New York: Amo Press,
1975.

Lloyd, Robin. For Money or Love: Boy Prostitution in
America.

Longford, Elizabeth. Boston: Little, Brown
& Co., 1976.

Longford Committee Investigating Pornography. Pornography:
The Longford Report.

Lorenz, Konrad. Behind the Mirror: A Search for a Natural
History of Human Knowledge. Translated by Ronald Taylor. New
York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1977.

Lottman, Herbert R. Garden Citv, N.
Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1979.

Lourie, Richard. Letters to the Future: An Approach to
Sinyavsky-Tertz. Ithaca, N. Y.: Cornell University Press,
1975.

Lovelace, Linda, and Mike McGrady.
Secaucus, N. J.: Citadel Press, 1980.

Ludovici, Anthony M. London: Constable
& Co., 1926.

Lundberg, Ferdinand, and Marynia F. Farnham. Modern Woman:
The Lost Sex. New York: Harper & Brothers, Publishers,
1947.

Macadams, Cynthia. New York: Chelsea
House Publishers, 1977.

McBride, Angela Barron. New
York: Harper & Row, Publishers, 1976.

McGovern, W illiam Montgomery. From Luther to Hitler: The
History of Fascist-Nazi Political Philosophy. Boston: Houghton
Mifflin Co.,

Mack, John E. A Prince of Our Disorder: The Life of T. E.
Lawrence.

MacKinnon, Catharine A. Sexual Harassment of Working
Women

McNeill, Elizabeth. New
York: Berkley Publishing Corp., 1979.

MacPherson, Myra. New York:
Ballantine
Books,

Mahler, Margaret S.; Fred Pine; and Anni Bergman. The
Psychology New York:
Basic Books, 1975. Mailer, Norman. Cannibals and
Christians. New York: Dial
Press,

-. Genius and Lust: A Journey Through the Major Writings
of

Henry Miller.

-. New York: Grosset
& Dunlap, 1973.

-. Boston: Little, Brown
& Co., 1971.

Maisch, Herbert. Translated by Colin
Bearne. New York: Stein & Day, 1972.

Malinowski, Bronislaw. Crime and Custom in Savage
Society.

Mallow, Alex, and Leon Chabot. Laser Safety
Handbook.

Mandelstam, Nadezhda. Translated
by Max Hayward. New York: Atheneum Publishers, 1978.

Manvell, Roger, and Heinrich Fraenkel. New
York: G. P.Putnam's Sons,
1965.

Marchand, Henry L.. New York:
Panurge Press,

Marcus, Steven. New York:
Basic Books, 1966. Marcuse, Herbert. An Essay on
Liberation. Boston: Beacon
Press,

-.

Mare, Margaret, and Alicia C. Percival. Victorian
Best-seller: The World of Charlotte M. Yonge. London: George
G. Harrap & Co.; New York: Chanticleer Press, 1949.

Marquez, Gabriel Garcia. Innocent Erendira and Other
Stories. Translated by Gregory Rabassa. New York: Harper
& Row, Publishers, 1979.

Marshall, Donald S., and Robert C. Suggs, eds. Human Sexual
Behavior.

Marshall, Samuel L., ed. Laser Technology and
Applications.

Masters, William H., and Virginia E. Johnson. Homosexuality
in Perspective.

-. Boston: Little, Brown
& Co.,

-. New York: Bantam Books,
1976.

Mathiez, Albert. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf, 1927.

Maupassant, Guy de. Translated by
Ernest Boyd. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1926.

-. Translated by H. N. P. Sloman.
NewYork: Penguin Books,
1977.

May, Gita.
New York: Columbia University Press, 1970.

Mead, Margaret. New York: New
American Library, 1962.

-, and James Baldwin. New York:
DellPublishing Co., Delta Books,
1972.

Meijer, M. J. Marriage Law and Policy in the Chinese
People\'s Republic. Hong Kong: Hong Kong University Press,
1971.

Melville, Herman. New York: Random
House, 1930.

-. New York: Dodd, Mead & Co.,
1923.

Mencken, H. L. Garden City, N.
Y.: Garden City Publishing Co., 1922.

Merriam, Eve.
Cleveland: World Publishing Co., 1964.

Michelet, Jules.
Edited by Gordon Wright. Translated by Charles Cocks. Chicago:
University of Chicago Press, 1967.

Mill, John Stuart.
Edited by Gertrude Himmelfarb. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co.,
1962.

-. Vol. 2. Edited
by Hugh S. R.Elliot. London: Longmans, Green and Co.,
1910.

Miller, Casey, and Kate Swift.
Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1977.

Miller, Jean Baker. Toward a New Psychology of
Women.

Miller, Nathan. New
York: Brentano's Publishers, 1928.

Millett, Kate. New York: Avon
Books, 1971.

-.
New York:Simon & Schuster,
1979.

-. New York: Avon Books,
1973.

Mishima, Yukio. Translated by
Donald Keene. New York: Grove Press, 1967.

Mitchell, Hannah. London: Virago,
1977.

Mitchell, Juliet. New York: Random
House, Vintage Books, 1973.

Mitford, Jessica. Kind and Usual Punishment: The Prison
Business.

Mitscherlich, Alexander. Doctors of Infamy: The Story of the
Nazi Medical Crimes.

Modell, Arnold H. New
York: International Universities Press, 1968.

Moers, Ellen. New
York: Viking Press, 1960.

-. Literary Women: The Great Writers. Garden City, N.
Y.: Doubleday & Co.,
1976.

Mohr, James C. New York:
Oxford University Press, 1979.

Money, John. Baltimore:
Johns Hopkins Press, 1980.

-, and Herman Musaph, eds. Handbook of
Sexology.Amsterdam: Elsevier/North-Holland Biomedical Press,
1977.

Montagu, Ashley.
Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1978.

Montgomery, James Stuart.
Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1950.

Moody, Anne. New
York: Dell Publishing Co., 1979.

Moore, Katharine. London: Allison
& Busby, 1974.

Moravia, Alberto. Translated by Angus
Davidson. New York: Manor Books, 1973.

-. Translated by Lydia Holland.
NewYork: Manor Books,
1974.

Morgan, Elaine. New York:
Bantam Books,

Morgan, Lewis H. Chicago: Charles
H. Kerr & Co., 1877.

Morgan, Marabel. New York: Pocket
Books,

Morgan, Robin. New York: Random
House, 1977.

-. "The Network of the Imaginary Mother. " In Lady of
the  New York: Random House, 1976, pp.
61-88.

\--, ed. New York: Random
House, 1970.

Morse, J. Mitchell.
Philadelphia: Temple University Press, 1976.

Muller, Filip. Translated by
Susanne Flatauer. New York: Stein & Day, 1979.

Murdoch, Iris. New York: Viking
Press, 1977.

Nash, Mary. The Provoked Wife: The Life and Times of Susannah
Cibber.

Naumann, Bernd. Translated by Jean
Steinberg. New York: Frederick A. Pracger, Publishers, 1966.

Nehrich, Richard B., Jr.; Glenn I. Voran; and Norman F.
Desscl. Atomic Light: Lasers---What They Are and How They
Work

Neruda, Pablo. Translated by Hardie St.
Martin. New York: Penguin Books, 1978.

Nicole, Christopher. The Secret Memoirs of Lord
Byron.

Nin, Anais. New York: Harcourt
Brace
Jovanovich,

-.
New York:Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1976.

-. New York: Harcourt Brace
Jovanovich, 1979.

-. New York: Macmillan
PublishingCo., Collier Books,
1976.

Noakes, Jeremy, and Geoffrey Pridham, eds. Documents on
Nazism 1919-1945.

Noonan, John T., Jr., ed.
Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1970.

North, Maurice. London:
Odyssey Press, 1970.

Nystrom-Hamilton, Louise. Ellen Key: Her Life and
Work. Translated by A. E. B. Fries. New York: G. P. Putnam's
Sons, 1913.

Oakley, Ann. New York:
Harper & Row, Colophon Books, 1972.

-. New York: Pantheon
Books,

-. Past and
Present.Random House, Vintage Books,
1976.

O'Donnell, Thomas J. The Confessions of T. E.
Lawrence.

O'Faolain, Julia, and Lauro Martines, eds. Not in God\'s
Image: Women in History from the Greeks to the Victorians. New
York: Harper & Row, Torchbooks, 1973.

O'Neill, Nena. New York: M.
Evans & Co.,

Oppenheimer, Martin. Chicago:
Quadrangle Books, 1970.

Owings, Chloe. New York: Frederick H.
Hitchcock, 1925.

Packard, Vance. New York:
David McKay Co., 1968.

Pankhurst, Emmeline. New York:
Hearst's International Library Co., 1914.

Pankhurst, Sylvia.
London: Virago, 1978. Parker, Gail, ed. The Oven Birds:
American Women on Womanhood 1820-1920. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday & Co., Anchor Books, 1972.

Patai, Raphael. Sex and Family in the Bible and the Middle
East.Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co.,
1959.

Paulhan, Jean. "The Marquis de Sade and His Accomplice. " In
Justine; Philosophy in the Bedroom; Eugenie de Franval, and Other
Writings. Donatien-Alphonse-Francois de Sade. Translated by
Richard Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse, pp. 3-36. New York: Grove Press,
1966.

Paz, Octavio. Translated
by Lysander Kemp. New York: Grove Press, 1961.

-.
Translated byLysander Kemp. New York: Grove Press,
1972.

Peck, Mary Gray.
New York: H.W. Wilson Co.,
1944.

Peckham, Morse. Art and Pornography: An Experiment in
Explanation.New York: Basic Books,
1969.

Peters, H. F. Zarathustras Sister: The Case of Elisabeth and
Friedrich Nietzsche. New York: Crown Publishers,
1977.

Petronius, Arbiter. Translated by J.
M. Mitchell.London: George Routledge & Sons,
1923.

Pietropinto, Anthony, and Jacqueline Simenauer. Husbands and
Wives: A Nationwide Survey of Marriage. New York: Times
Books,

Pinzer, Maimie. Edited by Ruth
Rosen and Sue Davidson. Old Westbury, N. Y.: Feminist Press in
cooperation with Schlesinger Library of Radcliffe College,
1977.

Poe, Edgar Allan. Literary Criticism of Edgar Allan
Poe. Edited by Robert L. Hough. Lincoln: University of
Nebraska Press, 1965.

-. N. p.: Spencer
Press, 



Pomeroy, Wardell B. Dr. Kinsey and the Institute for Sex
Research. New York: Harper & Row, Publishers,
1972.

Portugds, Paul. The Visionary Poetics of Allen
Ginsberg. Santa Barbara, Calif.: Ross-Erikson, Publishers,
1978.

Praz, Mario. Translated by
Angus Davidson.London: Oxford University Press,
1954.

President's Commission on Obscenity and Pornography. The
Report of the Commission on Obscenity and
Pornography

Price, Richard.. New York: Bantam
Books, 1979.

Putnam, Emily James.. Chicago: University
of Chicago Press, 1970.

Raley, Patricia E. Making Love: How to Be Your Own Sex
Therapist. Photographs by Alan Winston. New York: Dial Press,
1976.

Rauschning, Anna.. New York:
Bobbs-Merrill Co.,1942.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Ray, Gordon N.. New
Haven: Yale University Press, 1974.

Raymond, Janice G. The Transsexual Empire: The Making of the
She-Male.

Ready, John F. Effects of High-Power Laser
Radiation

Reckless, Walter C. Montclair, N.
J.: Patterson Smith, 1969.

Reed, Evelyn. New
York: Pathfinder Press, 1972.

-. New York: Pathfinder Press,
1975.

Reich, Wilhelm.
Translated by Vincent R. Carfagno. New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux,
1970.

-. Translated by Theodore P.
Wolfe.New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux,
1970.

Reid, John. New
York: G. P. Putnam's Sons, 1973.

Reik, Theodor. New York: Farrar,
Straus & Co., 1957.

Reimann, Viktor. Goebbels: The Man Who Created
Hitler. Translated by Stephen Wendt. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday & Co., 1976.

Reiss, Curt. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday & Co., 1948.

Restif de la Bretonne, Nicolas-Anne Edm£. The Corrupted
Ones. Translated by Alan Hull Walton. London: Neville
Spearman,1967.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Revel, Jean-Francois.
Translated by David Hapgood. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co.,
1977.

Rich, Adrienne. Of Woman Born: Motherhood as Experience and
Institution.

-. "Twenty-one Love Poems, " I. In The Dream of a
Common  New York: W. W. Norton & Co.,
1978.

Richardson, Joanna. New York: Coward,
McCann & Geoghegan, 1974.

Rimbaud, Arthur. "A Season in Hell. " In A Season in Hell and
The Drunken Boat. Bilingual ed. Translated by Louise Varese,
pp. 2-89. Norfolk, Conn.: New Directions Books, 1961.

Rist, Ray C., ed. The Pornography Controversy: Changing Moral
Standards in American Life. New Brunswick, N. J.: Transaction
Books, 1975.

Roe, Clifford G.
New York: FlemingH.  Revell Co., 1910.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Roland, Marie-Jeanne Phlipon. The Private Memoirs of Madame
Roland. Edited by Edward Gilpin Johnson. Chicago: A. C.
McClurg & Co., 1901.

Rorvik, David M.
Philadelphia: J. B. Lippincott Co., 1978.

Rose, Al. University,
Ala.: The University of Alabama Press, 1974.

Rosen, Harold, ed. Boston:
Beacon Press,1967.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Rosner, Fred. Sex Ethics in the Writings of Moses
Maimonides.

Ross, Susan C. The Rights of Women: The Basic ACLU Guide to a
Woman\'s Rights.

Rossi, Alice S., ed. The Feminist Papers: From Adams to de
Beauvoir.

Rossi, William A.
New York: Ballantine Books, 1978.

Rousseau, Jean-Jacques. Translated
by J. M. Cohen. New York: Penguin Books, 1979.

-. Translated by Barbara Foxley. London:
Dent,Everyman's Library, 1963.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Rowbotham, Sheila. London:
Pluto Press,1974.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. Baltimore:
PenguinBooks, 1973.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. New York:
RandomHouse, Vintage Books, 1974.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-, and Jeffrey Weeks. Socialism and the New Life: The
Personal and Sexual Politics of Edward Carpenter and Havelock
Ellis.

Rowe, William Woodin. Dostoevsky: Child and Man in His
Works.New York: New York University Press,
1968.

Rubin, Lillian Breslow.. New York:
Basic Books,1976.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Rugoff, Milton. Prudery and Passion: Sexuality in Victorian
America

Rukeyser, Muriel. New
York: Random House, 1971.

Rushdoony, Rousas J.
New Rochelle, N. Y.: Arlington House Publishers, 1974.

Ruskin, John. Philadelphia:
Rodgers Co., 1871.

Russell, Diana E. H., and Nicole Van de Ven, eds. Crimes
Against Women: Proceedings of the International Tribunal.
Millbrae, Calif.: Les Femmes Publishing, 1976.

Sade, Donatien-Alphonse-Frangois de. Adelaide of
Brunswick. Translated by Hobart Ryland. Washington, D. C.:
Scarecrow Press, 1954.

-. Edited and translated by Wade
Baskin.New York: Philosophical Library,
1965.

-. Translated by Austryn Wainhouse. New
York:Grove Press, 1976.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. Vice Amply
Rewarded.Pieralessandro
Casavini. New York: Lancer Books, 1965.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

\--Justine; Philosophy in the Bedroom; Eugenie de
Franval.
Translated by Richard Seaver and Austryn Wainhouse. New York: Grove
Press, 1966.

-.
Translated by Austryn Wainhouse and Richard Seaver. New York:
Grove Press, 1967.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. Edited by Margaret Crosland.
Translated by W. J. Strachan. New York: October House,
1966.

Salisbury, Charlotte Y. New York:
Walker & Co.,1973.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Sand, George. Translated by George Burnham
Ives. Chicago: Cassandra Editions, 1978.

-. Edited and translated by Dan
Hofstadter. NewYork: Harper & Row, Publishers,
1979.

Sandford, Jeremy. London: Abacus,
1977.

Sanger, Margaret.
New York: Dover Publications, 1971.

Sanger, William W. New
York: Medical Publishing Co., 1906.

Santini, Rosemarie. The Secret Fire: A New View of Women and
Passion.

Sarotte, Georges-Michel.
Like a Lover. Translated by Richard Miller. Garden City, N.
Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1978.

Sarton, May. New York: W. W. Norton
& Co., 1980.

Sartre, Jean-Paul. Translated
by George J. Becker. New York: Schocken Books, 1970.

Sarvis, Betty, and Hyman Rodman. The Abortion
Controversy. New York: Columbia University Press,
1974.

Saxton, Martha. Louisa May: A Modern Biography of Louisa May
Alcott.

Schapiro, Leonard. New York:
Praeger Publishers,1972.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Schlafly, Phyllis.
New Rochelle, N. Y.: Arlington House Publishers, 1977.

Schneir, Miriam, ed. Feminism: The Essential Historical
Writings. New York: Random House, Vintage Books,
1972.

Schor, Lynda.. New York:
Coward, McCann & Geoghegan, 1979.

Schreiner, Olive. London: Virago,
1978.

Schulder, Diane, and Florynce Kennedy.
New York: McGraw-Hill Book Co., 1971.

Scott, Hilda.
Boston: Beacon Press,1974.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Scott, Walter. New
York: E. P. Dutton & Co., 1928.

Sebald, Hans.
Chicago: Nelson-Hall Co., 1976.

Selzer, Michael. New York: Hawthorn
Books, 1979.

Sexton, Anne. Anne Sexton: A Self Portrait in
Letters. Edited by Linda Gray Sexton and Lois Ames. Boston:
Houghton Mifflin Co., 1977.

Sharif, Omar, and Marie-Thdrfese Guinchard. The Eternal Male:
My Own Story. Translated by Martin Sokolinsky. Garden City, N.
Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1977.

Shaw, Bernard. The Intelligent Woman\'s Guide to Socialism
and Capitalism. New York: Brentano's Publishers,
1928.

Sheehy, Gail. New York: E. P. Dutton
& Co., 1976.

Sherfey, Mary Jane. The Nature and Evolution of Female
Sexuality. New York: Random House, Vintage Books,
1973.

Shiloh, Ailon, ed. Studies in Human Sexual Behavior: The
American Scene. Springfield, Ill.: Charles C. Thomas
Publisher, 1970.

Showalter, Elaine. A Literature of Their Own: British Women
Novelists from Bronte to Lessing. Princeton, N. J.: Princeton
University Press, 1977.

Sidel, Ruth.. New
York: Hill & Wang, 1972.

Signoret, Simone. Nostalgia Isn\'t What It Used to
Be,

Simmons, Ernest J.. Chicago: University of
Chicago Press, 1970.

Sklar, Anna.. New York: Coward,
McCann & Geoghegan, 1976.

Sklar, Dusty. God and Beasts: The Nazis and the
Occult

Slater, Philip. New York: E. P. Dutton
& Co., 1977.

-. The Glory of Hera: Greek Mythology and the Greek
FamilyBoston: Beacon Press,
1968.

Smith, Liz.. Garden City, N. Y.:
Doubleday & Co., 1978.

Snodgrass, Jon, ed.. Albion,
Calif.: Times Change Press, 1977.

Sochen, June. The New Woman: Feminism in Greenwich
Village New York: Quadrangle
Books, 1972.

Solanis, Valerie. New York: Olympia
Press,1970.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Sontag, Susan. New York:
Random House, Vintage Books, 1979.

-.. New York: Farrar, Straus and
Giroux,1977.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. New York: Dell
Publishing Co., DeltaBooks, 1970.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Spence, Jonathan D. New
York: Penguin Books, 1979.

Spruill, Julia Cherry. Women\'s Life and Work in the Southern
Colonies

Stade, George.. New
York: W. W. Norton & Co., 1979.

Stael-Holstein, Anne Louise Germain Necker.
Translated by Isabel Hill. New York: A. L. Burt, Publisher, n.
d.

Stanton, Elizabeth Cady, and the Revising Committee. The
Woman\'s Bible. Seattle: Coalition Task Force on Women and
Religion, 1975.

Stapleton, Ruth Carter.
Waco, Tex.: Word Books, Publisher, 1976.

Starkie, Enid.
London: Weiden-feld & Nicolson, 1967.

Stein, George H., ed. Englewood Cliffs, N.
J.: Prentice-Hall, 1968.

Stein, Gertrude.
Edited by Patricia Meyerowitz. Baltimore: Penguin Books, 1971.

Stein, Martha L.
Friends New York: Berkley
Medallion Books, 1975.

Steiner, George. New York:
Atheneum Publishers, 1977.

Steiner, Jean-Frangois. Translated by
Helen Weaver. New York: Simon & Schuster, 1967.

Steiner, Shari. The Female Factor: A Study of Women in Five
Western European Countries. New York: G. P. Putnam's Sons,
1977.

Steinmann, Anne, and David J. Fox. The Male Dilemma: How to
Survive the Sexual Revolution. New York: Jason Aronson,
1974.

Stekel, Wilhelm. Vol. 1.
Translated by Louise Brink. New York; Liveright Publishing Corp.,
1953.

Stern, Susan. With the Weathermen: The Personal Journal of a
Revolutionary Woman. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday
& Co.,1975.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Stewart, Desmond.. New York: Harper
& Row, Publishers, 1977.

Stoker, Bram. New York: Dell Publishing
Co., 1978.

Stoller, Robert J.. New York:
Science House, 1968.

-.. New
York:Pantheon Books, 1979.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Stoltenberg, John. "Eroticism and Violence in the Father-Son
Relationship. " In, edited by
Jon Snodgrass, pp. 97-109. Albion, Calif.: Times Change
Press,1977.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. "Refusing to Be a Man. " In For Men Against
Sexismby Jon Snodgrass, pp. 36-41. Albion,
Calif.: Times Change Press, 1977.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. "Toward Gender Justice. " In For Men Against
Sexismedited by Jon Snodgrass, pp. 74-83. Albion,
Calif.: Times Change Press, 1977.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Stone, Merlin. New York: Dial
Press,1976.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Storr, Anthony.. Harmondsworth,
England: Penguin Books, 1964.

Strindberg, August. Inferno and From an Occult
Diary. Translated by Mary Sandbach. New York: Penguin Books,
1979.

Strouse, Jean, ed.. New York:
Grossman Publishers, 1974.

Styron, William. New York: Bantam
Books, 1980.

Swinburne, Algernon Charles. Edited
by Randolph Hughes. London: Falcon Press, 1952.

-.. New York: Harper
& Brothers,Publishers, 1905.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Swithenbank, Michael. Accra:
Ghana Universities Press, 1969.

Symonds, John Addington. In the Key of Blue and Other Prose
Essays.

-. A Problem in Modem Ethics Being an Inquiry into
the  London,
1896.

Symons, Arthur. New
York: Boni & Liveright, 1918.

Szasz, Thomas. New
York: Dell Publishing Co., Delta Books, 1970.

-.
New York:Basic Books, 1976.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Talese, Gay.. Garden City, N.
Y.: Doubleday & Co., 1980.

Tanner, Leslie B., ed. Voices from Women\'s
Liberation.

Tavris, Carol, and Susan Sadd. The Redbook Report on Female
Sexuality.

Tawney, R. H. London: Unwin Books,
1964.

Tennov, Dorothy.
Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Anchor Press, 1976.

Therese of Lisieux. The Autobiography of St. Therise of
Lisieux: The Story of a Soul. Translated by John Beevers.
Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday & Co., Image Books, 1957.

Thibaudet, Albert. French Literature from 1795 to Our
Era. Translated by Charles Lam Markmann. New York: Funk
& Wagnalls, 1967.

Thomas, Donald. Boston:
Little, Brown & Co.,1976.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Thomas, Piri. New York:
Random House, Vintage Books, 1974.

Tiger, Lionel, and Joseph Shepher. Women in the
Kibbutz.York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1975.

Tillich, Hannah. Briarcliff
Manor, N. Y.: Stein & Day, 1974.

Todd, John. Dodge, Mary A.
\Hamilton, Gail\. New York: Arno
Press, 1972.

Toplin, Robert Brent.
Westport, Conn.: Greenwood Press, 1975.

Trilling, Diana. New
York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1978.

Tripp, C. A. New York: New
American Library, 1976.

Tripp, Maggie, ed. New
York: Arbor House, 1974.

Troyat, Henry.
New York: Roy Publishers, 1946.

Tucker, Anne, ed. New York:
Alfred A. Knopf,1973.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Turnbull, Colin M. The Forest People: A Study of the Pygmies
of the Congo.

-. New York: Simon & Schuster,
1972.

Turquet-Milnes, G. The Influence of Baudelaire in France and
England

Tyler, Anne. New York: Alfred
A. Knopf, 1977.

Ullerstam, Lars. Translated
by Anselm Hollo. London: Calder & Boyars, 1967.

Velde, Theodore H. Van de.
Translated by Stella Browne. New York: Covici, Friede Publishers,
1930.

VetalpancavimSati.
Translated by Richard F. Burton. New York: Dover Publications,
1969.

Vidal, Gore.. New York: New
American Library, 1965.

-. Homage to Daniel Shays: Collected Essays
1952-1972.

York: Random House, Vintage Books, 1973.

-.

-.
New York:Random House, Vintage Books,
1978.

-. New York: Ballantine Books,
1975.

Vilar, Esther. New York:
Farrar, Straus and Giroux, 1972.

Vittorini, Elio. Translated by
Frances Frenaye and Frances Keene. New York: New Directions Books,
1973.

Wald, Karen.. Palo Alto, Calif.:
Ramparts Press,1978.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Wallace, Irving. New
York: Simon & Schuster, 1971.

Wallace, Michele. Black Macho and the Myth of the
Superwoman

Wallas, Ada. London:
George Allen & Unwin, 1929.

Warrior, Betsy, and Lisa Leghorn. Houseworker\'s
HandbookCambridge, Mass.: Woman's Center,
1975.

Weil, Simone. New York: Harper
& Row, Colophon Books, 1971.

-. Translated by Emma Craufurd.
NewYork: Harper & Row, Publishers, 1973.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Weininger, Otto. New York: G. P.
Putnam's Sons, 1975.

Weintraub, Stanley. New York: George
Braziller, 1967. Weiss, Peter. The Persecution and
Assassination of Jean-Paul Marat As Performed by the Inmates of the
Asylum of Charenton Under the Direction of the Marquis de Sade.
Translated by Geoffrey Skelton. New York: Atheneum Publishers,
1967.

Wells, H. G. The Invisible Man; The War of the Worlds; A
Dream of Armageddon.

Wharton, Edith.. New
York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 1970.

-. New York: Harper & Row, Publishers,
1980.

White, Edmund..
New York: Penguin Books, 1980.

-.. New York: E. P. Dutton & Co.,
1980.

Wilde, Oscar.
London: Methuen & Co., 1908.

Wilkerson, Albert E., ed. The Rights of Children: Emergent
Concepts in Law and Society. Philadelphia: Temple University
Press, 1973. Willard, Elizabeth Osgood Goodrich. Sexology as
the Philosophy of Life. Buffalo, N. Y.: Heritage Press,
1974.

Wilson, Edmund. The Bit Between My Teeth: A Literary
Chronicle of 1950-1965. New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux,
1965.

-. The Wound and the Bow: Seven Studies in
Literature.York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux,
1978.

Wilson, Edward O. New York: Bantam
Books,1979.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. Cambridge:
Harvard University Press, Belknap Press,
1975.

Winwar, Frances. The Saint and the Devil: Joan of Arc and
Gilles de Rais. New York: Harper & Brothers, Publishers,
1948.

Wolfenden, John. Report of the Committee on Homosexual
Offences and Prostitution. London: Her Majesty's Stationery
Office, 1957.

-. The Wolfenden Report: Report of the Committee on
Homosexual New York: Stein
& Day, 1963.

Wolff, Charlotte. New York:
Harper & Row, Colophon Books, 1972.

Wolff, Geoffrey. New York: Random House,
1976.

Wollstonecraft, Mary. Letters Written During a Short
Residence in Sweden and
Denmark

-. New
York: GarlandPublishing, 1974.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. New York:
W W.Norton & Co., 1967.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

Woodhull, Victoria Claflin. The Victoria Woodhull
Reader. Edited by Madeleine B. Sterm. Weston, Mass.: M & S
Press, 1974.

-. and Tennessee C. Claflin. The Human Body The Temple
of

Woodward, Bob, and Scott Armstrong.
New York: Simon & Schuster, 1979.

Woodward, Helen Beal. New York:
Farrar, Straus and Young, 1953.

Woolf, Virginia. New York:
Harcourt, Brace & World, 1953.

-. The Diary of Virginia Woolf: Volume II,
1920-1924.Anne Olivier Bell. New York:
Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1978.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. The Pargiters: The Novel-Essay Portion of THE
YEARS. Edited by Mitchell A. Leaska. New York: New York Public
Library & Readex Books, 1977.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-. New York: Harcourt, Brace
& World, 1957.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

-.   New York: Harcourt, Brace
& World, 1966.

"Y. " London:
Paul Elek, 1975.

Yarmolinsky, Avram. New York:
Harcourt, Brace & Co., 1934.

Young, Tracy. New York:
Pocket Books, 1977.{.Apple-style-span
style="font-family: AngsanaUPC, serif;"}

\




**Articles, Interviews, Pamphlets,
Papers, **

Adams, Virginia. "Getting at the Heart of Jealous Love. "
Psychology Today

Aegis

Alexander, et al. v. Yale University 459 F. Supp. 1 (D. Conn.
1977).

Altman, Dennis. "Interview with Gore Vidal. " Christopher
Street

American Journal of Obstetrics and Gynecology 135, no. 6
(November 15, 1979), and no. 7 (December 1, 1979).

Arkes, Hadley. "Marching Through Skokie. " National
Review

Bachy, Victor. "Danish 'Permissiveness' Revisited. " Journal
of Communication

Barry, Kathy. "The Real Patricia Hearst Story: 'What I Couldn't Say
Until Now. "', October 1978, p.
112.

Behr, Edward. "Perils of Polanski. ", May
14, 1979, p. 125.

Benz, Hamilton. "The Lady Reveals All. " 1,
no. 1 (March-April 1980): 74-77.

Berger, Alan. "The Porn Wars Heat Up: Is Censorship an Option?
"

Biskind, Peter. "Larry Flynt Rises Up Angry. " Seven
Days

Blachford, Gregg. "Looking at Pornography: Erotica and the Socialist
Morality. ", January-February 1979,
pp. 7-18.

Blasius, Mark. "Interview: Guy Hocquenghem. " Christopher
Street,

Bode, Ken. "On the Seamy Side of the Street. " Politics
Today

Bronski, Michael. "What Does Soft Core Porn Really Mean to the Gay
Male? ", January 28, 1978, pp.
6-7.

Brownmiller, Susan. "Rashomon in Maryland. "
Esquire,

Bruno v. Codd, 407 N. Y. S. 2d 165 (App. Div. 1978, appeal docketed,
August 8, 1978).

Cady, Barbara. "Playgirl Interview: Larry Flynt. "
Playgirl

Califia, Pat. "The New Puritans. "
April 17, 1980,
pp.

Chasseguet-Smirgel, Janine. "Reflexions on the Connections Between
Perversion and Sadism. " Translated by Jacqueline Pollock.
International Journal of Psycho-Analysis 59 (1978):
27-35.

Clark, Jil. "Circulating Information. " Interview with Allen
Young. May 12, 1979, pp.
8-9.

-. "Interview: Robin Morgan. "
January20, 1979, pp.
11-13.

Coleman, Kate. "Souled Out, May 19,
1980, pp. 17-27.

Contemporary OblGyn 13, no. 6 (June 1979), and 14, no. 3
(September 1979), no. 4 (October 1979), and no. 6 (December
1979).

Corea, Gena. "The Caesarean Epidemic. " Mother
Jones,

-. Interview with Dr. Herbert Ratner, September 20,
1979.

-. "'Scientific' Obstetrics Attacks the Home Birth Movement. "
Unpublished ms.

Court, John H. "Pornography and Sex-Crimes: Further Evidence on an Old
Controversy. " Mimeographed. Bedford Park: The Flinders University of
South Australia.

DeMott, Benjamin. "The Pro-Incest Lobby. " Psychology
Today,

Denneny, Michael. "Anatomy of a Love Affair. " Christopher
Street,

-. "Blue Moves: Conversations with a Male Porn Dancer.
" February 1980, pp.
26-35.

Dodgson, Charles Lutwidge \Lewis Carroll\. Photographs, edited by
David Ray.

Donnerstein, Edward. "Pornography and Violence Against Women:
Experimental Studies. " Mimeographed. Madison: University of
Wisconsin.

-. "Pornography Commission Revisited: Aggressive-Erotica and
Violence Against Women. " Mimeographed. Madison: University of
Wisconsin.

Dudar, Helen. "America Discovers Child Pornography. "
Ms.,

Duncan, Carol. "The Esthetics of Power in Modern Erotic Art. "
Heresies,

Duncan, Lois. "Can This Marriage Be Saved? " Ladies\' Home
Journal,

Dunn, Angela Fox. "The Dark Side of Erotic Fantasy. " Human
Behavior

Dworkin, Andrea. "The Bruise That Doesn't Heal. " Mother
Jones,

-. "The Lie. " November 9,
1979, pp.

-. "Phallic Imperialism---Why Economic Recovery Will Not Work
for Us. "

-. "Pornography and Grief. "
December1978,  pp.
8-9.

-. "Pornography: The New Terrorism. " The Body
Politic,August 1978, pp.
11-12.

-. "The Power of Words. ", May
27,

-. "Safety, Shelter, Rules, Form, Love---The Promise of
the June 1979, p.
62.

-. Why So-Called Radical Men Love and Need
Pornography. Pamphlet. East Palo Alto, Calif.: Frog in the
Well, 1978.

Echols, Alice. "Neo-Separatism. " December 23, 1978.
Mimeographed.

Ellis, John. "Photography/Pornography/Art/Pornography. "
Screen

Ephron, Nora. "Women. " February 1973, p.
14.

"Espansion of the Marital Rape Exemption. " National Center
on Women and Family Law Newsletter,

Fag Rag

Fallaci, Oriana. "An Interview with Khomeini. " The New York
Times Magazine,

The Family Planning Council of Western Massachusetts, Inc.,
News,

Forer, Lois G. "Rape Is an Expression of Hatred. " Letter,
The New York Times,

Gelbert, Bruce Michael. "Coming Out 'S' in Print. " Fag
Rag,1978,  pp.
7-8.

Gelles, Richard J. "Violence and Pregnancy: A Note on the Extent of the
Problem and Needed Services. "
24, no. 1 (January 1975): 81-86.

Gengle, Dean. "Scripture from the Book of Krassner. " The
Advocate.

Gilman, Richard. "Position Paper. " The New York Times Book
Review,

Goldstein, Richard. "Some Parting Shots. " The Village
Voice

Greer, Philip, and Myron Kandel. "Road to Videotape Market Is Paved
with Pornography. " May 29,
1979.

Griffin, Susan. "On Pornography. ", no.
4, pp. 15-17.

Guidelines for Equal Treatment of the Sexes in McGraw-Hill Book Company
Publications.

Hagberg, Karen. "Collective Thinking: Karen Hagberg Comments.
"

Hannon, Gerald. "Devices and Desires. " The Body
Politic

Haskell, Molly. "Rape in the Movies: Update on an Ancient War.
"

Hentoff, Nat. "The New Legions of Erotic Decency. "
Inquiry

Heresies: Third World Women 2, no. 4, issue 8
(1979).

Hinckle, Warren. "Why Eldridge Cleaver Is a Wife-Beater. "
San Francisco Chronicle

Horn, Richard. "The Lighter Side of Laser. " The New York
Times Magazine, pt. 2, September 30, 1979, pp.
96-104.

Jay, Karla. "Pot, Porn, and the Politics of Pleasure. "
Mimeographed.

Johnston, Gordon. "Tyranny of the Penis. " Christopher
Street

Johnston, Jill. "A Few Rude Generalizations on Behalf of Enslavement
and Other Remembrances of the '70s. " The Village
Voice

Jong, Erica. "You Have to Be Liberated to Laugh. "
Playboy1980,  p.
154.

"Journal Mothers Testify to Cruelty in Maternity Wards. "
Ladies\' Home Journal

Keen, Sam. "A Voyeur in Plato's Cave. " Psychology
Today1980,  pp.
85-101.

Keshishian, John M. "An Anatomy of a Burmese Beauty Secret. "
National Geographic\\

Kitzinger, Sheila. "Some Mothers' Experiences of Induced Labour, "
report of The National Childbirth Trust. Mimeographed. London: October
1975.

Klein, Jeffrey. "Born Again Porn. ",
February-March 1978,  p.
12.

Kleinberg, Seymour. "Alienated Affections: Friendships Between Gay Men
and Straight Women. ",
October-November 1979, pp. 26-40.

Kornbluth, Jesse. "The Education of Christie Hefner. "
Savvy

Kostash, Myrna. "Power and Control: A Feminist View of Pornography.
"

Kristol, Irving. "The Shadow of the Marquis. "
Encounter,1957,  pp.
3-5.

"L. A. Murder 'Targets'---500 Girls. " San Francisco
Chronicle

Lauritsen, John. "Dangerous Trends in Feminism: Disruptions,
Censorship, Bigotry. " Mimeographed.

Lemer, Max. "Playboy: An American Revolution of Morality. "
New York Post

Levering, Robert. "TV on Trial. " The San Francisco Bay
Guardian

Lindsey, Robert. "Sex Films Find Big Market in Home Video. "
The New York Times

Lorde, Audre. Uses of the Erotic: The Erotic as
Power.

"The 'Madonnas' Turn On Their Pimps. ",
July 7, 1980, pp. 70-71.

Malamuth, Neil M. "Erotica, Aggression and Perceived Appropriateness. "
Paper presented at the 86th Annual Convention of the American
Psychological Association, September 1, 1978. Mimeographed.

-. "Rape Fantasies as a Function of Repeated Exposure
to Sexual Violence. " Paper presented at the Second National
Conference on the Evaluation and Treatment of Sexual Aggres-sives, May
1979. Mimeographed.

-, and James V. P. Check. "Penile Tumescence and Perceptual
Responses to Rape as a Function of Victim's Perceived Reactions. " Paper
presented at the annual meeting of the Canadian Psychological
Association, June 1979.
Mimeographed.

-; Seymour Feshbach; and Yoram Jaffe. "Sexual Arousal
and 
Issues" Journal of Social Issues 33, no. 2 (1977):
110-33.

-; Scott Haber; and Seymour Feshbach. "Testing Hypotheses Regarding
Rape: Exposure to Sexual Violence, Sex Differences, and the 'Normality'
of Rapists. " Winnipeg: University of Manitoba; Los Angeles: University
of California. Mimeographed.

-; Maggie Heim; and Seymour Feshbach. "Sexual Responsiveness of College
Students to Rape Depictions: Inhibitory and Disinhibitory Effects. "
Winnipeg: University of Manitoba; Los Angeles: University of California.
Mimeographed.

-, and Barry Spinner. "A Longitudinal Content Analysis
of Sexual Violence in the Best-Selling Erotica Magazines. "
Winnipeg: University of Manitoba.
Mimeographed.

The Marriage Law of the People\'s Republic of China. Peking:
Foreign Language Press, 1973.

Mead, Margaret. "Women and the 'New' Pornography. "
Redbook,

Miles, Angela. "The Politics of Feminist Radicalism: A Study in
Integrative Feminism, " Ph. D. dissertation, University of Toronto,
1979.

Miller, Marilyn G., and Janet S. McCoy. Domestic Violence in
Oregon: Preliminary Findings. Salem, Oreg.: Governor's
Commission for Women, 1979.

Mitzel, John. "Boston/Boise: Pederasty in the Athens of America? "
Edited by James M. Saslow. February 27,
1978, pp. 12-13.

Money, John. "Bisexual, Homosexual, and Heterosexual: Society, Law, and
Medicine. " 2, no. 3
(Spring 1977): 229-33.

-. "Imagery in Sexual Hang-Ups. " The
Humanist, March-April 1978.
Reprint.

-. "List of Inclusion or Displacement Paraphilias;
Hypophilias, Male and Female, " 1976.
Mimeographed.

-. "Sex, Love, and Commitment. " Journal of Sex and
Marital  2, no. 4 (Winter 1976):
273-76.

-. "Statement on Antidiscrimination Regarding Sexual Orientation.
" 2, no. 2 (Winter
1976-77): 159-60.

Morgan, Robin. "How to Run the Pornographers Out of Town (and Preserve
the First Amendment). " November 1978, p.
55.

Morgan, Ted. "United States Versus the Princes of Porn. " The
New York Times Magazine,

Moss, Leland. "In Pursuit of Pornography. "
Gaysweek,1978,  p.
23.

Munk, Erika. "A Case of Sexual Abuse. " The Village
Voice,

Ob. Gyn. News 14, no. 19 (October 1, 1979), no. 20 (October
15, 1979), no. 21 (November 1, 1979), no. 23 (December 1, 1979), no. 24
(December 15, 1979); 15, no. 5 (March 1, 1980), no. 6 (March 15, 1980),
no. 7 (April 1, 1980), no. 8 (April 15, 1980), no. 9 (May

1,  1980).

Pankhurst, Christabel, "The Government and White Slavery. " Pamphlet
reprinted from April 18, April 25,
1913.

Peary, Gerald. "Woman in Porn. "
September 1978, pp. 28-32.

"Playboy Gives First Amendment Awards. " The National Law
Journal,

Pliner, Roberta. "Fag-hags, Friends or Fellow-travelers? "
Christopher Street, October-November 1979, pp.
16-25.

Poett, James. "Deep Peep. " May
1, 1978, p. 1.

Polskin, Howard. "Pornography Unleashed. "
July 1980, pp. 34-39.

Popert, Ken. "Towards a Theory of Fistfucking. " The Body
Politic,

Prescott, James W. "Is There a Cure for Violence? " Penthouse
Forum,

"Preying on Playgrounds: The Sexploitation of Children in Pornography
and Prostitution. " 5 (1978):
809-46.

Reavis, Dick. "Town Without Pity. "
May 1980, p. 140.

Rechy, John..
Reprint by the Lambda Book Club. N. d.

Reed, David. "Repression and Exaggeration: The Art of Tom of Finland.
" April 1980, pp.
16-21.

Reed, Rex. "'Cruising' sickens, insults, and distorts. "
Daily News,

Reeves, Tom. "In Defense of Boy Love. " Gay Community
News,

Rembar, Charles. "Obscenity---Forget It. " The
Atlantic,

Rohrbaugh, Joanna Bunker. "Femininity on the Line. "
Psychology Today,

Rubin, Gayle. "Sexual Politics, the New Right, and the Sexual Fringe.
" February 1978, pp.
9-13.

Russell, Diana E. H. "On Pornography. "
no. 4, pp. 11-15.

Safire, William. "A 'Bum Rap' for Thevis? " The
Springfield June
16, 1978, p. 18.

Satchell, Michael. "The Big Business of Selling Smut. "
Parade

"Schedule of Course on Human Sexuality. " Piscataway, N. J.: College of
Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey Rutgers Medical School, 1978, 1979.
Mimeographed.

Schwartz, Toby. "Larry Flynt's Media Empire: Will the Porn King Save
the Counterculture? " February 22,
1978, pp. 12-13,

Shultz, Gladys Denny. "Journal Mothers Report on Cruelty in Maternity
Wards. " May 1958, p.
44.

"The Skin-Book Boom: What Have They Done to the Girl Ne\\\* Door?
"

Smith, Don D. "The Social Content of Pornography. " Journal
of Communication

Smith, Howard, and Lin Harris, "Orgasmology and More. " The
Village Voice,

Smith, Marjorie M. "'Violent Pornography' and the Women's Movement.
" Januarv-February 1978,
pp. 50-53.

Stambolian, George. "Interview with a Masochist. "
Christopher Street,

Steinem, Gloria. "Erotica and Pornography: A Clear and Present
Difference. "

-. "Linda Lovelace's 'Ordeal. '" May 1980, pp.
72-77.

-. "Pornography: Not Sex But the Obscene Use of Power.
" 

Thurman, Judith. "What Is 'The Real Thing' for a Porn Star? "
Ms

United States Department of Health, Education, and Welfare.
Advance Data,

Van Gelder, Lindsy. "Anita Bryant on the March: The Lessons of Dade
County. "

Veasey, Jack. "Sex as Big Business: Inside Skin Mags. "
Philadelphia Gay News,

Walker, Chris. "Potentially Beneficial Aspects of Pornography.
"

Woods, Laurie. "Litigation on Behalf of Battered Women. "
Womens Rights Law Reporter 5, no. 1 (Fall 1978):
7-33.

Women's Institute for Freedom of the Press. "The First Annual
Conference on Planning a National and International Communications
System for Women: A Report. " Delivered April
7-8,

Yoakum, Robert. "The Great Debate.
" 16, no. 1 (May-June
1977): 53-58.

-. "'An Obscene, Lewd, Lascivious, Indecent, Filthy, and

Vile Tabloid Entitled Screw. \'\" Columbia Journalism
Review

Young, Ian. "A Nosegay for Jamie. ".
New York: Hunter College, 1980, pp. 14-15.
